Really bummed I am leaving the Bahamas Albany Resort is#1 missing u already  
Good morning Bahamas  
Wow Nikkis but grew tons!!! RT Throw back pic. and Nikki Nelms  
Honestly babe- u never sleep. RT “@KimKardashian: Rise & grind! Workout time!!!” 
That's a night. #bahamas  
Hey gurl!!!!!!  
Baby let me love you long time.  
My friends r crazy. and too crazy!  
And so it begins...  
#Mandown fun times  
ummmmm hello????!!!!!!!!!!!! 
Weekend girls girls girls. Fun times! 
made me cry tonight.... Ill miss u more than u can imagine :( 
I'm very Hungry.... 
Excited to be in Canada with my bestest and Aga Radwanska for our tennis Toronto!! We play tomorrow check us out!! 
please call me asap. Why is the only way I can reach you is through twitter? Arghhhh 
“Yes!!!! Dinner?? RT are you here?? I miss you” 
Awe I love u!!! RT no sentimental BS from me but I really do miss Guess Mr. Daniels has 2 help me thru my sorrows 
Having so much fun on my OPI shoot!!! 
Fame by Irene Cara RT Music is an AWESOME motivator. What is your all-time favorite pump up song to get hyped before a big game? 
Check out my video exclusively behind the scenes for my OPI nails shoot.  
OPI photo shoot! Amazing. I LOVE the colors. Pics coming soon!!! 
I miss you 
Or blow up. 
your friend really need to get a life. They already ruined mine. Can they just blow away already? 
Dear "boy" that reads my tweets and tells "The Bread" everything I say. You are pathetic! And what is more I can't stand you. Get a life! 
Is that you with a white button down top and jeans? #nice 
What a final # masters 
It's coming back this friday RT“@cmma26: I miss SerenaFridays , I need to know if you are playing 
Ok I promise #serenafriday this Friday. Ask me anything you want o know! #serenafriday 
I'll be there. We can discuss the finals RT“@pmouratoglou: dinner is better.” 
Lunch? 
Where is I miss her 
Once again I am right. RT“@pmouratoglou: thanks for the information I thought he lost it.” 
Yea but Federer won the 1st set RT“@pmouratoglou: Still not conviced with Roger's return on second serves....... 
Getting ready to watch the men's masters semis!!!! 
how could u be there and skip Istanbul... :( 
Having Tea... Sounds fun or boring? Its the company that counts... 
One person's trash is another person's treasure. People often discard or disregard the most precious jewels but find out too late. 
Some doors are supposed to stay shut. 
I LOVE SOUTH AFRICA!!!! I LOVE it. I LOVE it. I LOVE it. And I love everyone here!!! You guys made my trip amaz! I can't wait to come back! 
Amazing tonight in Nigeria. Wow what a reception. I truly love you guys!! #NigeriaRocks 
lol RT “@Becker_Boris: haha....” 
I'll always ruin your life. RT“@BigSascha: My dearest would you please stop talking to me. I am trying to get a life here.” 
Dear please come home mama serena misses her older brother! 
Hey guys Im thinking about fasting. Has anyone ever done it? I need to clean my system and mental from such a long hard year. Can u help me? 
thank you. I don't think I can say it enough. 
Hello Nigeria! Thanks for the warm welcome and all the love, support and Prayers. I love all of you!! Your Serena 
Lol I ment "How I met your Mother" Lol not "number" 
I'm hopeless addicted to how I met your number 
Praying for victims of hurricane sandy. Go away Sandy go away. 
Not kinda- REALLY :( 
Truth is.... I'm kinda sad about it. 
I had big plans of beaches, sand, and lemonade... But dident work out as planned. Darn it! 
Maybe ill go to a island... 
Another year another no vacation. One of these days I'm gonna take some time off. But for now- Work :) 
I wanna go on vacation but I have no plans. Suggestions?? 
Tks everyone for all support. I am so happy to win today. Love you!!! 
Guess who got fueled up with the latest #Nikefuelband #Nike awesome.  
yeaaaa RT “@tncay: There is nothing able to make me happier as you did in my whole life.  
Grigor Dmitrov's shot: incredible!! Go Grigor!!!!  
Agree! RT Don't promise when you're happy, don't reply when you're angry, and don't decide when you're sad. 
X 
Do u love this as much as I do??  
I miss you lady!!! Love u! 
Check out the hilarious trailer for my boy new comedy A HAUNTED HOUSE in theaters 1/11/13  RT THIS! 
aiiiiiiiiiii 
#TeamWilliams minus #teamhot!  
I love this pic with me and nicccccce!!  
I just had one of those "what was I THINKING???!!!?? moments" ughhh 
My eyes are watering up because I am so proud of my sister so proud of you sis congrats on your tournament win! I love you 
Nice guys finish last 
2ed is not in my vocab. 
new album is Bananas!!!! Get yours now its unleashed!  love u Bran!!!! 
wow Maura! Congrats! Love u! RT Congrats "There's No Place Like Home" premieres tonight ESPN 8pm Watch! 
Hey. I've been missing in action from twitter. What's going on? 
Food poisoning? This has not been my best 2/3 weeks... 
My tummy hurts :( Tums anyone? 
This Friday I will restart #Serenafriday !!! Get your questions together!!!! 
About to shake up some tennis balls. #career 
Work now. Play later. Much later. 
Congrats to wow gurl! Great job!!! 
:) RT I miss you too RT I miss my friend 
I miss my friend 
Amazing night with it hasent even started yet. where r you?? 
Spending the night with Diondria... This is going to get interesting... 
Every time he leaves I wonder if he will come back 
My Brand spankin' new workout mix Volume 3 is now up on itunes! I hope it inspires you! !!!!!  
Support Breast Cancer Awareness month and Believe in HOPE. What do u guys think? :  
Still no luggage. Day 3. I need my clothes!!!!!! 
Am I the only person that gets annoyed when someone text meveveryday?? Text/ bbm Everyday when we r not BFF's is too much. #peaceneeded 
I miss my home. Home is where your family, friends and non lost luggage is. 
But I am finally feeling better. 
This 24 hrs has gone from bad to worse. Lost luggage. What airline looses luggage now days?? So redic. 
I can't wait to see my girl beautiful Jewlery on from 2am to 4 am today. East coast time. Tune in!!! Retweet!!!! 
Flu no fun. :( 
I bought the CD and got it digitally. #1FanForLife 
I just got it! RT ¡Uno! is now avail everywhere! Get it digitally at Amazon only 5$ this week! Get it at  
Im sleepy 
This piece of bread looks like a piece of ______.  
I love you Billie Joe!!!! With all my heart. Your #1 fan always Serena 
is ur baby ok!?? 
so sorry. :( RT“@AdamDawson01: Hi Serena, my nan died yesterday so if you retweet me I would be so happy.” 
really??? The earrings are amazing. What did I do to deserve a friend like you??? I love u so much! #lorenjewels 
Dear camera man in Milan please stop following my around! Your pictures will have people assuming false things!!!! Ugh #OverIt 
I've been whatsapp ing you. Where the he'll ru? :). Hit me up :) 
I have come to my crossroads of destiny. Choose wisely. 
Check out my Enduracool Instant Cooling Kit today on It's a must have on the court and off!!  
I can't get out of bed. 
Everything I have done in the past 2 and 3 months would not have been possible without Jehovah God. I'm so grateful to know about him. 
He breaks your heart. He Believes lies. He goes on dates. He dosent talk to you. U will never feel the same but u survive. 
Girls day nails an cooking with and Lauren Vonderpool. Nice. #breaktime #girlsheal 
Hey everyone thanks for all the support. I have 2 final hours on Join me at 8pm for our last 2 hrs :) 
I'm on HSN now check me out!! $29 today special!! Amazing!!! Tune in now!!! 
Hey everyone. I think I should bring back #SerenaFriday should I?? 
Ummmm I'm kinda obsessed with "How I met your mother" 
tonight midnight. Be sure to tune in!!! 
I am going to be on HSN tonight at Midnight! From midnight to 2am. We have new clothes bags. And everything is under 100$ tune in!!! 
Look at all these people who got on a #FUELSERENA streak with me. Love all your support, couldn't have done this alone!  
I was Loving my Versace Collection dress from U likey??  
US Open 2012 Champ. #pagentpose  
I did it!!!! 
thanks love RT“@ParisHilton: Want to wish my friend a huge congratulations on her US Open win!! #YES! ☺ So proud of you! ♡” 
Thank you guys. All of you. U love each one of you deeply. 15 grand slams? #WinFromWithin 
Go-You're not welcome anymore.... 
Are you ready for some FOOTBALL??? 
U guys gotta go to  and order a fun collage. I just did its so fun! Wowow!!! 
I miss my friend already. :( 
I hope you are ok Billie Joe Armstrong 
Tks babes!!! When ru coming?? RT Congrats to on her win today! #Jeah! #WinFromWithin 
I will miss you and your smile. I love u forever. Your, Serena. 
me and thanks for coming out today.  you sis  
I'm going to get some much needed rest tonight thanks to Sleep LOVE these!! Goodnight everyone! 
you are leaving me :( 
I have been training really hard to play the best I can & now it's your turn! Get out & get active to #FUELSERENA  
omg had NO idea u karaoked!!!!! I'm an even bigger fan now!!! Can I just saw maj Awesome!!! 
NEVER doubt me again!!!!!! I came through for Kamal #Serenapower 
Do u love me? Love u more! Ha! RT looks like we got a winner. Love u sis. 
Hey guys!!! How is everyone??? 
just thought of you!!! 
Your serve scared me! RT“@JackSock: Practiced with this morning here in NYC. #USOPEN12 #UsOpen” 
noooooooooooo now im sad. :( 
Still trying to go 24 hrs without talking or texting Ugh. Starting over now! 
Breakfast party of 1... Kinda relaxing. Getting used to this party of 1 thing. #betterintime 
What courage you have. You inspire me RT Great day to be alive. Recovering and (cont)  
wake up gurl!!!!! 
I used to want be a gymnast so I'm good at flipping. Just need confidence. Lol. #askgabby 
can you teach me how to do a back flip?? And can u give me lessons on the beam. And when?? :) 
Ummm guess who I sat next to #airplanephotoshoot  
Join Russell Simmons, Peacekeepers & LIFE Camp at Sutphin Blvd & 111th Ave in Queens tonight at 6pm for #StopTheViolence rally 
Sometimes 1 or 2 days too long changes feelings. 
He got dem crazy eyes! RUN!!!!! 
I'm so proud of my sister Venus I love you. 
Dear Please stop texting me. We are to have time away from each other. Text me Tuesday. Best your Boss, Serena 
Dear alarm going off outside my window, Please go off! It is 4am!!!! Madly, Serena 
Break time. A few days rest from tennis (and geometry) and than the US Open! Thanks guys!!!! I love u! Xxx S 
I must stop the study of geometry.... 
I clearly loved geometry. Triangles in particular. 
Let's meet in NYC! is giving away 2 Grand Slam tickets + a meet & greet w/ me. RT for a chance to win!  
I love you so much! Hugs and kisses. Love you love you love you love you 
My sister just bought me the coolest neatest night light! My whole ceiling lights up in stars. I love it! Love you sis. :) 
you are beyond gorgeous. Seriously. Love the look. 
Xx 
Dear Huge pimple on my right cheek, I HATE you, Sincerely Serena 
Random night! Fun fun fun. 
we r ready to answer your question!! 
Double golden girl!!! Check out I'm still so happy!!!  
Preparing for the final at the olympics!  
I'm gonna send more Olympic pics!!! 
Hey everyone I'm in Cincinnati for the #westernandsouthernopen lets go!!!! 
B-O-L-T 
I will have more pictures later. Stay tuned!! 
Team lunch. #Olympics. #GoUSA!  
From Compton to the Olympics #GoUSA #Olympics  
#USA basketball. #olympics me and Kobe Bryant #GoUSA  
Team USA track and field! #olympics. #gousa  
I love all my fans!!!!! Kisses and more kisses. 
Dear please call me. Retweet everyone!!!! 
Go USA!!!!!!  
2 gold Medals 16months out of hospital- #winfromwithin 
Ok everyone u ready for some Pictures!!??!!! Here they come! 
Bolt!!!!!!! 
Gold Medal!!! I can't believe it. I got the singles gold!!!!!! I'm gonna sleep in it tonight! 
Wow. Were is my fairytale ending. I do I do I say I do deserve one. 
when?? “@thefrontrunnaz: Can't wait to get to LA!!!” 
#USA 1st GOLD courtesy of Ryan Lochte. Congrats. We LOVE you!!! 
OLYMPICS!!!!!!!!! 
You are still the one 
I got tricked again. #annoyed 
Hey everyone! So excited to be on I have some amazing fashion in my collection! Join and get $15 credit:  
Is cloning available yet? I wanna clone someone..... #PerfectButTaken 
can I just say I'm totally obsessed and LOVE you #FuelSerena 
Dear Nike Paris I love you #NIKEPARIS thanks for everything. 
I can't wait for tomorrow. . .I never knew a something as simple as a friend could brighten my day #justafriend 
Locked out of my apartment... No friends in Paris. I may be sleeping on the ground tonight... 
I always choose the wrong one!!!! 
y are u in Paris!!! #random 
Will never forget the #FUELSERENA LTA girls. All the NikeFuel you earned for me is engraved on my ICE FuelBand!  
Hummm I think this onzie makes my butt look TOO big. Ugh #BigButtproblems  
This guys. Great day in 
Ok guys I'm back on air now! HSN tune in now! Everything under 100$ 
Good morning everyone. I will be back on HSN at 10am. Check out my today's special my rouched top for only 29.90!!!  
See all my new fashions on HSN live at Midnight or go to  everything is under 100$ 
Ok everyone I am going to be on HSN Live at Midnight Eastern time. That's 1 hour and 20 mins. RETWEET! 
this is how it's done. Lol #Imacopycat  
Yesterday my TV would not work. I realized I'm single and I'm have to learn how to fix things myself- I figured it out #singleladystory 
My bed: 6 Teddy bears and 2 dogs. 
Dear Florida, Oh how have I missed your afternoon Rain- and lighting.. How I've missed thee... Your adopted daughter, Serena 
I want my story to have a happy ending. 
u cramped lately?? 
Heart breakers!!! RT “@bakuzzi: should try singing a Chaka Khan classic. She is from Chicago!! Lol” 
the last time I karaoked I was with and well that ended in craziness. Lol I'm better now Tami!! 
ugh not you!!! 
Omg have I missed karaoke at home! I need these songs #musictherapy 
Dear LA, My goodness have I missed you Your California Girl Serena 
I'm happy to win today! Oh wow. To Jehovah I give all the glory for my win. Thanks for health and waking me up. 
tks LOVE you are a champ! RT“@Jarka_Tennis: Congrats to for winning!you are champion and I love your outfit!looks awesome!” 
Its one of those desperate housewives days. #itunesdownloads 
Ive been awake since 1am. #jetlag 
i miss u... 
I'm at Chef Chu's restaurant in Palo Alto Ca. This place is insanely good! Thanks Chef! I love it!!! 
a must read. My fav part my media rep! Ha Gooo Val!! RT “@pmouratoglou:   
Yes. 
I don't like you. #thismeanswar 
def 3:30am. Maybe 2:30am 
Dear Europe,
 Oh how I miss you. I will see you sooner than later.
Xxx
S 
Just got to the #BankoftheWestClassic and look how sweet they are. Love u guys!  
Hey everyone!! Please Watch ABC’s new comedy series “Trust Us With Your Life” tomorrow night (cont)  
7 Nike dresses for 7 matches. #beprepared  
Had so much fun shooting #dropdeaddiva - my episode airs this Sunday- TODAY, July 8th, at 9pm/8c on with RT 
I couldn’t have done this with out all of the support from you guys. This win is dedicated to everyone who helped #FUELSERENA! 
5th Wimbledon title. That's a #WinFromWithin 
Yahooooooooo 
Yeaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa 
 
Wimbledon final #WinFromWithin 
Hey guys got a score of 5213 today, know im not doing this alone so show me what you've got #FUELSERENA 
I'm so excited to be in the semifinals. I need your support more than ever, so send me your favorite inspirational quotes to #FUELSERENA! 
Hey guys send me something funny to make me laugh before my match #FUELSERENA love you guys! 
I'm cold... :( 
Truly inspirational. story makes me want to work even harder! Always keep positive! Thanks for sharing it to #FUELSERENA 
Hey wow -Watch my #InsideTheEdge spot as I work w/ #GSSI to elevate my game< & RT 
Watching Cinderella.... Maybe the dream I wish will come true... 
I feel you. RT“@ivokarlovic: Anyone who knows me can confirm that I'm not a sore looser. But 10 foot faults? Cmon. I never do foot faults.” 
I always have my #Nikefuelband with me. Love the new ice color. :)  
:) RT “@KimKardashian: I feel you RT Simply OMG” 
... Well now that I know we are friends- no thats not enough. Any other reasons?? 
Looking my best is not just reserved for the red carpet! Loved to see your on court outfit for some inspiration #FUELSERENA 
Simply OMG 
aiiii comadre. Estas bien? 
OMG. 
if you don't have a good enough reason I will go for.... well you know... 
well Fabio...thats a good question. I have been supporting them. But do you have any reason why I should KEEP supporting? 
Check out all the hard work these girls put in to support me with their  
Looks like #FUELSERENA is back in full force, thanks to 
me love you. I sorry. :( 
I just earned 3431@NikeFuel in my match! Now you're on the spot too, who is keeping up? #FUELSERENA 
Can't wait! RT The first single from ¡Uno! will be "Oh Love" and will hit the airwaves on July 16th. Stay tuned 4 more details! 
Keep an eye on and the hashtag #FUELSERENA for all the opportunities to inspire me throughout the tournament. 
Help me get amped up for my match tomorrow! and I have got a challenge for you. Will you #FUELSERENA? 
Goodnight. 
I miss you still. Even More 
What a sport! Wow! Eurocup!!!!! 
OHHHH man these Penalty kicks!!! Ahhhhhhhhhhhhh 
OHHHHMYYYYYGODDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD 
Meet my son Max Rafael. He's so silly.  
Welcome to :) RT Coolin...follow my mobli !!  
Ohhhhh man... Penalty kicks?? I can't take it! #EnglandVsItaly 
Wow overtime now! #eurocup2012 #eurocup2012 
OHMYGOODNESS!!!!! #EnglandVsItaly 
Good god this is exciting!! #eurocup2012 #EnglandVsItaly 
#winfromwithin train when everyone else is sleep. 
Ok my Ice #fuelband is CRAZY! I'm so in love!! #FuelSerena #nikefuel 
I can be a chicken at times.... Well... Always actually. When I'm not playing tennis #shygirl 
My Nike LunarGlide+ iD is inspired by a Miami sunset. What's your inspiration? Make yours here:  
I desperately want to jump in a cab in London and tell the driver Pivet Drive # 5 please. 
Thank you Venus I am finally starting to see some light at the end of this tunnel... 
YeaaaAAaaaaaa!!! Miami Heat!!!!!!! Whoop whoop! yall did it!!! 
Goooooooo Heat!!!!! 
Ha! .... And it just got worse... 
Today is not my day. 
Dinner with you have to watch your food around him with his extendable fork!  
Everyday I have burned all of my 5000 fuelband points! Do u have one how are you doing? #niketennis #nikefuel #nikefree 
Me and Max just arrive to London. Its his first trip with me.  
Oops... 
Never leave home without my suncream and eyeliner.  
Woke up to this #badhairday  
If you are referring to Sasha showing up to practice today with out underwear AGAIN, I think he (cont)  
I'm not the one... I'd suggest: Do not get testy with me.... 
Wow sad to hear about Rodney King. 
Buying gifts in 
Shopping in store. The collection from Christopher just keeps getting better and better... Wow 
Join & as we work to #KeepHerInTheGame and support Title IX.  
I like teddy bears. 
Lol ok!! RT uhhmm... Dare to bite 's ear.. The game will get crackin!!!!! 
I have the WORST poker face. Lol I JUST cracked lol the worst! I cannot keep a straight face 
Gave up playing cards and now we are playing truth or dare. 
Working on my pokerface. :) 
Playing cards with and my Fav stallion 
seriously can u and stop tweeting pics! I wanna jump through my phone and go there! I wish I were a teleporter 
Your shirt is too loose around the arm. RT Why you asking ? You wanna go make some after practice? Hahahahha!!! 
Ummmm u are not my type. RT Why you asking ? You wanna go make some after practice? Hahahahahahaha!!! 
when are you gonna have kids? 
I'm so mad u are "there" without me. My fav city! 
Sasha did you wash your hands after you pooped in my toilet? You are a very nasty dude. 
Ha! Indeed u do! :) RT I think that I know why. 
I had to put water on my cereal this morning..... 
I can see it in your eyes that you are sad. 
Tough day 
#FF great guy! 
Still on European time. 
100 degrees in Palm Beach. 
Yuck! Just dropped my passport and wallet in the toilet. 
you are so kind to me I love you so much. 
Breakfast..... me and my book. 
I miss saying "Bonjour" 
hahhahahahahahahahhahahahahahaahahahaha 
I need your help with big bro stuff. Someone made fun of me. Someone u know.... 
I know your favorite songs and u tell me all your dreams.. I think I know where you belong. I think I know its with me. 
... And you've got this smile that could light up this whole town. I haven't seen it in a while since she brought you down.... 
You belong with me 
MUST-Tune in at 10pm ET - my EnduraCOOL Instant Cooling towels LIVE #WillSellOut!  
Allez! RT Photo Avantage Leconte avec Always good to spend time with u.  
Sticking to one road, never trying another direction will lead to the same results. Sometimes we have to be brave and just take a chance. 
Guns and roses concert. #legendary #epic  
I just got your gift # 3 of five for our 5 year anniversary together. I hope u are not in Fl cheating on by hitting with Venus... 
I feel compelled to say Green Day is better still! 
More doubles practice with #teamsmash  
Doubles practice with funny. I hope I am good enough...  
So I have 142,115 #nikefuel points since April :) what about you? I'm kinda excited about this! Getting fit guys! Join me #FuelSerena 
Ok- so Stronger by Kelly Clarkson will be my pump-up song b4 my 1st match.! Thanks & for tagging it #FUELSERENA 
Check out serve serious fashion make overs tonite on 7/8c #fashionMob ..... 
love u back gurlll RT“@SvetlanaK27: I just love she yells across the street to say hi)))) so nice girl!my sista)!!!” 
+Mission challenge: Guyssss! I need a pump-up song before my first match in Paris! Let me know your power anthem by tagging it #FUELSERENA. 
I went to practice today and mistakenly took Venus racket bag. Thank goodness we use the same amaz Wilson racket!Thanks Vee 
Went to Paris shopping spree. Thanks nikeparis you guys are amazing!  
French open RT Have a tournament this weekend? How ru preparing your mind and body to take on the competition? #WinFromWithin 
Love the skirt and bag! RT“@vika7: This how close I got to the Eiffel tower  
Hey everyone! I need your motivation to earn and do the best I can in Paris . Will you help me? #FUELSERENA  
de Chantal, également connu comme Serena 
Merci paris pour être incroyable 
J'aime tout le monde ici, en france. le pople sont ao m'appuie cette année ! Je ne peux pas attendre pour commencer à jouer. 
Mama! RT Hey!!! What's UP !! Yahoo 
ummm my cousin Leroy was playing with my phone. Check tour text messages. 
Neh... He needs to focus! :) lol RT get him a date lol 
Rejoice in the hope.... Preserve in Prayer 
but u never quit on your dreams! NEVER. 
ha! Lol i have a good excuse this time...RT“@ogeedm8: peanut island memorial day boating this weekend... 
hummmm I agree. RT“@friendsita: Best gift for Roland Garros.” 
never quit! RT“@SamMartinMusic: Almost time to retire the music career! Ive put it off for to long.” 
What should I get for our 5 year anniversary. I need help? ? 
I reached my goal today. #Nikefuelband 
 
  
I think while in paris my name should be Chantel #sofrench 
:) perfect.Thanks in advance. Xx RT “@pmouratoglou: welcome to Paris. If you need anything, I hope that you know who2 ask. 
And it's official I'm on my way to my fav city. #Paris 
I desperately need to get my off court Swagg back... 
I guess it turns out I was the weenie. Lol 
Everyone has become so nice here in Rome and the tournament Director is amazing. I will be here next year for sure. 
Everyone. I'm soooo sad and sorry I had to pull out of what has become my favorite tournament in Rome. 
Hey!!!#serenafriday has been postponed until next week. I have been playing the last two Fridays and need a break. I miss everyone! Kisses 
Don't miss today! I'm chatting with about all things tennis! Here's a preview clip… 
I'm excited to announce my appearance on is airing Today Thursday!! For when to watch click here... 
2day was a long match for me. I burned 3521 fuel points. I reach my goal of 5000 fuel points everyday! #nikefuel 
In case you missed it. #CoverGirl  
Vogue behind the scenes cover shoot Check this out  
It was my dad. :) love u daddy. 
My phone rang today. I was like What??!! It never rings. #randomthought 
Classic pose straight from 1985  
Me and my mama. After match.  
Once again- tournament win= pageant pose  
I love dancing.  
Thumbs up... :) RT “@pmouratoglou: Respect.” 
ha my loss to U motivated me! RT “@piersmorgan: Glad to see you're back winning again, after your unfortunate loss to me...” 
your pics are amazing. I'm looking for you! Email me! 
Ok everyone. Thanks for all the support and tweets. I'm happy to be healthy! Big smile. I'll be posting pics all day so stay tuned!! 
lol. Thanks. RT“@Damarri_Brown: CONGRATS ON YOUR WIN!!!! #TeamSerena #TeamWilliams  
Open the past and present now and we are there. Story to tell and I am listening. Open the present and the future too. Its all I got. 
My dog Lauerlei is doing her gangsta face. So cute  
1:30 tennis match, 4pm press; 5pm design meeting for Serena signature statement 6pm massage; 730meet for fabrics. #All inAdaysWork 
Dear I hate you. Lol 
Every time the phone rings.... I pray to God it's you 
Madrid. My dog Jackie and I riding bikes. She made me do all the work  
Of course my room in the hotel is the only one in which the air dosent work. #life 
My Statement Rally Dress for Paris.  High-performance style in motion.  
I'm convinced is the funniest guy in this galaxy. 
text me that monroe quote!! DM me. 
hahahahahahha RT “@BigSascha: Dear son of a b**** who stole my wallet out of my racket bag. If i catch you kiss your knees good bye...” 
This is my favorite picture of me... Do you like?  
My fellow tennis player Fernando Verdasco had me cracking up in the player gym today. He's a MUST follow! Follow him!! RT 
#teamSerena  
Carpet shopping. I've decided on this one...  
Trying to find the perfect pillow.  
Currently taking a sleep sheet #sleepsheet as I need to sleep. Its almost 1am in Madrid. Thank goodness for sleep sheets! Goodnight! 
Its already done 
ahhh u got it :) RT“@matungoe: *Whitney Houston tune* RT I must face it on my own.” 
I must face it on my own. 
u are so silly! Glad things worked out for u know who and his wife. Wish I were so lucky. 
Lol. Ok babes. :) RT would you say hello to me next time? #serenafriday 
 
PIERS MORGAN TONIGHT will air this evening, Friday, May 4th, at 9:00pm ET/PT on CNN 
So tonight my new Instant Cooling Towel will debut on at 11:30pm EST tonight!  Tune in! #EnduraCool #ItWillSellOUT   
not you! RT “@Rickonia: who would win between me and you in ping pong? #serenafriday” 
yes. RT“@BigSascha: Will you let me shoot a bottle of your head? #serenafriday” 
yes. If u behave. RT“@BigSascha: Am i going to the Olympics withy you?? #Serenafriday” 
Yes actually. RT have u ever taken a Spin class? #serenafriday 
No. U have to stay with Mommie RT theese is lora... Kan I estay whith unty val 2 nyte? #serenafriday 
Lol really? Clay :) RT does the blue clay play like a hard court or clay court? #SerenaFirday 
A Jack Russell RT what's your favourite sort of dog? #serenafriday 
An action movie :) RT What kind of film would you like to star in? #serenafriday 
Ohh tough one... Hulk or Thor RT who is your most fave character in the avengers movie? #serenafriday 
Yes. That would be amaz RT you wanna go into movie industry? 
Egypt RT what's that one place/city where you've always wanted to (cont)  
Ben 10 RT what is your favorite series to watch every week? #southamericafan #serenafriday 
Yes RT ever been to the Kentucky Derby? #serenafriday 
Blue clay is fine. I could play on ice if necessary. RT Are we getting (cont)  
Heels RT Are you a high heels or flat shoes girl? :) xx #serenafriday 
probably my old friend Jovan lol RT Who is your favorite hitting partner? #serenafriday 
Yes. That's my dream! RT Will you consider appearing in a movie role soon? #Serenafriday 
That's mean RT I am ur fan, but I found that you lie for the sake of #serenafriday, don't (cont)  
My interview with Piers' airs tonight on  
Walk 30 mins a day and drink a gallon of water a day RT I need to lose 60lbs!! Any advice?? #serenafriday 
Probably RT do u think I can beat u n tennis #serenafriday 
Yes :) RT will you be playing at the Madrid open on the blue clay? Rooting for you #psiloveyou #serenafriday 
Hey guys its #serenafriday if u have a question ask me all day today- BUT you MUST add #serenafriday to your question and I will answer it! 
Is this my practice court at the Madrid open. Or is it my childhood practice court in Compton? Which one?  
I am Serena Williams. #makeupfree
#Questions 
  
I'm so proud of you!!!! :) RT Soooooo cool...  
Oops guys never mind I'm a day ahead lol. Soorrrry 
Tomorrow is #serenafriday hope u have questions ready! 
In airport. I am wearing serena signature statement and I'm so comfy! I love it so happy!! 
was amazing tonight I'm buying his song on itunes! Vote for him!! #thevoice GO GO GO!!!!!! RT!! 
Life 
looks like I'm #winning RT“@piersmorgan: Game. On. #BattleOfTheSexes #CNN  
Had the best interview with thanks so much. I loved your questions. #serenafriday 
Times square walgreens here I come! :) who's there? 
Lots of people are asking about #SleepSheets! To find out more check out  
Finally, my new natural sleep aid, #SleepSheets are now available Place on your tongue...#SleepBetter 
noooo not at all cause it's natural!! :) RT“@hls22: do sleep sheets make u feel groggy in the morning? #SerenaFrday” 
Oh boy those r fighting words.. RT I'm taking you down today ain't no Bobby Riggs. #CNN #BattleOfTheSexes. 
Everyone keeps asking me what Sleep Sheets are- Sheep Sheets are a paper thin dissolvable strips placed on your tongue that helps u sleep. 
It helps you sleep. It's all natural and avail at walgreens. RT“@jets418: #serenafriday what are sleep sheets?” 
I'm serious I use sleep sheets when I can't sleep! RT “@Kajauana: How do u get a good nights sleep with your busy schedule? 
It nottt RT #Serenafriday why is your body so perfect?????????????? 
yes a certified klutz #serenafriday RT“@veetocrack: didn't know u were a klutz..LOL” 
aw tks RT “@anique27: are u aware of what an awesome role model you are??? How does it feel to be so awesome? #serenafriday” 
Guys it is #serenafriday so ask questions and add #serenafriday to them and I will answer. Let's talk #sleepsheets 
#sleepsheets 
I can make all the stadiums rock. But I'm never gonna make it without you... 
I am excited for tomorrow! Can’t wait to finally tell you about my secret to a good night’s sleep! 
Great mission event tonight. Loved working out with everyone! Yeaaa 
I'm so excited about this new product my new company is launching.  Check it out    
In nike town in NYC its a zoo in here!!! Got some super cool stuff for my event tonight! #sexy #nikewomen 
I can't wait for my launch event 2night at with to unveil amazing new product from   
is back on June 3rd, Sunday nights at 9p on Lifetime :) 
Next stop for me and NYC let's go buddy! 
amen RT“@4everBrandy: Brandom: Hatred for others is HIDDEN HATRED for yourself!” 
I'm on set having fun amaz 
On set of with I can't wait to start shooting our scenes! Should be fun OMG so excited!!! 
hardest worker in the biz. Never stop RT “@BigSascha: 6am got hair and make up!! Hardest working women I know....” 
Sunglasses hides eyes in pain 
YESS I reach my goal with my Nike Fuel Band #nikefuelband my goal is 5000 I got 5369 #Nike  
my home how long ru there?? Must do dinner!!! 
wait ru serious? RT “@EvanLysacek: I'm on my way to Palm Beach, Tomorrow I start training at my favorite rink... #PalmBeachIceWorks.” 
But it's ok...Because it's France! RT “@pmouratoglou: The academy during those days unusual strange troubled weather.  
And Liesel how il oils I forget my fav??? 
ME grow up??? Ha #joke RT “@sloanetweets: aww!! precious :) by far the best week ever. you're amaz! grow up!” 
I'm having the best time here with and and Jamie. :) love it 
lol ok. Y ru awake?? “@PrakashAmritraj: Time to go H.A.M.!! Good luck today! Bust out the inside out lefty forehand...” 
Tks for participating in #serenafriday I am of to sleep. Love u all xx S 
I just took a sleep sheets because I have to go to sleep now and wake up for my match Tomm in the Ukraine. Let's go!! 
I have a question for everyone #serenafriday any suggestions on what I should give my niece for her graduation gift? Must be a better aunt 
lol I got robbed!!! Lol 
I will never date again is what I mean RT “@KeithOneal1: if you don't "date" what exactly do you do? #SerenaFriday” 
tks :) RT“@franceskarla: #serenafriday you're one of the best tennis players and a great role model!” 
actually u do RT “@WonderBoyAnik: Do you like Backstreet Boys? #serenafriday” 
I can't answer them all!!!!!!!! Im trying every week!!! 
be patient RT “@MohHesham95: Will I ever get a reply? #SerenaFriday” 
yes check it out now at  RT“@JW_Peacock: will you make a clothing brand like your sister #serenafriday” 
Ao RT“@PolishHeartbeat: #serenafriday Australian Open or US Open?” 
actually I have.. RT “@EimearMcManus93: #serenafriday have you ever been over here to Ireland?? #LuckOfTheIrish” 
football RT“@ezekielmendoza: Excited on ur game later (Fed Cup). What's ur favorite sports besides tennis? #serenafriday” 
not soon enuf RT“@0try: after fed cup this weekend, when`re you back in europe? #serenafriday” 
I don't date RT “@oceanwaterent: would you go out on a date if I sent u a pic?” 
I'd like to play an 80's character called Ted RT“@PlanetOlivia: what was your favorite role to play on tv? #serenafriday” 
RT“@EmiRoze: who out of the tennis players on tour are you the most friendly with? #serenafriday” 
I think I should RT“@hBencee: Are u gonna visit Hungary? #SerenaFriday” 
"life" best quote ever RT“@kaybudie: wots your favorite quote and why??#serena friday#” 
When I got my License ET“@jdquid: ..what's ur most unforgettable moment? #serenafriday” 
Ok guys I'm back. #serenafriday 
I'm gonna donate are you guys? Meet Venus and Eli Maning RT“@Venuseswilliams:  
I'm about to go work out. Let's resume #serenafriday later. Kisses 
I don't have one. RT“@PolishHeartbeat: #serenafriday what's your favourite movie?” 
at our place?? Lol u know the banana and flour place? 
loved it! RT “@juanfermc: Hi ! When you came to Medellin in 2011, did you like the city? #serenafriday” 
lol prob sleeping. RT “@Mehluli_Vic: If you didn't play tennis what will you be doing?#serenafriday” 
I am in Europe RT “@ace111mph: What r u doing up so early? #serenafriday” 
hummm that would be nice. RT “@RainerAbraham: would you visit Indonesia?:) #serenafriday” 
answering your questions RT “@zinny_pnd: what are you doin at the moment? #serenafriday” 
the spa! So Amaz! RT “@_william_____: what's your favourite thing about Kharkiv so far? #serenafriday” 
I'd say Aussie open RT“@MarleneArw: Which tournament is your favourite to attend ? :D #SerenaFriday” 
hugging u now RT “@davidootweets: can i have a virtual hug?(-: #serenafriday” 
omg I was so happy RT“@KenanJPetersen: how did you feel when you won your first grand slam! #serenafriday!” 
only tennis. RT “@camilletastic: Aside from tennis, what other sports do you play? #serenafriday” 
I'm not a drinker. 
Add #serenafriday to your questions and I will answer them. 
It's #serenafriday guys! Who has questions?? :) 
Tomorrow is #serenafriday I will answer your questions all day Tomm if u add #serenafriday to your tweets! RT! 
Everybody deserves a 2ed chance. 
I've turned my seat into looking just like my bedroom! Looks like I'm gonna be comfy for the next 11 hrs...  
Ummm actually he's my Fav. I already follow him!! :) I love all the contestants! RT (cont)  
For the life of my I can't figure out how people did not know that Prince Adam and He-man were the same person. 
Fairy tales? Happy endings? The prince? Yea right 
Oops sorry west coast. Sorry. 
I'm not sure if I'm gonna watch #thevoice anymore after that elimination. redic. Just redic. 
I mean did Jessie really get eliminated?? For real??? Was it a forced decision??? 
What a weekend... Family... Friends..Laughter... And the Williams Invitational. I can't wait for next year! But now- back to work... 
I am one of a kind 
My look fir last night hope I get best dressed! U think? #geek  
Williams invitational 80's tennis #bestoutfit  
Today is the day. Williams Invitational 3rd annual. Oh yea. Oh yea. Lots of pics today everyone.... 
Mad dash to the finish line for the Williams invitational... 80's party!! 
Oh no..... Food poisoning. :( well at least its and instant 3 to 5 pound loss. #positivethinking #glasshalffull Life. 
I hope ill smile again 
I can't wait to see my girl on for her #ybl jewelry collection 9-11 pm EST be sure to watch!! #HSN 
Stay busy. Don't think. 
What's this I hear about 3 green day albums coming out?? 
lol “@VernonDavis85: check it out & let Serena know wat u think! RT 80's week.Getting in the spirit.  
80's week. I'm really Getting in the spirit.  
Life 
:( 
awww I love u. I need u now!! :( RT “@lorenridinger: Remember called 4!my 1st debut! Awe:) #love  
Dismal. Dire. 
Wow watching #thevoice has me all pumped to go to karaoke tonight!! I'm out! #teamserena 
I'm not sure if I won a tournament or pageant. #ToePointQueen  
life RT“@VALgabond: You can't always get what you want, but if you try sometimes you just might find you get what you need.” 
And the thunder rolls!!!! RT“@adamlevine: 2 million followers? What are you people thinking? :) #THANKYOU!!!” 
I miss YOU!!!!!!!! 
I can't wait for #thevoice tonight!!!!!!!! I LOVE this show! I gotta record it! 
I think we should!! RT“@WilsonTennis: Should we give away a Wilson Blade Team tennis racket to celebrate win today?” 
:) tkssss RT“@MauriceEdu: congrats!!!” 
What a great day I had yesterday! My #40 title!! So excited! Anyways join me TODAY at 11am to 1pm on HSN, 3pm to 5pm, 9pm to 11pm!! Retweet! 
Hey everyone I'm about to be Live on HSN at Midnight east coast time!! Tune in the new stuff is amaz!!! 
I won my 40th title today! And now I'm off to for my new collection! Watch me live at Midnight and all day tomm! Retweet! 
Thanks everyone for the support this week at the it was an amazing week. I love u all xx S 
Did u guys know that one time came to practice without underwear. Yes I think that was rude... 
I love u more RT“@psloveejustus: i love you !” 
gotta get you through college baby girl. :) RT“@psloveejustus: btw 6-1 6-1 ? our and Auntie Vee are the best !” 
lol ha! RT“@psloveejustus: lol sorry !” 
Tks baby girl!!!! RT“@ciara: YESSSSS!! GOOO W-I-N ! GET IT BOO!!” 
lol 
ummm excuse me miss your profile pic is doing too much. Please lower the sex appeal. Your Aunt Serena #YouHaventGraudratedYet 
#MakeItcount RT“@niketennis: In the zone. Into the finals. playing one of her best career matches. #counts” 
Ok everyone here it is my new #nikefree advantage trainer ad! Check it. Let me know what you think.  
I have to warn you m new #nikefree advantage trainer add is super funny. If I get enough retweets I will post it before my match! #Nike 
Who wants to see the new #Nikefree Advantage trainer online add with me in it? Come on let me know! RETWEET this if u want to see it! 
Hey everyone it is late and I have to play tomorrow.. So I'm going to bed. I hope u all enjoyed #serenafriday love u guys. Goodnight kisses 
You for sure! RT If you could do a duet with anyone who would it be?#serenafriday 
None... Yet... RT What website are you shopping on now while you're tweeting :)) #serenafriday 
What's ur question? RT Will at finally see me and my question? :) #serenafriday 
Awwww u are so sweet... But I'm still done RT You give up???? Hell no!! The Serena I love does not give up!!! 
Love u back! RT what do you prefer pool or gym? #serenafriday 
Def heels! RT tennis shoes or heels? How many do you have #serenafriday 
Oh yes. I love RT are you excited for Justin's new album #BELIEVE?:) #serenafriday Xx 
Omg that would be soo amaz! RT what do you think of (cont)  
Lol ok RT #serenafriday can i be your gay bestfriend? 
Love!!!! RT Do you like U2? You're awesome!! <3 #serenafriday 
:) RT We want #SERENAEVERYDAY 
U can't do that RT #serenafriday if you had a chance to turn back the hands of time,what would you do it for? 
No I quit and gave up. RT What? Engaged? RT I'm done dating. RT (cont)  
I gotta go with Sampras and Aggasi!! RT #serenafriday in volley shots, (cont)  
Want some serena advise for #serenafriday check this out  
Wahooo RT But now it's time to shop for my 80's outfit. Competition ON!!! (cont)  
Good tks for asking RT hello #serenafriday. How was ur day 2day? 
I'm done dating. RT #serenafriday Would you ever date a regular guy? 
U should be taking me! RT #serenafriday fancy taking me for a beer when you're over here for Wimbledon 
Because I am addicted to online shopping and I was bored #help RT I (cont)  
Ohhh so many I can't count! I love RT how many times have you seen Green Day live? #serenafriday 
Cause its dirt, and its ment to stick so we can slide better :) RT why does (cont)  
I have it set on 5000 fuel points! :) RT What do you set your Nike+ (cont)  
Ok guys its still #serenafriday add #serenafriday to your questions and ill answer them starting now!! Let's go! 
Hummm never say never but I don't ballroom dance.. RT you love (cont)  
agree!! Lol haha RT “@jsmoll: Young boys shouldn't play in sand boxes they don't deserve to play in!!!! PC Security rules!” 
Actually I won't have to face her. The toughest for me in all of tennis! RT Venus goes (cont)  
Ok guys sorry I have been busy for #serenafriday but go ahead and ask your questions! Its #serenafriday !! 
Today I burned 4127 fuel points on my fuel band. was forced to retire. Hope she gets better soon! I love my fuel band 
.... And no I am not going camping.... 
Not soon :( vacy in fla!! RT haha!!! When are you back!! We need a girls night 
I can tell I am addicted to online shopping because I just ordered a tent and sleeping bags. 
I'm Happy I won today. Thanks you guys for all the support. 
Today on my fuel band I burned 3604 fuel points and took 8346 steps in my match!So cool I can follow what I'm doing with my fuel band! 
go Vee!!! RT“@dougrobson: Venus keeps it going  
My NEW workout mix just hit itunes on the Fitness & workout page-if you want to have a great fun workout download it!!  
How can u stop the rain from falling down? 
How can you mend a broken heart? 
Kisses Bella. RT“@dhyanibella: CONGRATS #1 lady!” 
Thank youuu RT“@Damarri_Brown: Congrats to on her WIN this evening!! #FamilyCircleCup” 
2 gals karaokeing "don't speak"   
Thanks guys for the support today. Did u all see me wearing my fuel band?? I burned 3,723 fuel points in my match. Super cool! 
Do "Dear John" letters come in the form of a text?? 
lol. I need to smile. :( 
lol wow just wow RT“@BigSascha: Everybody please tell she has to send that txt message... PLEASE!!!” 
Ouch. That stung. 
baby girl u look fab on #thevoice love it!!! 
I like Pink. I get crushes. I'm scared of bugs. I am sensitive. I cry. I'm just a girl. I have feelings too. 
Why oh why am I so in love with you dear Mr. Moon Pie?  
There is a moon pie store here.... I have a moon pie addiction... Ummm I need a restraining order... 
The walls where I am staying at are sooo thin... I'm SURE I heard the dude in the room next to me pass gas. Yuck 
South Carolina. My maj weakness for southern food... Ugh. I gotta be strong... 
It must have been love, but its over now... It was all that I wanted but I'm living without. 
This is harder than I thought.  
Burying at the beach. Fun times  
Dancing makes everything ok. #DanceLover 
My new bag for so pretty!  
Georg! RT Wearing a beautiful white off shoulder knit cardigan w/a long royal blue (cont)  
Why do I always feel like eating fried chicken #ThingsIcantHave 
Dear I just got crazy killer wild pants for the Williams invitational. Hope u are ready!! 
Guess what today is?!! #serenafriday 
Check out my friend Lara Shriftman's exclusive sale on 1 Kings Lane beginning Friday, March 30th at (cont)  
Beach bum  
Lol I love organizing!! RT Here's what happens when Serena come to the Nike house...we put her to work!  
Have u ever seen cuter tennis shoes?? Can't wait to wear them!!  
Its official I've relapsed. Hi I'm Serena Williams and I'm an addicted online shopper. 
I wonder if the smurfs exist... If so I'd love to spend some time in the Smurf Village 
yes. Winner for sure. Do it! Do it!!! 
I just have been told in a round about way that I'm a sociopath . . . #couldbetrue 
I'm so proud of u are amazing. Now as proud as I am my outfit for the Williams Invitation is looking bananas! #hereIcome 
Oh and how could I forget 
and anyone else attending the Williams Invitational... Part of my costume arrived... Its on.... 
In players lounge watching say hi to some fans. Novak is so nice, and sweet I'm honored to be in the same sport as he! Go Nole! 
We all have issues. lol ha! 
My dog is having nightmares should I wake her? She's shaking lol 
What is done is done and it cannot be undone. To bed, to bed. 
Flake. Ugh 
Hey!!! I need some inspiration, so design a pair of Nike Free Run iD shoes for me with 
Ohhhh mannnn get it get it! RT Whats up S-Dot???!!!! I will be in town in april! Lets get it in asap! 
Clifford RT #serenafriday what movie makes u laugh no matter how many times u see it? 
Lol I knowwww RT #serenafriday can you hurry up and wear another catsuit please! 
So many goals and yes ill be there God willing! RT what are your (cont)  
The dolphins, and the heat! RT #serenafriday what's your favorite team in the nba and nfl? 
Yes!!! Stay tuned!!! RT #serenafriday will u & V be playing doubles again soon :) 
Never quit never let anything bring u down RT your sister Venus played (cont)  
The avatar last air bender RT #serenafriday what's ur favourite animation 
It's #serenafriday everyone! Add #serenafriday to your questions and I will answer them ! Let's go!! RT!!! 
Yeaaa can't waiiiiit :) RT ur gonna get a ride in it all the time when I move out there in august 
I wanna ride!!! RT #WantAnR8 Here is my baby  
Thank you guys for all the support!!! Love u guys! Xx S 
:) RT“@Venuseswilliams: aww thanks lil sis, I love you even more!” 
Congrats to my sister she played amaz today. It shows everyone that's going (cont)  
What happens to Tim Tebow??? 
Manning goes to the Broncos? Wow John Elway must be magic!!! Well he was! 
The voice the voice the voice #TheVoice I'm obsessed can't wait!!! 
Kid sister strikes again with lol #JokeySmurf 
ur pic is so beautiful girlie!!! 
I miss him 
Thank you for participating in #serenafriday I will see you next friday!!! Muahhhh love you guys!!! Xx S 
Yes cause I love talking to u guys. I just wish I could get to everyone but I can't :( RT (cont)  
Heeeeeeeeeeyyyyyyy RT helllllllooooo! #serenafriday 
Lol I'm trying to get adopted myself!!! :) RT can you adopt me? Please ^_^ #serenafriday 
No? :) RT do you realize how amazing you are? #serenafriday 
I would be my own RT If u could b any superhero who would u b #serenafriday 
Animation. Surprised? RT which is your favorite type of movie #serenafriday 
Good question I like to laugh and relax with someone I love RT What makes you happy? #serenafriday 
I can't get to them all.. I'm trying RT how come you never anwser my questions??? #Serenafriday 
Just chill RT whats your mindset before a big match #serenafriday 
Right now? Racks by YC RT What's your favorite song to sing at karaoke? #serenafriday 
Any island RT What's your favorite vacation spot #serenafriday 
I've never been maybe one day RT will you visit the Philippines? #serenafriday 
I hate eating bfast. But its so impt RT what do you like for breakfast I like muesli #serenafriday 
Pete Sampras RT“@Cree_CF: Who were some of your favorite tennis players growing up? #serenafriday” 
yes I love France RT“@Byinette: We'll you be in France this year ! want to see you play ! #Serenafriday” 
Water :) RT“@ramoniee: What's your fav drink when U go out? #serenafriday” 
I just karaoke private dancer last night. RT “@AdamDawson01: Hi Serena do you like any Tina Turner songs #serenafriday” 
I plan on playing. I hope so. 
Guys its #serenafriday what's up. Text #serenafriday to all our questions and I will answer them! 
Yeaaaaa it's #TheVoice time!!!!!!! Yahoooooo 
I really hate hearing from you.... 
how did tennis go? 
Tks guys for your #serenafriday questions. Next Friday join in!!! :) 
I'm karaoking now all by myself. #pathetic RT where u been hiding??? Miss my karaoke sista! :-) 
Oh wow look what I found. How young is and Biggie. Biggie 4 life  
At the GSSI camp. Reaction drill check my reaction.  
Set fire to the rain? Is that what its called? RT Favorite Adele song? #SerenaFriday 
Where would we go? RT can I take you on a date #serenafriday 
Its #serenafriday. Add #serenafriday to any questions u have for me and ill answer them. Don't forget to add #serenafriday to get answers! 
Hang in there!!! There will be others. RT have u ever had ur heart ripped in two.I need some advice Serena. 
before you RT “@IamRRA: When are you getting married? Just curious! LOL.” 
RT who ur fav rapper?? 
Lol I love it RT #serenafriday don't you think Serena is such an amazing name? :D 
From the sanrieo store :) love it RT Where did you get your Hello Kitty backpack? :-) #SerenaFriday 
Hey guys! I love u all RT can you say Hi to your fans in Indonesia? :) please.. #serenafriday 
I want to! RT Do u watch bollywood movies whose ur favourite movie #serenafriday 
Yessss :) RT #serenafriday Are you playing in Miami? I want to see you #stalkermodeon #kidding hehe 
Actually next week RT I miss watching tennis because I don't get to (cont)  
:) RT #serenafriday.i like u do u like me back? 
Aussie is my fav RT why do all players say Wimbledon is the best slam?? 
Opi Gels- see RT also, what's your favorite nail color for the spring? #SerenaFriday 
Stay healthy and play. RT what do you think you are not doing right (cont)  
Have fun!! RT could I get a reply / RT for my lil sis....she loves you (cont)  
I hope one day RT it's my fourth friday trying to get an answer from (cont)  
No I save them so I can watch it all at once :) RT are you caught up on DH? #serenafriday 
Not anymore RT are a coffee drinker? #SerenaFriday 
The way I sing- I hope Never! Lol RT When is your karaoke video coming out? (: #serenafriday 
Venus!!! RT Who is your all time favorite tennis player (Male or female)? #serenafriday 
I don't understand this :( RT  
Come on- all the ones :) RT Your best concert? #serenafriday 
No. But honestly I would LOVE to! RT have you ever visited Scotland? And would you ever? 
Gotcha! RT never tweets me bk #serenafriday 
Yes! Love it RT Do you watch soccer? #serenafriday 
My dancing RT What's a special talent that you have that no one would (cont)  
Love Moscow! So pretty. Amaz city RT Have u been to Russia,Moscow?If yes,did u like our city?) #serenafriday 
Both. Than I don't have to choose RT Would you prefer to win the (cont)  
"If your not first your last". Ricky Bobby RT What is your favorite quote? #serenafriday 
Ummm I like dancing RT #serenafriday do you actively engage in other sports for leisure? 
Neither RT #serenefriday Cheese Cake or Chocolate Cake? 
Hey you!!! Yes ill be there. :) RT ANERES! are u playing Sony (cont)  
Omg I just ate Grits just now!!! LOL Love! RT have you ever had grits ? #SerenaFriday cc:@JKrautter 
I hope really soon! RT When are u gonna act in a movie next time? #serenafriday 
Cherry sours! So bad for u!! :( RT what's the best thing you've eaten all week? #serenafriday 
U can't relive moments no matter how hard u try. RT if you could (cont)  
I don't do push ups RT How many push ups can you do in one minute? #serenafriday 
Venus RT Who's a difficult match everytime you play them at tennis? #Serenafriday# 
Yes! I can't wait! RT R u playing in Miami? Greeting here from Paragauy :) #SerenaFriday 
The beach!! RT Where is the best place to visit in Florida? #Serenafriday 
Yes! S.A, Ghana, Kenya and many more... RT have you ever been to Africa? If so, where? #serenafriday 
Hummm Aussie Open 2003. My fourth Major in a row RT #serenafriday best grand slam victory? 
Hummm its no secret I Love Paris RT #serenafriday what is your (cont)  
stuff. Excited!! RT“@Ennielink: #serenafriday, what's happening today?” 
I'm not food yet... RT “@Amit_7: how did you get so good at tennis? #serenafriday” 
sometimes. does all the time RT #serenafriday Do you watch American Idol?” 
sometimes. does all the time RT #serenafriday Do you watch American Idol?” 
Its #serenafriday. Add #serenafriday to any questions u have for me and ill answer them. Don't forget to add #serenafriday to get answers! 
My new team off da court will make sure that u keep a grip on da court. Check it (cont)  
Guys tomorrow is #serenafriday ask me any questions you want on #serenafriday and ill try to answer them! Yea can't wait to see what u ask! 
Dear Pimple and family- I really don't like you. I'd appreciate it if u stayed out of my life. Please leave my forehead I'd appreciate it. 
All I want is 
Ohhh man I know!!! RT“ IW fans are brutal... ask #thewilliamssisters 
thank you so much. I owe you... Be safe!!! Love you. 
I just got into How I met your Mother... Great show. 
demanded that I Shut up today. We no longer speak. #BGA 
hey! RT“@suzpond: I voted for you!” 
Don't forget to vote for me for a 2012 Kids' Choice Award using #FavFemaleAthlete #SerenaWilliams #KCA! 
A lot of people ask me what my weakness in tennis is. I always say I don't have one. But now I know what it is. It's Sour Cherries 
I'm sad I missed u in palm beach. 
Awww I LOVE Kelly Clarkson!!! #thevoice 
Rushing to grab something to eat because the Voice comes on... I LOVE this show! Can't wait! Love as the host!! 
is back. And I am loving it. Ummmm yea I'm loving it....  
60 degrees in Florida is a lot colder than 60 degrees in New York 
Home sweet home. 
I hate panty lines. I have them myself now. Ugh. 
Hanging out after training  
I love u 
OMG Grosssssssss!!!! was desperate and used my tissue to blow his nose!!! Hahahhaha OMG grosss 
Tks 4 all your #serenafriday questions. I can't wait for next Friday. I didn't get 2 answer many 2day but let's do it again. I love u guys! 
Watching Hell on wheels with great show. Can't wait for the 2ed season 
Fun times! RT Watching reruns with dear (cont)  
North Carolina RT if you could be anywhere right now where would it be? :) #serenafriday 
For wimbledon!! RT when will you next be in the UK!?? #SerenaFriday 
I believe luck is when opportunity meets preparation. I hope u guys prepared. :) RT (cont)  
Never is in denial RT Can really beat you in tennis? He claims he can lol #serenafriday 
Tennis is the only sport I play RT Aside from tennis, what's your favorite sport to play? #serenafriday 
Dance! RT wat u haven't done yet dat u want to do? #serenafriday 
Drink lots of water!! RT What Are Your Best Beauty Secrets? #serenafriday 
Ill try :) RT Can you use some more in some funny trick shot videos again? #serenafriday 
Soon baby in Miami!! RT Ooooohhhh we gotta work on that 4 our next karoke night! U (cont)  
I can't say RT what is the craziest thing you have had to sign when fans ask for an autograph? #serenafriday 
Sorry guys I've been driving/working all day I can't answer #serenafriday questions while driving!!! Ok here I go ill try to answer a few 
With Suzie at giving her a mani! Perf! Relaxing day :)  
#serenafriday has arrived add #serenafriday to your question for me to answer! 
Tomorrow is #serenafriday get your questions ready 
Omg I am doing Suzie founder of OPI Nail polish tomorrow :) I am soooooo excited. Ill be giving her Gel manicure!!! :) 
signed me Sasha Val up for a break dancing class!!! I can't wait! 
Look who I spotted on my court. lol 
Had so much fun at NIKE today I even got to visit with this puppy. I love my Mike Family. Can't wait to get on the courts and #makeitcount 
#nikeplus #Makeitcount Nike Rocks!!!! :) 
Congrats to Meredith Theis! Way to #makeeverymovecount with me in the #NTC by earning2626 NikeFuel 
Congrats to Meredith Theis! Way to #makeitcount with me in the #NTC by earning2626 NikeFuel 
I'm leading an exclusive workout session with at Nike WHQ. Join me: choose a routine and go earn your #nikefuel 
Just arrived at Nike World Headquarters to visit the tennis crew. Follow to see what I am up to today 
Best night ever 
OMG congrats to Undefeated for winning best Documentary. I'm so Proud of u guys!! YOU DID IT!!!!! #undefeated 
U can't believe how tired I am 
Have u guys seen Diggy's new video with Jadakiss for his new song "88" so awesome! --  
Having the best night with@BigSascha so random! Hope we can chill tomm!!!!! 
Oh boy... RT“@common: LOL! He's gonna pay 4 that! RT Damn you ain't have to block od like that lmao” 
Yes. In Kenya :) RT r u planning on opening another school, if so where this time? #serenafriday 
OMG I just saw my compton idol at the track. Dr. Dre. I LOVE him. Legend!!!! 
No RT do you believe in true love? #serenafriday 
Yea... Dude where ru? What happened to u? RT u with Nike right ? 
Ariel RT favorite disney character? #serenafriday 
"I loves Harpo Lord knows I do..." RT what is your favorite movie quote? 
Just like a prayer RT Favourite Madonna's song? :) #serenafriday 
Paris RT favorite city in the world? #serenafriday 
Monster my Kanye West RT What do u listen to b4 every match that pumps u up? #SerenaFriday 
Former addict RT is it true that you are addicted to online shopping?? #serenafriday 
Round of applause lol ha RT favourite song atm?? :O #serenafriday 
Love! RT do you like sushi? #serenafriday 
Street fighter! :) RT What was your favorite video game as a kid? #serenafriday Thank You 
Both but add relish RT what's better on a hot dog? Ketchup or Mustard? #serenafriday 
A veterinarian RT What did you want to become when you were a child? #serenafriday 
Dogs RT whats your favorite animal? (: #serenafriday 
Miami :) RT What's your next tournament ? #Soexcited 
Football and soccer RT What other sports do you like other than tennis? #serenafriday 
Yes for sure! RT Do you plan on playing doubles with Venus sometime again? Olympics? #serenafriday 
No thanks RT do you want a worm taco? #serenafriday 
Jesus of Suburbia RT Favourite Green Day song? #serenafriday 
I don't know. They die. Like mine RT Where do broken hearts go? #serenafriday 
Just as much as I want to win any other slam RT how much do you want to win another French Open? #serenafriday 
Anything Hostess makes RT hi serena... what's your favorite comfort food??? #serenafriday 
A Jack Russell Terror :) and a maltiese (I can't spell) RT What kind of dog do you have? #serenafriday 
White RT what is ur favorite color? #serenafriday 
I know. We r the worst! RT Mamacita we were both so bad lastnite!!! Must see you soon 
Peanut butter RT What's your favorite type of Cookie? #serenafriday 
Its #serenafriday guys! Add #serenafriday to your questions to get an reply. I can't answer them all but I will try. Go for it! Ask away!! 
#serenafriday is tomorrow! Its back guys get your questions ready!! 
Omg I Love the nerd look! :) RT Nerd  
I can't wait for this! RT Discussing the new album:  
Omg my new collection at is totally amazing. I can't wait. Ill be on air on April 9! Mark your calendars. 
Is there a 12 step program or rehab center for learning how to protect your heart? I know someone who needs to go.... 
Nice Guys Finish Last. 
I absolutely hate farts 
Can't wait! RT Hey twitterdolls! Khloe and Lamar coming up soon!! New episode on E! At 10p.m. So excited!!!! 
In the past 36hrs I've been blamed for: taking a lap top cord, stealing salsa, hiding bobby pins, and taking a phone. #MyTeamAlwaysBlamesMe 
Omg I almost ate this!!! Its a worm Taco. I def would have died. 100%  
Its 3:11 am 
I'm hopelessly devoted to..... Myself 
Call me!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
Tks for helping me today. I'm sorry I broke down. Thanks for being my shoulder and older brother. 
Ok at first I was happy for my friend Val That was short lived. Now she is already annoying. she's hugging everyone. Ugh 
Love seeing my friend so happy. 
he does! RT“@ogeedm8: guess I'll have to give you tips on how to seal the deal with women cause looks like you need help!!!” 
yes I agree. I love u Sascha RT“@Angelo4ro: What happen to tonight to not react u are truly respected !!!” 
OMG! How could I forget?? I'm so sorry!!!! :( RT I hear you're having a karaoke party without me?! :( 
OMG hahahhahahahahahahahhaahahahahhahahahah OMG ! LOL 
can't wait to see my girl on today 2-5am for her jewelry collection! 
#OneMomentInTime has propelled me to many of my grand slams victories. #whitneyhouston 
Wow just wow. This has ruined my whole day. #Iwillalwaysloveyou 
u in la? Let hit next week? RT“@JeffTarango: TMI haha, our dog does that in the car on road trips...ugh” 
My dog just made gas... I'm not sure why she did not say excuse me. She's very rude. 
Wow just wow congrats USA davis 
Its 3:11pm 
On my way to practice.... And forgot my rackets.... Wow 
#serenafriday will be next week. And once every 2 weeks! Get those questions together and get ready! 
Late night homework  
u looked stunning tonight! 
OOPs. On my last tweet.. lol act like a lady think like a man!!! Haahhahhahah LOL I clearly need more lessons 
Omg I LOVED that movie act like a man think like a woman!! My my MY!! Amaz! #MUSTSEE 
I'm so annoyed with myself. 
Ugh u guys make me sick! LOL RT Sometimes I look at my girl & just can't believe (cont)  
I'm not sure who has more "friends" or between the 2 of them they know everyone on this planet & this solar system! 
In bed... With a cold... Watching Spongebob Squarepants... Ahhhh relaxing 
wow what an honor. RT“@buymore1: i like youso much so that inamed my daugther after you” 
Make a wish 11:11 
YAHooooooooooooo ELI younger brothers Rock!!!!!!!!! 
YeaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaAaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa 
I'm in love with Madonna! 
Wow best halftime show ever!!! Wow Madonna! Wow 
I gotta go for the younger brother. What a game!! RT“@John_Wall: I got patriots buddy...u?RT who u got?” 
who u got? 
Isha is there!!! 
is everywhere G series! #winfromwithin 
SUPERBOWL!!! 
lol 
The life of a tennis player...  
I'm missing the family this week at #Superbowl but I'm at fed cup and I'm gonna #winfromwithin let's go! 
Thanks to for my new background. Keep em coming girl!!!! 
But be happy cause ur coming to see meeeeeeeee!!! :) RT Homework & Packing. My Saturday Nights 
Major foot in mouth... But since its over text what's that called? 
Very soon!! Don't u worry I have some things coming up very soon RT (cont)  
tks lol RT“@SkiviBaby: i was just about to beat in Top Spin 4 but i let her win coz its #serenafriday #realfan ha” 
haha yes!!!! Lol RT“@evothegreat: Can you do the worm? #dancemove #serenafriday” 
German RT“@TanekaJohnson: what foriegn language do u wish u spoke??
#serenafriday” 
Fridge RT #serenafriday do u keep ur ketchup in d fridge r d cupboard?? #serenafriday 
The avatar RT what was/is your favourite TV cartoon? #SerenaFriday 
No he's not good. RT Can beat u in tennis #serenafiday 
Of course RT April 7th is the memorial for us JW will u be attending?:-) #serenafiday 
Ok guys I'm back! Ask any question you want. Add #serenafriday on your questions if u want me to answer them! #serenafriday 
Please! ASAP :) RT I'll hold it down for you! Have to repeat Miami soo! 
RT Who is your favourite Desperate Housewives? #serenafriday 
5 9" RT #serenafriday How tall are you exactly? 
Tea RT coffee or tea? #serenafriday 
Never quit RT ok I give up, one last one for today. #serenafriday good morning, have a great day!!!! 
Just cheese RT #serenafriday your favourite pizza topping ?? 
Humm... So many good ones I don't know... RT #serenafriday What's you're favourite actor or actress? 
No love! I'm trying RT am i doing or saying something wrong that's why you're not (cont)  
OF course!!!! RT are you a belieber? #serenafriday 
Yes can't wait RT Are you excited to come to Mexico??? #serenafriday We're so excited to have you in Monterrey! 
Tks!!! RT Im not that into tennis but i love to watch play! #serenafriday 
Yes so much more! RT Do you plan on more acting in the future? Loved you on The Game. #serenafriday 
The color purple RT #serenafriday Movie that always makes you tear up? 
Football RT what's your favorite sport to watch (besides tennis)? #serenafriday 
Brasil RT what country haven't you been to that you want to go to? 
Dance by Big Sean, and Round of Applause RT which song you can not stop listening these days? #serenafriday 
Hey good morning!! RT Can u just get a hello and good morning? Love u bye!!! #serenafriday 
NEVER!! RT #serenafriday when do plan on retire? Bye the way I hope not soon cause I love to see you play 
France RT do you have a favourite country you like to go shopping? #serenafriday 
Jet lag! RT #serenafriday What are you doing up so early? Lol, have a nice day!!! 
I hope soon! RT when do you will come to Brazil? We love u!! #serenafriday 
So far so good RT so how are you today? #serenafriday i'm asking cos u never reply lol 
Australia RT favourite grand slam venue? #serenafriday xx 
Soon I hope RT #serenafriday hi Serena when u come 2 visit us in Israel ? 
Just your shots. RT #serenafriday , I have a tournament starting (cont)  
Lol wow RT #serenafriday Does a guy have to be high yellow to get a date with you? If not, wanna go out? 
Green Day of Course! RT favourite music artists? #serenafriday xxx 
:) loves!! RT my name is Serena and I digg #serenafridays 
Hummm Ghana? RT Last Friday I didn't Get My answer... Where would you Holiday most In Africa? #serenafriday 
When I'm in season 5 to 6 days a week RT How often do you work out? #serenafriday 
2010 RT most difficult year in your career? #serenafriday xxx 
Venus RT Who's your best tennis friend? #serenafriday 
The Motto YOLO !! RT #serenafriday whats your fav drake song? 
Pink RT what's your favourite colour??? #serenafriday 
So sad!!! RT No!! RT can it be? I'm told I'm not going 2 see u this weekend? Waaaaah!!! 
:( yea I know. I'm qualifying for olympics. Next time... RT (cont)  
#serenafriday is here guys. U must add #serenafriday to your questions for me to answer them. I can't answer them all so keep trying! 
Lol be ready homie! RT Now looking for a new tennis partner for the "Williams (cont)  
Wondering what you'd ever do if u went missing on yo a$$ 
Ugh I should be there miss u guys! RT Love my family!  
Round of Applause.... 
Helpful hints 
u da boss! RT“@hopesolo: I'm pretty sure I got stake in this game!” 
I miss hanging with u. U r the best!!! RT“@ryanlochte: Always a good day seeing my girl and pleasure meeting 
Miss u guys! RT“@MrsAdrienneBosh: Out for an evening w/ the ladies :)  
Fed cup team practice with Christina. This is so fun!  
Peyton I love you and hope u play soon. #WinFromWin #SBXLVI Serena 
Laser eye showdown  
Me and  
What a background  
I often wish I were just as aggressive off the tennis court as I am on... But it turns out I'm a certified chicken. 
Omg tips from ! Crazy 
I wonder is is smurfing right now.. 
I want to come!! RT When will you and get to (cont)  
Most def!! RT do u think Roger will win another GS? #serenafriday 
Yesssss love!!! RT have yo ever been n' mexico? #serenafriday 
Oh man I do ALL the time RT Why does say you hit (cont)  
Tks so much RT 140 characters it is not too much for saying u how much (cont)  
Yes question? RT can you please reply to me? :) #serenafriday. 
It was an accident I broke into your account. I'd never do that on purpose! RT (cont)  
Her backhand!! RT What is favorite shot from Venus?#serenafriday 
Don't let me be the last to know... RT what's ur fave Britney spears song? Xox #serenafriday 
Please stay out of my room... Its booby trapped! So ill know if u go in RT (cont)  
Yes u can drive my car. (Gosh what a needy sister I have) RT My care is out of (cont)  
Please stay out of my room RT You ran out of gumballs in your room, I guess I ate (cont)  
Ok I will ... Ugh RT You ran out of gumballs in your room, I guess I ate them (cont)  
lol scatagories RT “@Khyriealleyne: What board game brings the best laughs? Hint: Frankenstein, Lolz. #serenafriday” 
LOVE!!! go dolphins! RT“@SwasthikaM: do you like american football? #serenafriday” 
pink and Australia RT“@claireebbearr4: whats your favorite color and favorite place to play?! #serenafriday” 
Paris RT “@21AGM: what's your favorite city to visit? #Serenafriday” 
hey Serena!!! RT “@serena_rockz: It's #serenafriday My names Serena too.” 
lafy taffy RT“@TallPaulrMason: Everyone has a late night snack weakness, they just can't resist. What's yours?” 
sushi RT “@Official1DStaff: #serenafriday sushi or pasta?” 
actually yes I will be. RT“@kchris384: Will you b doing some acting anytime soon?” 
a decent cook I want to be good one day RT“@Coopdeville81: do consider yourself a good cook? #Serenafriday” 
lots of hip hop RT“@iamsixxcess: #serenafriday what's on your playlist gametime” 
green day kerplunk RT“@HCruickshanks: If you could listen to only 1 music album from now on what would it be? #serenafriday” 
His serve RT“@Jaca_federer: Which Roger's hit would you like to have? #serenafriday” 
I feel lonely without her :( RT Is it weird being on tour without this year? #serenafriday 
Ok guys #serenafriday is here. Add #serenafriday to your questions for me to answer them! :) here we go... 
No I haven't sounds nice though RT Have you ever been to okinawa Japan #serenafriday 
Fresh prince of Bel Air RT what's ya favorite 90's tv show? #serenafriday 
Her calm attitude RT if there was one thing u cud take from Venus' (cont)  
Yes check out HSN for my collection :) RT Are you still designing clothes and jewelry? #serenafriday 
No I want to... RT #serenafriday have you ever been to Scotland ? 
Round of applause :) RT #serenafriday wut's ya favorite song the moment ? 
Australia. I love it there!! RT where is your favorite place to go on tour? #serenafriday 
I'm gonna post on my new website... Coming soon! RT can i get some of your workout tips?#serenafriday 
Purple RT If you choke a smurf what colour will it turn? #serenafriday 
My fav city! RT #serenafriday have you really been in Paris these days ? We should have play together lol 
I need suggestions from you guys! Tell me when RT hey u happy Friday. When will we ustream again? #serenafriday 
Tuesday!! :) RT when are you coming back? #serenafriday 
Hey guys!! Its #serenafriday ask me anything u want. Add #serenafriday to your questions !! 
are you preparing for summer? 
u took that banana. I'm telling!! 
Paris is so romantic. Too bad I'm with ... Ugh 
me and just called you! Answer!!! 
Serena Friday is back!! This Friday all day post any question you have!!! #Serenafriday 
I ment where ru.... 
Bonjour. :) 
I’m successful by normal standards, but not those of #KobeSystem.  
I love you Australia. You totally rock!! 
A distraction from the distraction... 
Sorry for no #serenafriday we will return after the Australian open:) 
Awwwww that's sweet.... RT i LOVE my grandmother <3 how i miss her so ? 
Better is a revealed reproof than a concealed love. 
Oh no my dubs partner!!!!! :( 
500 wins? I Can't believe I did it. Really?? I am so happy and I appreciate all the love! Could not have done it without u all! Love u!! 
Lol love u back- and U go to sleep... RT go to SLEEP!!!! LOL love u mucho 
you are amazing!!! LOVE YOU!! Tks! 
hummmmmm never!  RT“@psloveejustus: so i heard was stretching the truth about me and beibs :/” 
Guys- Not main draw win not tournament win. Just my first match win ever. I think it was either in LA or Moscow. Now sure? Anyone? 
I need help guys.. I'm trying to figure out my first win ever on the professional wta tour. Any clues? I can't remember and have no idea... 
Day one #australianopen 
TEXT BOSH to 69622 for 2012 ALL STAR and vote for my pal 
I'm LOVING football today!!! #relaxing 
lol RT “@kmcme: “@serenawilliams: Oh my buddy u deserve this... Lol I'm in tears too lol. All love always”<~ Mee too!” 
Amaz!!!!! RT Wow! Alex Smith to Vernon Davis for the game! Reminds me of Jeff Garcia to T.O. vs the Packers some years ago 
Yeaaa #VernonDavis RT Vernon Davis salute! Cole World! T.O. flashbacks. It's been a long time for a 49er fan! 
#49ers 
Oh my buddy u deserve this... Lol I'm in tears too lol. All love always 
Noooooooooooo 
YESSSSS RT Wow!!! #49ers 
OHHHHHHH man!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Yahooooo let's go!!! #49ers 
Dang dang dang dang 
Yeaaaaa 49ers! Go !!! 
Yes I missed u :( RT heyyyy didnt see u around((( im at the hotel?do u stay at the same place as always? 
That's awesome!!!! Can't wait! RT Performing halftime at the 49er's Vs. The Saints Game Today!.. Should be fun can't wait!!. 
where ru!!??? 
Tks guys for your questions for #serenafriday can't wait for next friday!!! :) love u guys 
did u add #serenafriday? 
LOVE!!!!!!!!!!! RT Do you like de Mexican Food .?#serenafriday 
2003 and 2009 RT what is your favorite Australian Open winner (cont)  
Double major in business and health :) phewwww RT what are you majoring in??? #serenafriday 
Gatorade!! #winfromwithin RT what's your drink?? #serenafriday 
Dan is best Bow tie Brother ever. And no I don't like coconuts RT (cont)  
:) tk you RT Ur probably won't see this ... Plus u always know this but Serena your an ICON #SerenaFriday 
No. Although I would like to be? RT are you a vegetarian? #serenafriday 
Dancing :) RT wat exercise(aside tennis) gave u your TIGHT body? #serenafriday 
Hahaahaha actually u where there! Hahaha LOL RT what's the funniest date you've ever been on? #serenafriday 
Brasil RT where's one place you still haven't visited that you really want to? #serenafriday 
Desperate housewives Love that show!! RT favorite show on tv #serenafriday 
My biggest fear is frogs RT What's your biggest fear? #serenafriday 
No she's not. :( RT I asked u last night if Venus is with u at the moment #serenafriday 
Im still taking questions everyone! Add #serenafriday to your questions so I can answer them. 
Ok. Lol be back soon guys :) RT go2 sleep #SerenaFriday 
Hummmm... I don't know? Watching animation RT what is your guilty pleasure? #serenafriday 
Everyone Remember to add #serenafriday to your questions to get a reply. Its Late in Australia but keep your questions coming #serenafriday 
Her name is Venus Who, alive or dead, do you dream of playing doubles with? #serenafriday 
Lol u r so mean RT Hey you single or you dating somebody? 
I thought about it!!! I wanna RT Would you ever get beads back in your hair?! #serenafriday 
Lol yes. They are my special girls :) RT Wyatt wants to know if you miss Jackie & Laura. LOL #SerenaFriday 
Lol gross yuck! Lol RT Do u find attractive coz I think he is tooo cute for words.#serenafriday# 
No I'm terrible at it :( RT Do you play basketball?? #serenafriday 
LOVE my fav! Like adore it! RT do you love Melbourne? #serenafriday 
Oh goodness no!!!! RT #serenafriday Have u ever found a roach in your food from any restaurant 
No but I want to RT Have to ever been to Cape Town, South Africa? (cont)  
Yes OPI gels! RT I'm a Nail Lover too! Will you be opening a Nail Salon? & do you rock Gel Nails? #Serenafriday 
HSN and  RT where is your clothing line sold? #serenafriday 
Yes 2 more days! RT Are you ready for Australian open ?? 
Lol gotta practice right? Lol RT DO YOU BE MAKIN THAT ASS CLAP WHEN U AT HOME ALONE 
No I wish... RT can you speak spanish?? :) 
I love american football and soccer RT do you like watching other sports in your down time, #serenafriday 
I play the guitar. RT Do you play any instruments?? :)) #serenafriday 
Lol I don't know RT CAN U TELL ME WHERE I CAN GET SAFE BOOTY INJECTIONS #serenafriday 
Yes love!! RT Will you ever reply to me?:( #serenafriday 
Don't forget about us. Mariah Carey RT if we were to karaoke this (cont)  
Most definitely me. :) RT who's a better tennis player, you or Sasha? #serenafriday 
Shaved! RT do you prefer a guy with a hairy chest or a shaven chest. (cont)  
I like everything... Even country RT@debina6933: #serenafriday apart from Greenday who do you most like listening to? 
yes you will RT“@Bema8: Serena please tell me...that I will see you playing 2013 :) #serenafriday” 
Questions begin now! Add #serenafriday to your question for me to answer them. 
ummmm go to bed already 
#serenafriday is almost here. Do u have ur questions ready? 
Ummm u were always looking sooo HOT wow RT“@SavannahRB: Me sophomore year homecoming. #ThrowbackThursday  
This Hotel is encouraging people to steal their art!! I Might try.. tonight.  #stealbanksy #onlyinAustralia 
U must be with our buddy J.D. RT“@Angelo4ro: heeeeeeeeeeeeyyyyyyyyy lol” 
Wedding Crasher  
Friday American time everyone. :) #serenafriday 
ask me on friday 
All access Friday. Ask me anything u want all day every Friday and get answers. #serenafriday 
Its ok... Its coming I see it! Stay positive! Lol RT "@serenawilliams: Teaching (cont)  
Have u guys checked out  pretty cool..... 
Lol #pregrandslamnightmares RT "I pity the fool......" 
In my dream I was playing mixed with and we were playing against Mr. T and Andy kept missing and could not beat Mr. T 
I had the craziest dream last night... Shall I share? 
Some amazing things! Can't wait RT“@lorenridinger: Can't wait to share my new pieces tomorrow 10pm to midnight EST” 
Teaching how to pose. He's getting there. :)  
can't wait! RT“@YoursbyLoren: Tomorrow, tomorrow... can’t wait to reveal the entire new January line 10 pm who's watching?” 
I'm on the #KobeSystem with and Are you?  
I love you... 
Sometimes the best things for us are the hardest things to do. 
Pain is only temporary but quitting lasts forever #winfromwithin what are you doing to win from within? 
Do u have my Power Music fitness mixtape yet? Check out the first one on itunes NOW!!! RETWEET!!    
Tré Cool u are amaz. Tks for advise! Love u :) 
I miss u so much :( RT “@Venuseswilliams: Tired of wheatgrass, but Harold seems to like it” 
Just left hotel pool -bikini clad thinking I can jump on elevator quick and run to room. 5 men were waiting for me in elevator. #Awkward 
I have entered the #kobesystem .... More coming soon.... 
My brand new workout mix is already in the Top 5 on iTunes Fitness and Workout Chart!!! I hope you like it!  
Team Williams on way to Melbourne.. I'm doing everything to heal up and #winfromwithin  
tks lol RT“@SHJohnson3: Hope killed that karaoke just like she will kill in the Australian Open. #crusheverythinf” 
I'm SOOOOOO nervous!!!! 
Oh boy karaoke.. I'm sure someone is gonna tape me and u can see it on. Youtube. UGH. But I just love karaoke. PS I have the WORST voice! 
Yes LOL RT r u match maker now? lol 
 
Ladies check out he's single ... But nuitter than me..  
Being an athlete requires sacrifice, discipline & heart. There is no winning without hard work.  I'm about to overcome this #WinFromWithin 
Want to get in shape this year? Power Music and I created cool workout mixes! Check out the first one on iTunes NOW!  
love u more RT“@psloveejustus: fersure. Love you. <3” 
I'll call u. No updates though. RT“@psloveejustus: lol we gotta talk soon <3” 
Over it RT “@psloveejustus: ohh boy ! ... Lol.” 
:) 
Day 2 of recovery. I am doing a lot better. Tks for the well wishes. I love u all. Big kiss I'm determined to #WinFromWithin 
loving I lost RT“@common: So which one of the 12 songs are your favorite from my album?” 
Thank you all for the well wishes. I really appreciate it and need it. I plan on figuring out a way to #winfromwithin. 
Too many athletes do not focus on what they put IN their body during a match. It can kill your performance. #WinFromWithin 
It's not u it's the altitude. I almost fainted there once. Lol RT “@lorenridinger: I am seriously out of breath after 5 min in Aspen! Lol! 
I just saw a scary movie Apollo 18. I'm really scared. Every time I close my eyes I see the scary creatures. what if one eats me :( 
Lol noooooo I forgot u too!! :( oh nooo lol :( RT I'm inviting myself to this party! 
next up "Stronger" by Kelly Clarkson lol 
Lol I have to agree with u on this one.... RT U r both freaks! RT (cont)  
Yea please when I get back let's get lives!! Ugh RT Omg I was listening today too! (cont)  
Listening to Adele #someonelikeyou I have to laugh at myself about this! LOL hahahaha 
This time last year I was in a leg cast. 
I wanna #winfromwithin RT You can join the #WinFromWithin conversation on too. Check it out:  
Going to treat every point like match point #makeitcount How will you make it count this year?  
oh man I gotta see that!!!!! 
WHO is it??!! RT“@eacam: OMG LMFAOOOOOOO Serena's dog being on Twitter. I swear to God it ain't me! Lmao” 
2 ideas? Plz RT“@VALgabond: and I sent tons of ideas! I.e. Background for pics, 80's prom decor, song selection :/” 
I feel as though u r not serious. U have not sent any ideas. Hiring Esther RT“@VALgabond: the MOST important entry though!” 
My first and only 2012 calendar entry...  
I definitely have a few loose chips upstairs. 
She's not here. I miss her!! RT “@dutchessgp: Jackie hit ur mother in the head. It will be alright now TrustMe!!!” 
Even though I try I can't let go, something in your eyes captured my soul. Every night I see u in my dreams. Your all I know I can't let go 
lol I'm a loose RT“@IamRRA: SMH!!! Like, really??? Hahahahaha!!!!” 
u see Williams invitational info? I'll bbm u.. 
I'm afraid to sleep... because I keep dreaming about you. 
"You Suck"  
Ok tks guys for listening to my hummmm's and ahhhhhhhh lol 
WTH? 
Come on.... 
Ok... Like FOR REAL??? 
FORREAL!!!!??!!!!! RT S!!!! LOL 
Like really, really??? 
..... But really?? Shocking. 
I've been doing everything I can to bite my tongue.... But.... 
I tried. Hard 
Criminal Mike...This is my fav guy on this planet!  
U r Amaz RT “@StevenTaylor: Amazing shoot today w/ Stoked for you guys to see where these shots  
We work Amaz together. :) RT“@StevenTaylor: Amazing shoot today w/ Stoked for you guys to see : //t.co/h9jqeuZ2” 
"A" team in effect. U guys always make me look so glam! Love “@nikkinelms the best! 
Getting lessons from I'm not sure if he gives good advise.... 
Netflix Avengers... Final 2 episodes .... Getting good.... 
lol 
Mexican vegan pizza I made from scratch...Meat is nut based.  
New website design coming soon. I'm making it more interactive for you all. Love all of you! 
Visit DMVculture.com and follow 
Can't quite figure out why I've been awake for the past hr.... What I can tell u is I'm def getting some fried chicken today. #cheatday 
lol haha silly u... RT“@djreflex: looks fine to me... and I'm full Mexican, so it must be correct” 
Hummm....Can u spot the error?  
I just had a maj urge for some fried chicken. Tk goodness I'm not near anywhere that has fried chicken. :( 
:( RT In nyc till end of week! Then PJ party baby! RT (cont)  
I need to come by we have a lot to catch up on. Ru back? #sleepover 
I don't answer your calls. I don't reply to your text. If I see u I act as if I don't know u. I just don't like you. 
Serena just beat 6-3!!! Yahooooo 
Serena Leads 5-2. Let's go me! #serenapower 
Serena leads 4-1! Gooo me!!!! :) 
Serena leads 2-1. Just broke. #serenapower 
If I get 4 games or more I win. has to win the whole set. Let the games begin! 
Winner of my match me vs get to try the roger federer shot- in other words hit a can off the others head :) lol 
Ok so I'm about to play in a match. One set. What do u guys think the score will be? 
Its OFFICAL! Game set match, championship! I'm done with school for this semester!! Schools out! I need to go celebrate!! Yahoooo 
FINISHED!!!!! Now I'm awake!! :) 
I'm writing a paper, and falling asleep at the same time. If I were out dancing I'd be wide awake! #wrongpriorities 
Snuggling with the dry cleaning  
LOVE u!!!!!! :) hugs 
maybe.... 
........... Maybe I miss u too....... 
lol yup yup RT“@psloveejustus: Never a dull moment with <3 Unforgettable night !” 
Momma's coming over and wants me to dog sit. Can't wait. All the dogs can jump in bed with me! Slumber party! 
My dad too! He passed the non sleeping disease to me! RT My dad does not sleep. Just called me at 6:45 am to talk business.. 
......... That was a Green Day lyric..... #WalkingContradiction 
Talk is cheap.... and lies are expensive..... 
I'm here. I miss u. Check dm! RT La baby where u RT"@serenawilliams: where ru?" 
where ru? 
just asked me where I got my superman onzie. She said she wants to get it for her 5 year old nephew.. I need to rethink my lingerie 
I'm not looking forward to training Tomm. planned a tough day. Must rest up. #Netflix 
Mr. Potato head is so hotter than him..... 
I PROMISE to do homework tomorrow...... 
I'm kinda obsessed with Fendi right now... 
Morning practice  
Yikes forgot about my school work... 
Up up and away!!!  
Had the BEST night with like woahhh did I miss my girl #girlsnight 
Flashing lights 
Tune in! 30mins! launhes her jewelry line for tonight 10pm-12EST #YBL  
u were punching those buttons on your phone like a punching bag!!! who does that?? 
On a flight with hes always complaining. Now he's shaking his leg.... #annoying 
A bachelorette's dinner when she's too lazy to cook :)  
homemade Almond berry ginger milkshake #SerenaTheChef #TwitPict  
I'm really scared of the boogie man. 
So excited to watch Can't wait for launch new jewelry collection Dec 12th 10pm-12am EST live on . 
I think #1 or 2 I love pink!!! RT“@lorenridinger: Which option should I wear for my live HSN debut! Look 1, 2 or 3?  
I'm now making almond milk and Tea... Did u all see the video of me trying to hit a trick shot? If not ill re post it tomorrow :) 
Do u guys need to laugh? Watch my practice today!  
I wanna see! :) 
Today I made applesauce :) kinda cool. Super tasty. 
Great time at charity with Finishing road trip with I'm the designated driver :) 
I got the wheel. I got ur back! RT won't stop and let me use the bathroom, what a jerk take the wheel 
Road trip is with we keep making stops for Dan to use the bathroom. He's like a 4 year old girl. Arghhh 
Road trip with lol. He's so funny we are on our way to charity yeaaaa 
Oh man I can't wait for launch new jewelry collection Dec 12th 10pm-12am EST live on #YBL watch! RT 
I can't figure out why I wake up at 4:23am every morning... 
yeaaa aww so sweet! RT “@TillyRochester: ...I'm not a woman but damn u have some amazing clothes #WERQ” 
tks love! RT“@JazzCrazy: Your reversible handbag is da bomb!!!! It's very fashionable & functional. Perfect 4every woman. 
I miss my sisters!!!!! :( :( :( 
Tks guys for all the support on HSN. I love you. You are all amaz and special!!!! Kiss kiss 
Ok guys my last hour. At 5pm on HSN. Tune in. More steals. Fabulous bags for $24 more under 30$ I can't believe these prices. RT 
Amaz! New things at 4pm I'm back! Watch!! RT great show queen amazing prices.. 
I'm at HSN I'm on at NOON-These prices are going to be INSANE! OMG u must tune in!!! Wow wow wow u guys are NOT ready! RT 
I think I'm dating Netflix.... It gives me everything I need... 
Does anyone remember that show "Blossom" 
2 more weeks left in school and I'm done. Only 2 papers left..... Can't wait for this to be over. 
Y am I awakkkkeeeeeeeee!!!!! Arghhhhh 
I'm off to train... Gotta get rid of my unsightly muffin top 
Who knows. But y ru up? Netflix times for me!! RT “@Angelo4ro: why are we up right now ???” 
:) tks babes. RT“@birchenough1974: You are the only superstar who doesn't swear that I follow. Keep it up!” 
Its so annoying when people change their bbm subject to something that just makes u tic. 
si! RT “@MarcoBeltrami79: aglio, olio e peperoncino in Italy?” 
Just woke up I'm still on european time. Ugh 
I sorry :( RT “@SICKTIREDPISSED: i have been following u since March 2009 and i can't get you to tweet me back” 
lol funny RT “@Briana_Veniana: You're not. Usually just ends up with me screaming at the TV or swooning to the fine-ness!” 
Watching tennis channel now. LOL 
neh I had turned watching tennis channel now lol RT “@Zef_B: haha dare I ask what you're watching?” 
lol I'll try that RT“@msjcita: why turn your face away from such a wonderful thing? I'd move closer lol” 
Wow I mean I can't watch anymore. I mean handsome, nice, thoughtful, AND considerate??!!??? Why am I still watching this??!! 
Ladies- have u ever watched someone on TV and they were so handsome that u had to turn the channel? Tell me I'm not the only one! 
Hey guys and gals:) if u are a producer, songwriter, or artist send demos to at www.blazetrak.com/Jas RT ! 
I had the best time in Milan. I love u guys. Grazie mille. 
I am!! My fav show ever! RT Desperate Housewives is on tonight! Who's watching!? #desperatehousewives 
I love ANYTHING cheetah print RT no !!! Soon I will :) I want the (cont)  
When we travel & my guy friend has a girl over (I cant name names cause would kill me lol) he comes2my room2use the bathroom. 
Had a great day in Milan with Mr. Armani. . . And at Armani. Giorigo sure knows how to spoil me. Love u babes! 
Milan!! just arrived in italy. I can't wait to play here with Venus! 
Milan!!! Siamo appena arrivati a Milano. Amo l'Italia! Non vedo l'ora di giocare qui con Venus 
Today I grew up 
Venus RT whose better you or Venus 
Let's just say its been a minute... A long minute.... 
congrats!! RT“@rihanna: #GRAMMYS2012 5 nominations!!! This year keeps getting better and better!#LOUD up 4 Album of the year is so #MAJAH” 
I'm think I'm ready for tennis to start... I can tell cause I asked bestest Val if the restaurant was crosscourt from hotel. 
What kind of dance class? RT it was a dance class…i have to say,I really enjoyed it 
Congrats to HSN and Mindy Grossaman at the footwear news event in NYC last night. Much deserved :) 
Bedtime. Up Late night writing a paper. Ouch #homework 
My finest day... Is yet unknown 
Final round... let's goooooooooooooo!!!!!!! 
u ready for tomm? 
I always think of you especially, when the words of a love song touch the very heart of me 
It had begun.... I'm about to be a monster. 
Gracias Colombia. Tuve un gran tiempo. lo amo y no puedo esperar a ver u otra vez pronto. #williamssistersrock 
Gracias colombia. Tuve un gran tiempo. lo amo y no puedo esperar a ver u otra vez pronto. #williamssistersrock 
I HATE when people spit and talk to me! #SayItDon'tSprayit!!! 
u are such a jerk! 
I cant wait to play Venus tonight in Medellìn. we love our Colombian fans. you guys are amazing! #serenapower 
No puedo esperar para jugar a Venus esta noche en Medellìn. amamos a nuestros fans colombianos. ustedes son increíbles! 
Yea RT “@federicoacevedo: I'm definitely not missing the match today..I love to have here in Colombia! 
I'm not sure I should take your advise... Lol RT Yes ......... Do it 
?? What?? RT yess . i would just be like i just went to the dentist (cont)  
Lol I'm serious lol RT hahahha hahahha. Only you 
Ok so my question: PAY ATTENTION. Is it rude for me to anyone to give the gift of a tooth whitening system? 
I have a question for u guys. I need all of your attention. . . 
I prefer Wilson tennis balls. :) RT “@SkiviBaby: can i be your tennis ball?” 
ha it's amaz here RT “@mysandglass: Colombia, the only risk is that you want to stay! WELCOME home!” 
no puedo esperar RT Bienvenidas a #Medellin!! No saben la (cont)  
Kisses! RT can I get retweet for having you in my top 5 celebrity crushes? You are gorgeous! 
It's gonna be amazing on you! L.A.L RT“@marissa2x: Just bought 's dress online ! Can't wait!  
Gracias RT“@janna0150: WELLCOME TO COLOMBIA!!
I WILL BE WATCHING THE GAME. GOOD LUCK” 
La prensa confrence en Colombia ha ido bien. Esperamos que el resto de este viaje #williamssisters 
The press confrence in Colombia went well. we are looking forward to the rest of this trip #williamssisters 
la stampa confrence in Colombia è andato bene. Siamo lieti per il resto di questo viaggio. 
Luv u too RT u guys have done nothing (cont)  
Gracias :) RT me gusto su espanol! Muy buen chica! 
We love u too! RT IlOVEYPUGUYS <3 
Where are our Columbian fans! We love u!!! Venus and I are on our way to play for u guys!! #Columbia!! 
Yes love!! RT “@Kenya_pal: we are waiting for u!!! thks to think about colombia!!!!” 
Donde estan nuestros fans de Colombia? Venus y yo estamos listas para jugar! Amamos a Colombia! 
Where are our Columbian fans at?? Venus and I are on our way to play for u guys!! R We love Columbia!! 
U can do it! Let's get it done!! :) RT Me too! Homework!!! RT Homework.... Still haven't packed... Ahhhhhh 
Homework.... Still haven't packed... Ahhhhhh 
awesome! Miss thang!! RT“@SarahRobbOh: ran 9.17 mi
  
Wow practical joke gone bad. Lol 
Photoshooting with we can't work cause we won't stop talking. #sisterlylove. #LAL 
I guess I'm happy to see u to big bro. RT“@BigSascha: Always makes me happy to see my litle sis after its been a while...” 
I will I need to move here!!! Miss u tks!!! RT Come back soon! Miss ya already :) 
Top 3 nights of my life guys are amaz. L.A.L #LiveALittle 
Ru serious??? Honestly?? RT hey girl i hope your in LA this weekend cuz im coming thru 
thank you so much for having me the past few days. I love my big bro and little sis :) 
Finally know who #whatshername is....#greenday 
Wow have they grown!!!! RT Last time I saw Green Day was when they opened for (cont)  
secret show. :) oh yea baby best show I've seen all year by FAR!!! 
With and I LOVE u guys. Omg concert next. Wow amaz! LAL - #LiveALittle 
In ALL ways take notice of him, and he himself will make your paths straight. 
I am proud to support small businesses next week for Small Business Saturday. RT to share where you're going to #adv 
Green Day!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
How did I miss Zac Efron tonight? Apparently he was standing right next to me... DANG!!!!!!! #ZacEfronFan 
LOVE YOU!!!!!! RT My baby girl and I catching up and having a great time! I love her!  
I have so much energy today ! 
I have a new hitting partner. He's younger, hotter, and carries my bags with no attitude.  
I had the best time with my girlfriends tonight. Much needed Love muuah. 
I had the best time with my girlfriends tonight. Much needed Love muuah. 
Don't be afraid to go out and find new cheese. . . 
lol totally agree!! Lol 
Family bowling night w/ my mom & niece & nephews. I did not have the heart to tell my mom I HATE bowling and I'm terrible at it... 
LDNA 
when ru back hun?? RT “@CMilianOfficial: I love ny  
great talking to you. It was my honor. Xx 
About 2 talk with at the Ernst & Young Strategic Growth Forum:  #EYsgf great opportunity. I'm excited. 
My Fav Guys at Nickelodeon :) surprise guys.....  
This week I'll be in conversation with at the Ernst & Young Strategic Growth Forum:  #EYsgf 
I'm at a arcade. I'm the worst player with all these games. The only game I ever was halfway decent at is tennis. 
Joe Frazier you were a icon and pioneer for people like me. Inspiring and loved. Your presence will be missed. 
One of both these terrible dogs just took a maj poop in my car! #disrepectful  
I for sure have the worlds worst dogs. I mean they just took a s*%t in the car!!!!!!! WTH???? 
Ummm u in NYC and dident tell me?!??!!!!!!! U can't HIDE!!! 
Let's trade! LOL RT Nah girl. I think my 7 month old Pomchi has got (cont)  
Yes she's the worst she won't stop crying when I leave. . RT Is she misbehaving again? What did she do this time? 
and cousin Mary... LETS GO already!!! 
I have the worlds baddest dog.... And not a good bad. She's sweet but terribly spoiled. All my fault 
Once they start saying "We" you know it's over . . . 
Amaz! Love u RT Thank u for all the support! Conquered NYC marathon in 4:15 for the SLE Lupus Foundation .. Sooo much fun! 
My puppy Jackie was supposed to be watching He-Man with me this morning but she's snoring now... 
:) 
Um I LOVE cooking when r we having a cook off I'm ready?? RT “@KhloeKardashian: you are a chef? LOL ballin! Man I love you” 
Ummm Klo u make desserts? I think we should have a cook off. I'm a certified chef ... RT 
Lol hahahhaha that was the WORST lol RT blame it on the rain. Definitely your best performance lol 
Ok guys its been a while I'm at karaoke. What should I sing? 
I really miss u. U are my older bro I never had. Hurry home. I wanna meet your new girlfriend and I heard she's preg. Congrats!! 
HALO awards on now! Surprise appearance from me ;) 
hey. So I have a question for you.... DM me.... 
I'm jealous!!! :( RT Let's go shopping baby!! be ready! 
Esther is running for lupus. What a great heart go Esta!!! 
Just finished a early morning workout with So tired but now we are going to cheer on Esther running in the NYC marathon. 
Goodnight guys :) 
Never be afraid to close one door and open another. There may be a treasure worth more than fine gold. 
Workout time go out and sweat babies!!!! 
Just because everyone else is doing it does not mean u have to do it. 
Goodnight everyone have tons of homework tomm ...... Work hard and give everything 200%. :) 
Always respect yourself. When you love u others will too :) xx S 
me and Loren wish u were here :( 
love!! RT@lorenridinger: More important than this movie is my girls..@serenawilliams there is nothing like girlfriends 
I'm at the movies with and we won't stop talking. Lol #GirlTime 
Watching #TOWERHEISTMOVIE you are a genius!! 
With great company. All my friends are so special. 
Yea. Almost there :)RT Going to the movies tonight with my girlies 
Love God first than yourself. 
#oppsummit. tweet your ?s for me  RT And she's off....  
I’m speaking 3 on Friday at the #oppsummit. Sign up to watch & tweet your ?s for (cont)  
umm your husband tricked me with that....juice... Yall had me very happy. #muchneeded 
So what? U are a loose? RT Soooooooooo 
Really? She's nothing. Like filet mingon vs neckbones ... Ugh. Gotta move on!!!! 
Lwts chat. So much to talk about! RT with my girl at the black ball! She is gorgeous  
Tough day..... 
Me and feeling good at keep a child alive :)  
omg ru here??? I need u!!! 
I've missed u so much! :) love u RT Me and my girl at Blackball  
Call it as I see it even if I were born deaf, blind or dumb #greenday 
:) RT At ms 's benefit. Amazing evening w/ and XO  
..... The first tweet :) 
I’m speaking 3 on Friday at the #oppsummit. Sign up to watch & tweet your ?s for me to answer after!   
And I do too. Love u RT“@KimKardashian: God always has your back!” 
I'm so cold I miss my dogs they always keep me warm... :( 
Now its time for Gem and the holograms!! :) :) 
Wow already done with my homework for this week! Boo-ya! 
I hope for me.... RT“@kmcme: Just received a pkg from *swooning* these gowns are gorgeous!” 
Madrid 
My physio is running a marathon to support Lupus click here to read and donate ro a great cause!  
Blanche Deveraux 
Miserable no more. 
I miss u. And I need some advise. Serious advise. I need u! :( your confused little sister. 
Breaking..... 
memba when I was 7 & I smashed a tennis ball when he wasn't looking than said it was u. And u got in trouble? Sorry 
Hey remember when I was 5 and I broke you and lyn's piggy bank because I broke mine on accident? I'm sorry #spoiled 
Spain 
Tummy ache 
no matter where I am I don't sleep RT“@TMWILLIAMS4EVA: night owling in Paris lol” 
Parce que Mon ami es pas bien avec moi 
People keep blaming and accusing me for s*!t I don't even know about. #reasonyoursingle 
Je suis fâchè 
J'adore paris 
Muahhh RT Why thank you for the lovely night! 
At some point.... One of these days I am going to have to start sleeping.... 
dont u wanna kno... RT“@jsmoll: where r u” 
I mean both are super maj looses 
I don't feel like wearing heels but dang it I will. #heelsforlife 
Why am I just seeing this?!! hosted an album listening party in his living room.!  #OpenInvitation 
where ru? Text me!!! :) 
I have to say I had the BEST night with Val yesterday. From the random taco truck to the random karaoke house party. 
Wow what a beautiful day. We never get days like this no clouds. So nice 
Lol ummmmm where u been??!!???!!!! RT “@MARLONLWAYANS: where's my invite” 
Karaoke party. 
lol “@Lonnys_world: 4x you walked & you know what it means! Ha! #GoodTimes! #Love...” 
LA house party time. Who's house??? MINE!!!!!! 
Yup 
What a beautiful face.... Gone to waste..... 
Looking for are you in the same city as me?? 
Ummmm my little dog is overweight and I don't know how to tell her with out upsetting her. Any suggestions? 
Homework has ruined my social life!!!! 
Omg I just finished my annotated bibliography!!! Now I only have 1 more paper to write ...Pheww 4 papers this week is tooo much... 
it's still I'm the 50foot box it came in!!! Lol how to unpack that??!!?? RT“@MardyFish: Lets see urs!” 
I gotta unpack mine!!! RT“@MardyFish: My US Open Series trophy arrived today by armored car!  
Walking into excited to be here! Yeaaaa :) 
So excited to see Christopher Bailey at Body launch 
Ughhhh ill pass “@TravisGarland: ha! you want me to bring you a date?” 
it holds a special place in my heart too lol RT“@Angelo4ro: the bowling pair our still my fave :p lol” 
yea double date u and travis me and Val ugh RT “@CarleneKMakeup: heck yes! Can't wait...” 
Mexican tonight with ?? 
u will die laughing at me. Lol RT “@Zef_B: I wanna come to see one of your guys's class” 
hahaha had I known she was sending that to you!! Ugh Lol so embarrassing 
RT“@Angelo4ro: I seen the shoes ;)lol” 
So... I took a Latin burlesque class yesterday with Val and I was TERRIBLE! I ended up trying to sabotage Val. Lol #classclown 
hahahaha yes I almost did say greenday. But I'm getting better.... See?? :) lol 
Listening to skyscraper. Wow. Love love 
I'm beginning to believe its me..... 
So now I'm sleepy. I mean I'm so tired and I have a full day... If I could just go to sleep at night..... 
is that a tennis court in the background? RT “@ryanlochte: Getting ready for Men's Health photo shoot  
Maj insomnia 
Amaz!! RT Greatest Premiere ever for Albert Maysles, Brian Grazer, and Bradley Kaplan  
I'm the lonely idiot who's taken a stand against sleeping. Not such a smart move. 
What time is it? Homework time! Ugh #AnnotatedBibliography time 
Tks for my look tonight. and for these amazing shoes #modernsexkitten 
I dident sleep at all yesterday and I'm up now working. I'm gonna pay for this in a few days..... 
#adddicted 
Night RT“@mikeztyme: I don't care if ever responds....she will always be #1 to me...and with that, yall have a goodnight.” 
wow lol yokes RT“@NotoriousSpinks: I have a 15 page paper due Friday and I haven't written 1 word We will make it though!” 
thanks :) RT“@Abinash03111992: u never reply bt still u'll always remain my fav sports star!” 
I should be working on one of my 4 papers due this week.... But I'm gonna watch Netflix. #AnnotatedBiblographyNightmares 
so true RT “@Mia0305: If someone is strong enough to bring you down, show them you are strong enough to get up” 
I dunno I never sleep aiiii RT“@TMWILLIAMS4EVA: night owl what are you doing?” 
ummm u awake lady?? 
Can't wait for it tomm!! :) RT Finally finished and its only the night before the premiere?? 
ooph 
ummm ru in fla?? 
I would not be in sports. RT“@KevinSilvestre: If you were not a tennis pro, what other sport would you conquer, 
u can be better RT “@llliiiaaannnaaa: u are my idol. Wish I could be as good as u some day. Xoxo” 
Praying. RT “@msajamarie: Currently I'm at the hospital with my baby :( pray for us!” 
I need to go to Brazil!! RT “@JenifferMarcela: relaxing!! From Brazil love you!” 
I needed to rub today #fail RT “@taste_my_swag: making youtube videos and about to go for a jog and laundry. Lol” 
et j'adore France RT “@xoRadiateLove: Say "Je t'aime la France". It will be cool :) FRANCE loves you!” 
doing homework now RT“@beccaisinspired: Did you have homework this weekend? I'm finishing a paper for class right now!” 
What's everyone doing? I'm at my daddy's house :) 
me too :) RT “@alisajiddar: i m ur no1 fan i hope u win all da grand slams next yr :D” 
OH MY GOD u can't wait to start playing tennis again next season. I'm so ready!!!! 
done for the year but I cannot wait to start playing next year RT“@LLe_mo: playing much tennis or u done for this year?” 
Dear give us a break next time! :) Serena 
Lol neh lol 
U know it RT you must be watching Sunday Football! 
Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh 
Commmmeeeee onnnnnnnnnnn 
I can't wait for to drop a new record 
Does anyone own an alarm? Or so u just use your cell phone?? 
Awake 
I don't know if I'll ever recover. I love and already miss her so much. I'm happy for her but man am I so sad... 
My best friend got married today and I cried like a baby. Why am I so sad. She moving and leaving me... I'm so sad. 
u need him 
Finish the sentence guys : #idrather ..... 
u bad boy u!!! :) 
Woahhhh I just heard the BEST hottest new song on the radio. Wow. Man. My new jam. Makes me wanna go out!! 
At my fav designer store. #trouble 
What a productive day I had. Lots of things checked off the list 
At the library :) 
That awkward moment when you are watching America's Most Wanted and the guy on TV is the same guy sitting next to you. 
lol u can't afford that. Lol 
Dentist...... 
yea :) tks! :) oh if I do too much I'm blaming u :) lol 
Watching the 4th episode of chopped... Really Serena? #Getalife 
Wow umm can u share code? Amaz!!! RT This 20% code is going to get me in some real trouble. 
I love u guys hugs to all my followers! 
Thanks guys for suggestions on my neck. But y am I complaining over some little neck pain? Things could be worse. Tk goodness I have a neck 
I'm hoping I don't need that :(RT that happened to me once remember? I had to go to the dr for a shots. 
Lol RT how about a mans hand? 
The only way I can look left is with my eyes! My eyes just popped out #neckpain 
My neck kills. I've tried everything. Dry needling, acupuncture, chiropractor, Physical therapy. I still can't turn my neck to left :( 
Awww u 2 are so cute! RT RT #NP "So into u"-Tamia. *bbm heart eyes face*(Awww babe! Such a sweetheart!) 
Awww u 2 are so cute! RT RT #NP "So into u"-Tamia. *bbm heart eyes face*(Awww babe! Such a sweetheart!) 
‎​Follow my good friend tonight on his season finale on 
I have not eaten ALL day.... Seriously. Its 9pm guys really? 
Yea here finally! RT Dinner with cant wait for some good laughs 
I miss u!!! 
arnt you excited for tonight?? :) u better be lol 
:) :) RT I have the neatest sister in the world 
I just woke up. Wow. I am in full vacation mode and I am loving it!!! 
Had fun tonight and Gotta do it again soon!!! P.s stop trying to scare me!! 
Had fun tonight Gotta do it again soon!!! 
About to cook. 
Seriously one of the best nights of my life. Random night. Talking to Bono. It gets no better than that. 
U did amazing. So happy for you. Wow! Yeaaaaaaa :) 
I need advise lol again... RT“@BigSascha: I miss my lil sister and momma Where are you guys?? :(” 
I miss u too big brother :( RT“@BigSascha: I miss my lil sister and momma Where are you guys?? :(” 
Shutting off my brain for the rest of the dark hours today in 5. 4 .3. 2. 1 gotta blast.... 
Omg u r insane!!! Lol woahhhh RT 
Go to sleep! Its too late! Wow insane lol RT Yesss!!! Come over let's chat!RT (cont)  
I'm convinced u sleep less than me.... And that's saying something!! 
Timing. Soon. Soon. 
Maj conflict in interest. 
U should have said hey!! Lol RT Was w/ n saw the lovely . Good luck (cont)  
I hope Rick Ross is ok. We can pray for him. 
I'm a little nerd... RT Geeked out!!! Check out a page in school book! Lolz.  
#RIPjackamoWELOVEYOU” 
I am so happy I met you. Today is sad for me. You were a brave kid. I love u always. 
Baby... Don't forget my number #millivanilli 
Having the BEST dinner with omg I've missed u!!!!!!!!! I love u!!! 
I loved milli vanilli !!!!!!! 
My phones not working. :( 
The only one I want. 
‎​Dwnload My lil bro Mixtape iTs Jordan #Swagg  
Netflix night again... :) suggestions? 
just told me I'm ugly on the inside...... Hahah 
I refuse to sleep I must be a vampire 
Ok ok let's do sum thing ill call u! RT Listen here!!! If I don't see you this week I'm (cont)  
I showed up in boots and ruined your blk tie affair RT Blame it all on my roots. RT Night 35 w/ Ugh 
Night 35 with Ugh lol 
Omg Plz RT 's new album is crazy!! I just Pre-Ordered it!! #RealMusic --> Here!  #OpenInvitation 
ahhhhhhhh RT “@lala: I'm so excited for blind date!! TUNE IN NOW! VH1!” 
Kim & Kris' wedding special part II is on in 15 minutes! Yeaaa Kimmy!!! :) 
Its not fair to me to Jake or his girlfriend to say we r dating when u just hang out and have dinner with friends. So stop the lies!! 
I NEVER address rumors but this one I will. I am not dating He is a great guy with a super amazing girlfriend. 
Watch movie.... Or do homework.... 
A big hug to all my followers today! I'm hugging u all!! Kisses 
Day in bed with school books, dog, and netflix :) #nice 
Lol that's a good way to look it! RT LOL! Good thing you're too fabulous to be defeated by a zipper! ;-) 
Dear it took me nearly 10 mins to unzip my dress tonight... I looked like a contortionist. Your not selling me on this. 
I'm loving this!!!! RT“@VALgabond: Keith Urban!!! :)))  
little sis needs big sister RT“@Venuseswilliams: Good morning, trying to get up” 
I need a gatorade 
Rise andd shine and workout :) whoop whoop 
had so much fun tonite! Yea can't wait to see concert tomm! Fun time see u tomm/today!!! Lol wish u were here! 
Ugh paparazzi annoying. Honestly really? Like I wonder what tomm they will say. 
Tks for the advise... Hummmm.... 
Everyone keeps asking what I am studying... I'm majoring in business with a concentration in health. 
My day is filled with homework. Got a 100% on my quiz... Now reading endless chapters of how to write research papers.... Bore... 
Once again if u are confused remember- I'm built for comfort not for speed 
Enrique Iglesias best concert I've been to next to of course :) 
At Enrique Iglesias and PitBull concert... UMMM did not know Pitbull was so AMAZING!!! CANT WAIT for Enrique! 
I'm built for comfort and not for speed :) 
Hey that's my shirt u are wearing!!! RT I may have over done it with the kinesio tape ... I take (cont)  
Steve Jobs the Thomas Edison of our day. You will be missed but your Legend will Live forever. 
Yeaaaa so awesome check it guys!!!! RT Queen Shmink has arrived.  
Hey guys! My bff has a new blog. Check it out  find out how I keep in shape.. My drink of choice and more. RT 
He's added a few lbs in his repertoire 
Practice using the words in sentences :) 
Yikes! LOL RT major muff Lmao! 
Serena lingo- please add to your vocab: Loose- Short for Loser Maj- short for Major Muff- short for Muffin Top Stay tuned for more. :) 
I'm starved RT LetTtttzzzz go RT I should go to bed. 
I should go to bed. 
If I do two weeks of all veggies ill loose my booty :( RT We r now doing 2weeks of veggies. Where ru 
Lol that's my boy. His name is Gerry! RT is always trying to hustle my dog, (cont)  
I missed talking to u tonite :( RT Gnite everyone, I have to rest up so I can eat some veggies tomorrow, haha 
Oh thank goodness. I'm back in 2011. 
maybe I'm at Romey and Michelle's High school reunion? 
I think I entered a time machine and I'm at a 1985 party... Really weird.... I hope when I leave its still 2011 
Distraction :) 
The first 2 days are juices only fyi... RT We are having a big juicy rib eye before we go on this journey. 
I MUST move on. 
I shudder RT My sister is visiting me, we are eating all raw vegetables for the next week, scary... 
Finished my paper! I'm not a great writer... But I will get better.... And better and better. 
Captain cave man?? 
What about Jem and the holograms? 
omg me too RT“@TheGrandSlams: The looney tunes, i loved the first land before time :) little foot. Hey arnold lol” 
Remember Fat albert and the Junk yard kids?? 
Ok guys. Let's talk cartoons what was your fav cartoon growing up? Let's talk so super old ones... 
Wish I were there. Still have to finish my paper :( RT i just wanna tell you, Ima BOSS so you go to sleep! 
Does anyone remember the cartoon "toxic crusaders"?? 
u awake??!! RT“@Venuseswilliams: haha! I had double mango madness!” 
Muffin top 
He has a muff top. 
Uh ohhh u done let out my B.G.A be careful 
u are finally here. I gotta watch my tweets now!!!! 
So awkward right now. ummm help!!!!!! Lol 
Excited about my night with one of my favorite sisters Lyn, and off to see our buddy 
Ugh what a loose 
Gracie and Bobbie in my yard.  
lol me! Hahaha 
I'm not sure I've been watching He-man. Help!! RT you will get there! 
Everyday for bfast and dinner 2 deer come to my yard and eat I've named them: Gracie( the mom) Bobbie (the baby) its so cool to see. 
I'm struggling this week. Still have 2 LONG papers to write RT we found out (cont)  
Geek.... RT we found out your leadership style. Lol, can't wait to hear about school. 
I just watched 's new "Stay" video love.. love.. Love it!! Can't wait for his album!   
Hummm not sure. A lil better. Will call u RT There is such a thing as being too nice... 
Yes I'm too nice lol RT There is such a thing as being too nice... 
I love the rain. 
He-man and the masters of the universe. 
Headache RT How's did day #2 of the closet organizing going? 
Radiohead concert in NY? How did I miss that??? 
:) what's up? RT are you in LA? 
Lol I got u! :) RT I won't be mad at your amazng hand me downs!!!! 
Oh dannng!!!! :( RT ohh i wish i was helping you! i am the best at organizing i love it!! 
Closet cleaning day 2 of 4... Yikes! No space!!! 
Karaoke 
Maj foot in mouth  RT“@psloveejustus: is too funny ! Ahaha.” 
Cleaning out my closet. I should be banned from ever stepping foot. 500 yards from any store. Can I file a (cont)  
seriously wasn't u... Btw I never saw urs... But u can't take credit on this one... 
ru gonna come over my house today to play?? Let's play!!! Lol 
lol no. Lol hahahaha never yours. I'll have to explain in person when I see u. :) 
I hated those shoes 
what's that?? Text me! RT“@ryanlochte: hey I'm following you on Weibo!! Follow me back. We need a karaoke date soon!” 
Mija 
hey it's and I just hijacked this bedazzled phone to say we love you!  
Bingo 
My friend Jack is so hard on but to me he's smooth and so nice. Love u Jack. I'm so relaxed when we meet. :) 
Pleasure was ours :) RT Thanks and for letting us briefly rage with you. 
I'm 100% positive should be a comedian.... He's in the wrong biz 
"I'm not crazy for cocktail drinks. I like it simple. I don't even go too crazy on salad dressing"... Lol WHAT???? Lol 
I love honest Jack... He's such a Gentleman. 
What?? What's worth it? RT it's all worth it, so proud of you! 
meeting my twin 
Homework, practice, design meetings, tv meeting, workout, physical therapy... All to do today. I'm gonna explode now.... 
My company (MISSION) is doing a poll on biggest sports innovations?? Vote now! www.Facebook.com/missionathletecare We have a new one coming! 
From "I don't understand why they call it Miss Universe when only people from the planet Earth is competing. " LOL haha 
So crazy! Luv u2 RT@CMilianOfficial: Omg and I: same phone, car, and Birthday! Woooow! Love you girll!  
I'm trying to stay incognito and I open my car door.... And tennis balls fly out. So much for that. 
Miami Dolphins. 
Counseling session with he ALWAYS turns my frown upside down. 
Did anyone see Abduction?? What did u think? 
Wow just saw Abduction umm wow Swagg at its top level! 
Day with my mom and So fun. I need to ddo this more often. Mommy I promise to be a better daughter :) 
hummmm RT“@ogeedm8: actually a duet of paradise city with 
Working on a new karaoke song. Sung temple of the dog last week. I'm thinking something 80's Any suggestions? 
yeaaa HSN swag!! RT“@elayne224: I received your swing coat, I love it! I can't wait to see your other cloths!” 
You may be disappointed if you fail, but you are doomed if you don't try. 
#bestthingsaboutbeingsingle is knowing Venus is single too. Lol 
yeaaa RT“@Venuseswilliams: I felt good today, I hope you guys did too” 
Just got my first ticket in like 8 years. Not bad..... 
Arghhhhh just got caught speeding. Now I'll strictly do the speed limit :) At least the police officer is nice 
Ran into today and ran sprints with him. Well he was a mile ahead of me lol. I'm so slow! 
I'm loving my girl's new music video for #papi vevo.ly/pB0HWo HAWTTT. Wow. Check it out! 
yes!!! 
I'm ready to cry 
Frustrated I cant write this paper about how interdisciplinary studies can help solve a modern day problem. Wow right?? 
I have like 6 papers do this week for my college classes. ahhhhhhh I'm going nuts!!! 
3 nights 3 hrs of sleep total. Yikes. 
About to go onstage at UNICEF Social Good Summit. Announcing new ambassador ship 
Thanks to perfection yea :) 
2 hrs of sleep, mostly on a plane... Tk God for Lisa and Nikki NYC #glamsquad 
UNICEF today #goodnews 
Hey guys my last 2 hrs on HSN- 9pm to 11 Home shopping Network. Tune in we r running out of things! Don't miss out on these crazy prices. 
Morning guys! 11am :) I'm back on Home shopping Network! (HSN) We were really busy yesterday so call in early today! 
Thank u guys for watching Hsn I'm back on Tomm at 11am. How about that cardigan AND tank4less than 30$ wow!More and today special tomorrow! 
Less than an hour away from me being on Home Shopping Network HSN. Midnight eastern time 9pm LA time! Tune in :) great new stuff :) 
I was eating sum cake (I know so bad) & noticed when I was almost done a baby spider crawling on my plate. That's wht I get 4 eating cake! 
I'm on HSN at midnight. New fashions. Fun fun fun!!!! U are gonna be sooo happy! Retweet and tune in!! :) 
of course! Duh! RT“@Zef_B: you started that?! Haha” 
lol dang j was gonna send it to you too!!! Hahahah RT“@psloveejustus: The number gave my brother to call > 
I die. I die.” 
Gooooooo Dolphins!!! FINS UP!!! 
Omg I love it. Whatever. U r jealous RT  Ok guys, if was your (cont)  
its too early for u to be playing practical jokes on me! Arghhhh lol haha so funny u got me. 
u have a beautiful..... Ummm.... Jetski 
that's Davide's Shoe RT“@BigSascha: Ok 12 sorry!! is that too small for you?? What size you like??  
that's not your shoe sasha! RT“@BigSascha: Ok 12 sorry!! is that too small 4you? What size you like?  
I hope your tv breaks 
dude u wear a size 7!! Hahahha liar!! Wow u lie so much!!! 
u NEVER asked me to watch a fight. U are a huge liar!!!! And u have a small foot!!! 
Am I the only one that is not watching the college games? 
hahahahah lol lol RT“@Serenasoldier: He's attractive on the outside though lol” 
Kid sister, kid sister! RT My buddy...my buddy... Whereva u go... RT Another night with ugh. Lol 
never invites us over. I kinda don't like him. He's so mean. I hope his party tonight ends in terror. 
Another night with ugh. Lol 
swagg!!! 
Yes now u do your schoolwork and stop tweeting... !! RT Doing schoolwork with (cont)  
Hahahaha!! I just scored 100% on my quiz in one of my classes! Yaaaahoo!!! 
To do : Read100 Pages in novel... Take quiz for class... Start next weeks homework... Dance class. Run a mile... 
To do : Read100 Pages in novel... Take quiz for class... Start next weeks homework... Dance class. Run a mile... 
My own bed..... My own TV.... My own pillows... There's no place like home. 
Try again. I'm happy I'm healthy enough to be able to.... 
Thanks! 
I'm not ignoring you! Hello! 
Get ready for Monday! I will be on HSN! I will be live starting at 12am. 
Visit www.DMVculture.com! Follow and To be featured contact RT 
 
I will be on HSN on Monday! Are you guys ready? 
I love Green day 
Ru ok my little kid? Aka Bad girl? RT I feel so sick :/ :( 
Low tide 
Sally and Jane just killed it on stage! Wow 
Do you really wanna see me crawl...... ? 
to be honest I think I started the rumors. Lol oops lol 
Ok my bud Stephen Hill just sung "Creep" by radiohead. Wow I've gotta step up game!!!! 
please. RT“@Rickonia: I wanna be ur official karaoke DJ” 
Don't lie to me lol hahahahaha RT Haha I'm glad somebody's out there living (cont)  
Really though nothing compares to you..... 
For the record I'm in love with she's amazing. 
that's the private show lol RT “@Rickonia: did u incorporate the splits we talked about?” 
My performances are amazing- my voice just sucks lol ha! 
I just sang "what's up" by 4 non blonds 
I will be singing nothing compares to you. I love Sinead O'connor. :) 
I hate when I'm at Karaoke and random people record my performance lol UGH!!! 
Going to karaoke what should I sing??? 
Really with the profile Pics? Its enuf... 
Wow weird. What a coincidence RT Packing earlier and somehow I found my wideleg jeans rolled up (cont)  
Gotta do that again ASAP! RT is it your fried chicken???! I still think about (cont)  
Fried chicken, yams, collard greens, macaroni and cheese... And Val. Perfect. . . Oh and hot sauce :) 
I just walked outside and its officially fall. Wind blowing and temperature just dropped. I miss the summer :( 
Dance lesson to music. Love it. Booty shaker. Hot hot hot. 
Where's my fellow Geek ? 
What kind of work? Homework.... #ImAGeekAndLoveIt 
I love you Yetunde 
Anytime! I'm smarta than I looka :) RT gnite miss meekalee, thanks for the school lesson! 
Goodnight I love u. And I miss you. 
Ran into a blast from the past. #Random time to go.... 
Yes it was a total Williams Invitational reunion! Lol RT good seeing u yesterday, & meeting Andy. 
Dedicating new NIKE court in Brooklyn. The Kids did not have a good court so it was redone- and now the kids have somewhere to play! :) 
Am I a geek for loving school? I love having to do papers, and listening to lectures. #weird 
Doing homework and getting ready for Vera Wang fashion show. She's amazing 
Me and decided to play mixed doubles Australia! We Love Aussie! ...... Book it its real! 
Awww and I love you! Love that you always check who I'm talking to! Lol RT I love this girl  
With we miss you Andys nuts!!!!! 
Karaoke for life 
I love u 
Lol welcome to the PC dinner lol gonzo! Whoooo! Love him RT OMG! what is happening right now??? I LOOOVE my life and friends! Ow! 
Love u lol ugh RT Gonzo could make it all better :) ....or not so much.. ready for the gamble. Xoxo 
Ugh Gonzo is on the brain. 
Congrats to Sam Stoser. She played amazing! As for me next time :) #serenapower 
My Thoughts and prayers to all who lost loved ones on 9-11. I know the entire country is with you today. I'm playing for you today. 
Tks guys 
9-11. Tomorrow. Wow. Ten years already. #NeverForgetOurHeros 
I'm using RED HOT now!!! 
Is there a rehab center for Red Hot Hot sauce. I've recently put red hot on my hummus, salads, watermelon, rice, & sweet potatoes. HELP 
Hey guys! Red or blue?Vote 4 ur fav of my on-court NY looks: #DayRed or #NightBlue & tag + #SerenaPower 4 chance 2 win both! 
#serenapower Let's Go! 
Tks for coming and supporting me on this US Open Journey. You guys are amazing. Love you. 
awww ur the best! Big kiss RT@JasonBinn: Just called 1of the only people I ever met that's continually inspiring&motivating 
Wow. Fashion Night out, Football game opener, Us Open Tennis... And I have homework :( 
I'm Missing Fashion Night Put. But for a good reason.... 
Just posted my first online class assignment. Oh boy this is going to be really hard..... 
awww tks lovely RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: Congrats to my role model and bestest Did it on em' #SerenaPower” 
me too. :) RT“@CaroWozniacki: Got cancelled for today. Will try again tomorrow, playing not before 1pm.” 
Preach preach! My Fellow Booty Brother!!! #gobigbutts lol 
Today is the last chance to win this sparkling racket & nail lacquer sets f/m OPI yet?  
what???? Lol hahahahahahahah 
Fun times 
Playing name that tune with as always I turned the game into a mean one lol. #meangirl 
Great episode of Keeping up with the Kardashians. West Coast be sure to tune in! #KKUTK love Mama Kris in it. 
I don't think I can ever share closets. #KUWTK is that bad?? 
Me!!!! RT“@KhloeKardashian: Who is watching KUWTK” 
u did great. So sad but next time. All my love xxxxxxxx 
excited for my match today.  
tks for support guys. is so supportive too... this is him 30 mins before match  
I'm getting ready for Keeping up with the karadashians. Yea. Cant wait. Be sure to watch!!! #KUWTK 
yeaaaa Congrats RT@MardyFish: Congrats to my best friend in the world on his first #1 song! Barefoot Blue Jean Night!” 
U can't believe how many drop shots, slice, serve and volleys, Volleys and Net approaches I do while watching (cont)  
lol I remember. Rewind lol RT “@Venuseswilliams: do you remember watching those matches? We had to study those films! Haha” 
Why am I in tears watching CBS special on Jimmy Conners? #ImTooSensitive 
Oops Liam Neeson 
:) muahhh 
Relaxing day- watching Unknown with Liam Nelson. Great movie. 
SING!!!!!!! 
hahahahahahaha $100 dollar bills only! Lol RT “@ivokarlovic: I wanted to throw some dollar bills at you.” 
Tks guys for support. How about them splits :) 
Preach sister RT“@VALgabond: Really mad that ABC has a show called "karaoke battle" ...that is NOT karaoke!! 
I'm buying yours now! Yea. Review shortly :) muahhh 
Did u buy the Carter IV? I did. Love lil Wayne :) 
baby!!! Congrats to u and Stephen. I love u. So happy. Now we can git giggy wit it. Lol. 
Netflix subscribers- I just found out prices go up today. It will show on your next bill! 
Actually I just turned... 
Filing nails, Watching bloomberg tv, and stock forecast. What's happening to me? #random 
Advise from single ladies is always best lol RT in lockerroom getting relationship advise from Serena and Venus= #trouble 
One of my passions is nails, what’s yours? Follow & tell ‘em what ur passion is 4 a chance 2 WIN!  RT 
Wow. Can't wait RT My first episode of #dropdeaddiva is airing on Sept. 4 at 9 pm on Lifetime!!! Don't miss it!!!! #Diva 
‎​Saw you wearing the bracelet...made me smile 
Had the best day. Today. Went into Graff for some amazing accessories to wear tomorrow night. Dripping in diamonds. Love Graff. Wow! 

....But never satisfied 
:) RT“@AngieBeyince: ; )” 
yea baby! U are gorg! RT“@ddlovato: Guess what, I'm healthy and happy, and if you're hating on my weight you obviously aren't. :) #UNBROKEN 
Weather report #hurricaneIrene NYC streets abandoned. Never seen ny like this in a sat night 
Getting ready for Irene. So far still smiling :) so far......  
#HurricaneIrene 
Ok. Its official. I'm scared. I'm in NYC. Oh boy..... #HurricaneIrine :( 
tks lady!!! RT“@JeanetteJenkins: Gorgeous Hamptons Cover Ladies!!!!!!!!!! Get it!!!!!” 
I missed u?? RT“@dutchessgp: I seen u. And u look kick a-- ready! U were parked right in front of me” 
Who saw me dancing at the NIKE NYC?? Still need a bit more work?? 
Had so much fun at the NIKE store. What a blast!!! Tks for everyone that came out!!! Yeaaa #serenapower 
My new snuggle buddy. The Cookie Monster :) nighty night  
Soooo excited to be back in NYC!!!  Can’t wait to celebrate with my fans at Niketown NY (@ to NTNY Facebook page) tomorrow! Go NIKE! 
we missed u!!! 
:) RT@HamptonsMag: Thanks for coming! RT going to see & for cover party #usopen” 
Had an amazing time at Hamptons Party tonight with Amazing cover. Tks guys!  
Had a wonderful luncheon with OPI and the fab editors of so many of my fav magazines! So much fun. All u ladies (&men) r amazing. Love u! S 
indeed genius! Wow RT“@lorenridinger: A legend in the making?  
I love to dance. 
baby I'm here!!! :) 
it's 3:11pm 
I've had my dog Jackie since high school. I named her after dog Jack. #LittleKnownFact 
Earthquake. Wow. "Earthquakes in one place after another". Paying and hoping everyone is ok. 
did u feel it??? Text me!! 
I'm obsessed. Sooooooo cute  
I still have "I got u baby" ringing in my ears. Lol ewwwwww lol lol 
Lala full court life. On vh1 9pm. It's almost on guys. Tune in!!! 
yeaaa so glad u liked it!!! I love that you like the OPI nail polish colors! yeaaa 
pole 
awwe ru the best RT@JasonBinn: I love walking into my home in the Hamptons & seeing &  
Cause he has a big.... Heart RT“@SableBop: haha...so why does he call himself bigsascha anyway?...lol :)” 
hahahahah RT“@LLe_mo:  - Hes so cutE! Swoon!!” 
hahahaha RT“@SvetlanaK27: agree!” 
do u love travel socks? lol ha! #nopride  
wow what a throat has. lol. but his top is beautiful. lol hahah  
I think is tired lol. hahaha  
One super short term goal- get through this workout with 
What are some of your goals? Short term and long term? 
Why not create a short term and long term goal for yourself. Work towards it. When you reach it- you will feel amazing! 
Pole... 
My best friend never leaves my side. together forever.  
Brahhh ha ha ha arg arg arggle arg!! RT“@Venuseswilliams: Oh noo! Beware of I have to watch my back!!!!” 
Dear Florida I missed u to do list: 1. Jump in Venus bed 2. Karaoke 3. Play prank on Venus. 4. Steal Venus dog. Busy day... 
Back on courts. Tks for support guys. 
lol. Oops :) RT“@HumphriesTaylor: your hair & I got to know each other pretty intimately on the dance floor last night” 
it's official. Tomorrow my love. Can't wait. Love you. So happy for u. May forever begin... Tomorrow :) 
Me and the girls (dogs) decided on "Don't be a menace to south central while you drinking your juice in the hood" #netflix 
i love your background and main pic :) 
Me and my dogs are deciding what movie to watch tonight. any suggestions? 
is on a date tonight. I hope its horrible. lol ha 
ant wee luv are onties and two!! 
jackie ant loorie were here. we luv yoo momm. 
love it, and u! RT@JasonBinn: Everyone is raving about your cvr &
 HOT!  
hey everyone. I'll be there next week. Can't wait. :) 
Hey everybody! 
Tonight's movie "The Iron Giant" :) #netflix 

Dinner with and We shut it DOWN. Chelsea is so pretty!!!!  
Dear I had the most difficult time zipping up my dress tonight. I had to go to my girls house for help. #notconvinced 
Me at tonight at her premiere party...having the time of our lives..!!  
Ahhhhh. I was gonna name mine casper. Lol. Thinking ofg a new name lol RT Yes!!! Join the (cont)  
Guys! Ill be ok! Ill be at the US open! I wanna be there just as much (more) as u guys want me to! :) I'm already doing better. 
If u can it would be my honor. But u first lady RT I want to come to NY to see you... 
Who cares. Lol I mean have fun. LOL RT Hahaha i wasnt part of those photos! 
Ahhhhh I love u more. :( RT I miss you & love you!!!!!!!! ;-( 
A Ghost white with blk on the inside. Hummmm should I??? 
Umm I'm going with my girl... Those pics u sent sash.... :( RT hey if u need a date (cont)  
Ghost!!!! 
Watching "Tangled" :) 
Headache. Cant sleep. Netflix 
Tks guys for all the support. Can't wait for my next event :) xx S 
lol. Can't wait. Well actually I can wait... RT“@SvetlanaK27: I still keep thinkin of our plan)))it stuning girl!” 
what's up buddy??!!! 
O 
She's so Lucky. She's a star. But she cry, cry, cries in her lonely heart. 
Ummmm yesterday I sung "blame it on the rain" by Milli Vanilli" I think I officially sung every song made lol. Almost..... 
You can be sure that it will only get better. 
tks love u2! Lol RT“@lala: Congrats to my girl for winning the Rogers Cup!!! So proud of u! Ur focused mannnnnnn! Wooohooo 
I put looking through someone's phone without them knowing right up there with cheating... 
Awake.... Thinking... Not a good thing..... 
tks love xx RT“@AnikaNoniRose: Congratulations to Still making dreams come true. Xo” 
haha lmao loved u tonite RT“@NICKIMINAJ: Congrats Serena!!!!!!! Man u just #ShittedOnEm ;)” 
as do you! RT “@KELLYROWLAND: You deserve it babe!! Love you!! Xoxo” 
as do you! RT “@KELLYROWLAND: You deserve it babe!! Love you!! Xoxo” 
:) miss u baby! RT She's baaaacccckkkk! so proud & happy 4 u...lookin forward to the US Open! 
Loved it babe. U are amazing. Your ass is on fire! RT And Serena Came!!!! Yaayyy!!!!! She looks FABULOUS!!!!! :) 
Loved it babe. U are amazing. Your ass is on fire! RT And Serena Came!!!! Yaayyy!!!!! She looks FABULOUS!!!!! :) 
:) miss u :) RT CONGRATS on your win!!! I wish you'd be playing here in LA so (cont)  
yea so excited. Love u!!! RT“@KimKardashian: OMG just won another tournament!!! She is on fire! Congrats love YOU!” 
Yea Mardy!! RT My boy rolled through the semifinals today and onto the Finals in Montreal. (cont)  
my last time to see the gorg On #femmefatale tour with and I'm in Toronto this could work... 
Junk tv 
Dear Twitter someone is using my name and sending tweets. They joined aug 5, 2011 and it's a false me but same EXACT name/spelling! Help!!! 
I LOVE Frank's Red Hot. Man oh man! 
Watching "Glory road" with tears I'm my eyes and chill bumps. Amazing story... #motivating 
I hope u have to pay for those meals, concert tix and all that other stuff .... 
Tk u :) RT“@Black_Dynamitee: WoW at profile pic, its amazing :)” 
tks. He is!! RT“@DCScorpian_1169: following hope he's good ” 
yes :) RT“@BoomFantana: you playing in the U.S. Open Serena?” 
u will enjoy them RT“@Mr_BDiddyChris: ill follow jus bc u said so” 
Yes RT“@derrickrussell: Following him! I've got tickets to the finals in Cinci meet me there and sign your book for me? 
Ok guys we gotta get a follow. He has great, inspiring, AND funny quotes. You will enjoy them. I do :) Retweet! 
u changed ur name? I thought someone hacked my account! Lol oops. Tell me if u change ur name. :) I liked ur other name... 
Stop thinking Serena. Just let it manifest. Maybe it will work. Who knows... 
Lol u crazy. RT“@BrittGastineau: Check your bbm ...who is that #yum” 
Percy Jackson Lightning thief. #INeedALife 
Movie tonight : "How to marry a Millionaire" a classic with Marylin Monroe. :) 
I could not be more sad that this will be the last season of Desperate Housewives. I was just about to move to wisteria lane. 
ummmm hello I miss u remember me??? :) 
Now watching "Gentlemen prefer blonds" #classic 
Funniest movie EVER LOL!!!! #DiaryOfAWimpyKid 
Watching "Diary of a wimpy kid" this is so funny!!! Lol 
They already have :) RT someday somebody's gonna make you wanna turn around and say goodbyeeeeeeeeeee 
I have a mean headache 
I die :( RT Bad news 'Desperate Housewives' fans! ABC confirmed season 8 will b the last walk down Wisteria Lane  
I'm so into shorts this summer. And tops with a bit of stomach showing. #lovingsummer 
Why am I Watching spongebob squarepants? 
#sleepover with can't believe I'm leaving u Tomm :( 
Up late with always has soooo many stories. Next one please! Lol 
just called me reckless. Lol ugh 
Going to see Emily's Army.... :) #concertnight 
No u may not..... 
please send me my son..... 
goodnight my love RT“@Venuseswilliams: Gnite and twitter fans.” 
Me too. I love u sooooo much!!! Its crazy RT“@Venuseswilliams: Dinner with love being with my sis” 
oh yea not like me!!!!RT “@ogeedm8: haha ohhhh I'm ready and waiting ;)” 
yes and no... RT“@KimKardashian: If u could do it all over again...would u do it the exact same way?” 
planning our WPB with you. :) can't wait. Get those smackers ready.... 
yes air supply on deck RT No better way to celebrate yet another trophy... Karaoke!! Congrats So proud of you! 
I can't blame him. U would be the same If u felt my wrath :) 
Jealous??? RT“@BigSascha: Can everybody please help to find a new hobby and send her some ideas...” 
Hey guys i hate jeans. Can everyone tweet #sashaneedsnewjeans Tks :) 
tks mindy. Ummm so overdue for lunch.... 
yeaaa Tksss :) homebound now! Muahh love u 2!! “@KrisJenner: congratulations doll!! Wooohooooo!!!!!! Love you! Xxoxo” 
Omg so happy!!! Tks guys I finally feel like I'm back. This title is just one of many. Tks so much! Love u all!! Xx 
gosh I miss u ladies :) 
Kelly on Leno tonight! Whoooooo!!! RT Photo:  
WR for my buddy congrats!!! Now for sure I owe u karaoke hour! :) 
Miami is really popin' now with the addition of welcome to the dolphins. Fins up!! 
Love #HereIAm Album. My fav song? "I'm dat chick"Cause.... well I am! Love it! Tks Kels!!! 
new name- for the muppet... Cookie Monster due to excess pounds 
Having dinner with an old friend the legendary Scotty Scott He's telling me the ultimate story about his love disaster LOL fun times. 
My gosh he's gotten large..... Gym time. Fitness = healthy longer life. #dodgedabullet 
lol I love u.. 
Story u can tell:I'll never get more than 3 points off Serena playing lefty :) RT Stories you can't tell until I'm gone 
get #HereIAm album! It's NOW on itunes  
Mel! I MISS YOU! When I'm back I will finally be able to come over for dinner! :) kiss kiss and one kiss 4 the belly :) 
..... But I was a practical person and did my best. 
I know how hard it is to decide that u don't care about someone simply because they don't care about u. U just can't unplug your heart. 
Who pre ordered Kelly album "Here I Am" it is out this tuesday but pre order it here: bit.ly/qgdTUc 
The things says. Insane. So funny. 
I miss my girls (dogs) they are with their grampa (my dad) I miss them so much I wanna cry :( ill see them tomm though. Until than... :( 
yea u too u guys are both haters!! Ugh"lol“@StevenTaylor: he sounds like me! Ha.” 
thx 2 I'll always B single Every time I say sum1 is cute he points out something in them that's so tru & I change my mind ugh lol 
u looks amazing. I'm off to steal that look u has today soooo pretty :) see u soon!! 
u better save me next time!!!!! Hahahahahaha lol 
you looked radiant today.love u enjoy this moment. Always amazing seeing you and and 
Me either. Being here with u makes it even better!! RT Wow never thought I'd make it to a soundgarden concert... 
Black hole sun 
Burden in my hand 
The day I tried to live.... 
Soundgarden concert with #serenapower. Love Chris Cornell!!!  
My fav thing to relax me- mani and pedi. Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhh 
tears in my eyes too. Omg I'm so emotional lol. So happy for u. I'm on track crying and running. Lol. I love u tons 
Ok guys my baby my soul my friend album is out this tuesday. Titled- pre-order it here:  I just did! 
Do bees have Knees?? 
when does she leave? 
I did the dougie for the NY fans yesterday... I hope I dis a decent job... I love dancing 
Fool me once shame on me.... Fool me twice... Well that's never happened before. 
4 days 7 different cities... Man. A new one today!! 
Follow and visit their website for a wide selection of content on music, culture, fashion, arts and more. Its supa dope! :) 
Love NIKE town on mercer... 5 pairs of fresh shoes. :) thanks Wes for helping me! Muahhh  
On my way to my fav shop in NYC. NIKE on mercer they have the coolest stuff!!! 
Just when i thought this 24 hrs could not get worse.... It did 
what does that mean? Not fair! “@BorisKodjoe: I don't like right now<Einfach kurz eine auf die Fresse hauen!” 
love your new name and your new pic and you!!!!!!!!! Muahhh 
too many forehand can make you go nuts. 
u love me u love me! RT“@BigSascha: I really don't like right now!! It takes everything in me to stay professional...” 
lol not that desperate yet... RT“@Rickonia: watch CSPAN” 
Tks for fixing my Internet connection. Now I can watch avatar the last air bender and hopefully fall asleep :) love u 
I'm back Thursday let's get it in!!! RT“@itsgabrielleu: Sooo karoke??!! I'm back n LA! Let's gooo!RT 
I think I have insomnia or "I'm so tired I can't sleep" 
yes that would knock me out!!! But I don't have any :( RT“@Ghana_Grrl: nyquil!!” 
I can't sleep up to 48 hrs now. Help :( 
So awesome Rt“@nikkij2079: loved you on HSN earlier. I bought my purse,wallet, and boyfriend shirt!!” 
Hey guys!!! I'm live on HSN now! Tune in!!! So many amazing things to choose from! Xx Retweet 
Im on HSN -Midnight to 2am east coast time. 9pm to 11pm west coast time. 
OMG sooooo excited about tonight on HSN. U can't believe how special the BAG I'm selling is. Tune in to see. OMG so cool... :) retweet! 
Please tune in tonight HSN... Ill be on starting midnight. Who's watching? :) we have amazing new fashions Retweet!!!!! 
It would be really cute if the lady soccer players wore cute tennis dresses. I could design them... 
Practice time... But I wanna wanna watch USA ladies football (soccer) 
Dear Bed, my have I missed you, and my teddy bear. Feels good to be wrapped in your covers :) Love S 
History. #serenapower :)  
Me and my gal Val. Fun times  
Congrats Adrienne u need to change your name asap! :) 
Yeaaa! Will be fun! Until than... :( (sad face) RT Missed all u guys as well! We'll hook up soon :-) 
I miss seeing you today. :( Hope to see u soon 
Me and my girl Val chillin at the beach :) 
a beautiful day for 2 amazing people.... 
let's get up Tomorrow... 
Jetting out of LA.... 
Omg I just sang your song. When do I have the pleasure to sing with u?? RT when are we gonna sing karaoke?! 
come over my house 
Dear Alan Thicke it was super nice meeting you tonight :) You are really cool. Show me that smile again Serena 
getting ready for Hamptons shoot with u keep making it happen. :) 
Kerry u looked amazing!!! Gabs we missed u!! :) 
Dinner with my sister. Love u Isha! #serenapower  
Tks to for my #espys look luv u guys! 
Great motivating stories..... #espys I'm pumped #serenapower 
Why did I get soooooooooo nervous when I saw from a distance. Lol #bieberfever #neversaynever 
I love u Venus. we r having a sleep over. Just about to start. #girltalk time :) 
So motivated 6:30 and karaoke time still! Let go!! #serenaandvenuspower 
Me and ly love love u baby! #selitapower :)  
Me and Dirk cool!! #serenapower  
Some pics from tonight.... Stay tuned #Serenapower 
U there?? RT Here we gooooooooooooo 
Can't wait!!! :) RT Listening 2 New Edition's "You're Not My Kinda" on way 2 (cont)  
:) RT Serena Williams ESPY party...legendary as always! 
I am wearing one of your Rachel Roy designs to the #espys so excited for u guys to see! #serenapower 
Watching movie "white chicks". Omg soooo funny 
Busy day today. 
Selling out stadiums like a rock star... 
U guys gotta check this out! :) lol thoughts??  
Ok ok I can't choose. :) RT RT Dear California, My have I missed you. Yours forever, Serena<-- Cali>Florida 
Dear California, My have I missed you. Yours forever, Serena 
Finally... at dulles airport, and I don't have nostalgia... I'll never forget you. . . 
It was my honor to have Michelle Obama out last night watching the tennis match. I hope I played well enough for the first lady! :) 
I'm excited to play tonight in DC. I love tennis #Serenapower 
i just saw your twitter background ... Me like :) 
He was so Fall/Winter. Like a good pair of shoes -you are now worn out. You were not even that comfortable. And definitely not worth it. 
Hahahhah ummm... :) RT Just saw an influx of songs requested for the wedding reception was that you??? :) 
Stay tuned..... 
Hummmmm..... 
I'm watching it now in the UK! :) love it! RT Keeping Up With The Kardashians season 6 premieres (cont)  
Just had one of those "what was I thinking??!!!" moments. Ugh 
I got a new Teddy Bear Today. My old Teddy was a bit jealous and got into a fight with the new one...  
I don't eat meat. does. She got ravioli. I sampled it. I loved it. Finished it. Turns out it was deer meat. I die I die 
it was my joy and honor to meet u and your family... All my love to my best bud :) 
#SerenaPower  
and his family are so brave. 
a little sumthin I did today... met he came to the tennis today..and Is gonna watch me Tomm :)  
Ahhhhhhh OMG watching on hawaii 5-0 awww in LONDON. Love my baby! #serenapower 
got punished and sent to the corner ....  
Check me in People mag hottest bodies :)  
Hey Guys! Are you ready for a new photo? 
The only thing next my doubles partner and hall of fame song writer is a tennis title. #serenapower 
#serenapower Congrats to for the songwriters hall of fame- cool. Super talented yup yup! 
is on a shopping spree........... with my wallet lol she forgot hers again... Anything for my big sis.... 
I love !!!!  
#London baby! RT“@VALgabond: single gals take London part 1 ....  
Single girl gone wild. #London  
Thanks to Christopher Bailey and for my look tonight. Love you. :)  
Love u big bro :) RT Couldn't be happier sitting here watching rerun from her (cont)  
Hey guys. I really appreciate the support and love from all of you. My heart soars with pride when I see all of (cont)  
got a promotion to carry more than just my bags. :) #cowgirl  
I could not love u more. Tks. :) u keep me up :) 
Psalms 34:18 Jehovah is near to those that are BROKEN at heart, and those who are crushed in spirit he saves. 
You can't believe everything u read... U also can't be blind and stupid. My eyes are now open. Just2think what I would have done for u #Hurt 
love all his music! RT@psloveejustus: that new j.cole record 'lost ones' mannnn let me tell you !” 
No more Jake owen/karaoke for u... Lol RT@MardyFish: is mad at me :( 
u must have never heard of don't mess with the Compton cadets whoop whoop. I can't wait for this!!! 
bet? Be ready to loose 10 mins 10 shots 4 the loser. Go heat!!! 
check dm 
call me 
Soon baby soon. We reunite!!! RT“@KhloeKardashian: love you!!!! Need to see you woman!” 
I'm so excited for the season premiere of Keeping Up With The Kardashians Season 6 tonight on E! #KKUTK6 congrats ladies I love u! RETWEET 
Best season yet. I cannot wait!! RT“@KimKardashian: The premier of Keeping Up With The Kardashians Season 6!!!” 
I brought a portable karaoke machine brave singers only! :)  
I brought a portable karaoke machine brave singers only! :)  
And of course straight outta Compton" by NWA 
I'm gonna shock them with "did it on em" by nick minaj lol or "dreams money can by" by drake 
omg I LOVE karaoke!!! Let's do it on rain delays! What's your go to song?? I'm in!!!!!! Let's go! :) 
#Ibetyoudidnotknow I'm severely claustrophobic.... 
I'm not a girl. Not yet a woman... 
I love u. Tks love 
And the drum beats on..... 
tk god ur like my brother. Ewww 
just said he could never date me cause too many people check me out and stare at my butt.. He would be fighting too much. Hmmm 
So cute....  
My baby girl wants to go with mommy... So cute....  
You can't win them all. There's always one that u can't catch..... Yet... 
Say what?? I can't hear you... Yup thats right- Serena's back :) 
wasting away again in margaritaville RT“@BryantMckinnie: My lil sis came 2 visit & watch the game.” 
I'm glad u don't mind my silly stories. Lol RT@BryantMckinnie: My lil sis came 2 visit & watch the game.” 
I agree RT“@rihanna: Brandy is the best...and that is just it!!! These vocals NEVER get old” 
I like u on a whole nother level. 
"Can't wear skinny jeans cause my ..... don't fit" #federer 
Me and Nadal are Booty siblings! We see cheek to cheek 
Wow Nadal and his booty is killing it! he's amazing. 
Nadal has a big booty... :) lol 
Wow both these fellas have swagg lol. #RolandGarros #french open 
I will 4ever be mad at u 4making me go 2 that small corporate concert last summer in LA. I just haven't been the same since :( 
I love hard. And I fall harder. My heart is foolish. 
I still have my favorites (smile).... but its cool to listen and hear new stuff. 
I'm so late and so NOT hip... am I the only one that just realized that j.cole music is DOOOOPE??? I'm so slow lol 
cant sleep as usual 
me tooooooo RT“@shesonfire: I am afraid of losing my best four legged friend!” 
the only time I fail is when u don't try RT “@AkilKB: failure...oh and crazy hobos :/” 
Failure is great it builds character and trains u to be better. Failure is healthy RT“@CheezoBIHH: I'm afraid of failing” 
Me too RT “@MonicaVaval: Possums” 
me too RT“@standupguyxxx: Love.” 
That's beautiful.Stay close to him RT@expressivelyme: suffocating! But ultimately stayin out n the world away from jehovah 
righhhttt??!!! RT“@MonkeeSass: Flying roaches "startle" me ... #SoFlo” 
lol 
Also rejection. I'm afraid of rejection... 
Very few things scare me more than frogs. I hate frogs. They r everywhere where I live.. What scares u? 
it was an unfinished match 
Y am I watching old cartoons?? On a friday night? Wow... 
haha jerk lol 
So 2day my dad questioned my choice of music. I was listening to "No Hands" by Waka Flocka Flame. He told me I needed to pick up a book lol 
U baby of course RT@MsSelitaEbanks: haha me or the pancakes?” 
hubba hubba. :) 
Look who I spotted on the bottle.... me!!! That's G! :)  
Serena please get out of bed!!!!! 
is soooooo funny and he like gonzo..... :) 
Enjoying a night with my buddy fun times indeed. He's crazy (don't tell him I said that) :) 
At the heat gams with  
I am really looking forward to watching new show #TheWorldAccordingToParis Tonight at 10pm on . Gonna be good... 
aw tks Coming soon... RT@JeanetteJenkins: Tennis just isn't the same without on the court smashing the ball &kicking butt! 
My babies sleeping this am.... Sooooo cute!!!!!!  
U did not call me :( RT@psloveejustus: So I called all of my friends. No one can bother to return my call. Hmm ohkay.” 
I am thankful that I have today. Tomorrow is not promised to any of us. I'm gonna make every day the best I can. #loveuSeankingston 
Every morning there are ducks in my pool... This morning I saw them having sex. They look guilty...  
I'll see u later today. I love u so much. 
told me I defied all laws of time, space, and truth. Hummm :) 
I'm a shy girl. I sometimes over act to compensate. 
I can't wait to get back to work. Im thinking it's the only thing that can heal me. Ive tried EVERYTHING else. 
Life throws u curve balls... I can't seem to hit mine for the life of me. It keeps curving into me..... 
Fellas it's so impt to have swagg!!!!! 
Asking for trouble... 
Thank you in advance lol 
Miami baby!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
not sad just an gesture!!! 
:( 
sexy... swaggggggg 
Watching game by myself. (and you guys)? 
I am really loving basketball this season. First time ever! 
Disappointing day I guess 
I'm uber emotional. I am tearing up while watching Juwanna Mann... Lol 
Ohhhhhhhhhhhhh :) 
So inconsiderate. No class. Just a disappointment. Overall you lost cause I'm a winner. 
flip a coin night?? Really?? Wow lol just wow 
congrats congrats congrats. I die I die I can't believe it!! Wow oh wow! Here we go love. Congrats baby. Love u so much! Wow 
Awake 
Golden girls + Teddy bear = Serena's night again. #Iloveit 
Finally got that distraction
:) 
:) RT“@FutureMrsBosh: Game Time :)  
Who exactly is the boogie man? . I am glad he never came and got me! 
tks #monster RT@MackieShilstone: excellent effort today. Will pay dividends when it counts. More challenges ahead tomorrow 
I know thats right!! RT“@DJHYPEKING: Please VENUS DON'T HAVE NOTHING ON MY COACH GET A GRIP SMH!” 
I will we will take down. U are a star! Bryant is weak 
Man everything lol I took down another "EC" member. U next!! RT damn !! What I miss!!!! 
Lol :) RT@BryantMckinnie: RT man oh man......( U some how always seem 2 amaze me with ur stories. Lol) 
man u needed to be in town yesterday! Lol 
man oh man........ 
He's like a Cancer to me. 
here I come. I'll see u soon!!! 
I will never grow up lol RT“@Khyriealleyne: Leave me Alone!!! You silly!!!@serenawilliams” 
awww tks u r so sweet ;) RT“@KellzOzBorne: Man is so beautiful!” 
Every now and than I fall apart...... 
Two fist tease.... 
always has the best tweets. So cool y'all gotta follow him... But Only if u r lookin for cool tweets!! :) 
:) tks love!!! :) :) 
My lil bro follow him he's so funny and sweet!  
Wow I've NEVER seen this! For 2 dollars I can straighten my hair for 2 mins in the bathroom! Ummmmm ok?? Lol  
..... But God 
You can have everyone, but still have no one. 
With a great friend and more. I love u so much :) 
Awwwwww sooo cute. Jackie and my Teddy cuddling. Move Jackie! That's mommy's bear!!  
You're apart of me and you don't even know it. I'm what you need but I'm too afraid to show it ... 
Dear your little sister need a favor. Please call her when u can :) 
lol omg I missed your call cause I was singing!! Lol haha sorry!! I have a problem... Calling u now 
Just finished michael Bolton. How am I supposed to live without you 
Omg my sister Isha is singing New kids on the block!!! Hahah lol LMAO Hanging tough wow! Who knows that song!?? 
just ordered new karaoke cd's. I am about to have a heartattack!!!Cancel everything for today! Karaoke starts NOW!!! 
love RT “@ryanlochte: U gotta love how takes good care of their athletes. New addition to the house. Jeah!!  
nooooooooo RT“@FITNESSdig: lol, I'm gonna kidnap your teddy” 
I'm watching the golden girls now. With my loyal Teddy bear 
maybe I should too RT “@SteveFitzhugh: Karaoke” 
Wow. Just wow 
Ok here we go!!! 
and I had chicken and Brown rice. Salad too ;) 
everybody knows I'm a ....... MONSTER RT“@MackieShilstone: awesome training session today. Building a monster .” 
I don't believe in luck. Luck is when preparation meets opportunity. If you fail to prepare you are preparing to fail. 
Serena 
I love u with my life. Enjoy your day. Xx Your cousin 
I love all my followers have a great night. Love u!! 
Hey - tell me how u are doing!! :) 
look I'm training finally RT@BryantMckinnie: once again is here n the studio & no u lol 
I wanna be Mackie fit. RT“@MackieShilstone: there is Mackie Fit and Serena fit.” 
lol I miss my bestest RT“@BryantMckinnie: I was just sayin hello, but just remind me not 2 do that again lol” 
what? RT“@BryantMckinnie: HI” 
Omg I love it and its free! Lol RT“@MackieShilstone: I taught about Dragon Dictation.” 
Sleepy 
oh yea. Go Bey! Can't wait wow RT“@AngieBeyince: Tune in Wednesday May 18th to see Beyonce on American Idol !” 
look what happened last time I did... 
Im watching. Go Eva! RT@lorenridinger: Check my girl tonight on Lopez tonight will she wear jewels tonight? Wait and see 
Karaoke 
There's a method to my madness...... 
#desperatehousewives my fav show EVER 
Wow. Talent. Looks. Swag 
Addicted to basketball this year 
Ummm wow sooo sexy.... 
let's do it again!!!! Lol whoop whoop 
I Cant tell u the last time I got something nice that wasn't from my sisters... I think it was the summer of 1934 
Surprise her. Take her out. Buy her something nice. Above all be considerate. 
Running in the rain. I've always wanted to do that!  
Ok tweeple what do u think?? RT“@GlobalGrind: Hey you should put your sexy twitpic back up, right now!  
Thank U I love you RT Hey U should put your sexy twitpic back up right now!  
Cant eat, can't sleep. Don't wanna think. 
omg so jealous RT“@KimKardashian: What a fun night! Xo RT Thanks -Brit” 
I Love RT “@DwightHoward: Heeeeeyyy world if u got beiber fever like I do. Pls go get his new DVD. It came out today. 
tonite?? 
Dear I woke up to your song "Fly" . You motivated me. I realized I came to win, fight, conquer, to thrive. I'm ready to win! Tks 
oh yea oh yea baby :) RT“@KimKardashian: Just landed! Ready to take Miami all weekend!!!” 
should I change it? 
dm me 
lol lol lol RT“@IamRRA: almost passed out thanks to WTH!!!” 
My thanks to all of you guys for the love and support. I will miss Paris however, I am working hard to make my return unforgettable. 
lol. I misssss u!!!!! RT“@psloveejustus: ohh ohkay. I wasn't aware. Lol.” 
I'm hungry but don't wanna make the effort to eat... 
:) RT@thisdjchill: I think every man needs to check out new Avatar.... Its like a Master Card moment........ PRICELESS!!! 
On boat with and uber girl talk..... 
yes we miss u!!! RT“@nataliaroks: heyyy! U at U3 :( with andrew” 
So HOTTT RT RT s/o to my dawg his artist new mixtape dropped and its dope 
‎​I am on the way to the Miami Heat game with my freind Jen from Whoop whoop!!! 
Teddy and I are having another golden girls night... Yup yup 
Diondria the snitch!!! Lol RT“@DriaMusic: omg Hey herlyn remember me diondria?” 
omg u gotta check out remember her?? 
OMG!!!!!!!! 
tell me your #HOODmemories 
#childHOODmemories dodging bullets. lol hahahha (serious) 
#childhoodmemories the candy house, and the house that sold iceies for 25 cents lol #HOODmemories lol 
The donut only came by once a day. It was some of the best donuts of my life. I credit it for my butt! :) 
#childhoodmemories corn on the cob carts. Only in Compton 
#childhoodmemories ice cream truck, and the donut truck. Only in LA!!! 
Writers block 
I'm going to google you. We were not saying that 10 years ago. 
lol ours was Bo Bo land lol LOL RT RT #childhoodmemories jumping from couch to couch because the floor was lava..Ha!!! 
can't wait!!! RT“@BrittGastineau: Excited for our Gastineau Glamour collection on tonight at midnight pst and 3am est” 
lol it is lol not... RT“@Rickonia: sounds like a wild and crazy night” 
i just finished my college entry letter. I hope it's enough. It's so redundant. It's hard. Can I email it to u? 
Golden girls night with my Teddy bear :) 
Wow oh wow. Overtime. 
Ummm did I just see Zack Morris on a commercial?? Love him!! 
ru back? 
Omg this game!!!!! 
I'm working out. I'm working hard. I will make you all happy. Ill be back soon. :) 
I want some candy. Preferably orange slices... 
What should me and my loyal teddy bear watch tonight? suggestions? 
Water.... almonds 
Getting ready to watch #khloeandlamar this is good!! Its on NOW tune in!! 
Lol love 
I asked her how she was going to pay and she said I was. And if I dident want to she was gonna drive home and make me walk. Lol ahh big sis 
Me and drover her car to grocery store today and she got all kinds of stuff... I noticed she did not have a wallet..... 
Hey Hey Hey Heeey! 
I'm at karaoke now to!! Lol just finessed green day. And brittney spears“@DriaMusic: At Karaoke doin rude boy gettin my Riri swag on” 
Its been a while and I have been struggling but I still love !!!! 
I need to!!!! 
Lol I'm a #loser RT Had 2 cheer up who is trying 2 avoid heartbreak, she (cont)  
Just finished crying my eyes out to sorry Bryant. Lol that's what big bros are for!!! I'm better.... For now...... 
where u at? 
#neversaynever 
I love u!!!!! 
I found your phone case online!!! Now I won't harass u for yours!! Lol so cool... I totally stole your phone style! 
can I have that feeling?? RT“@Zef_B: Something good is going to happen soon. I can feel it.” 
neh. Never that. “@Rickonia: its called being bored easily” 
I realized I am really picky..... Hummmm lol but only after a few months... Is that weird?? 
ru sleep now cause here I come! RT I'm so tired bc I didn't get a wink last night guarding my phone from 
meeting up w/ weekend besties & Bryant if you know who, or whathisname, or so and so is there imma punch u 
what r we doing today??? 
don't let anyone steal your smile!Don't be anxious over anyone liking or accepting YOU. Focus on the ones that already do :) 
Hello 
No sleep... Scary thoughts 
u forgot my invite? RT“@BryantMckinnie: Club BED is PACKED 
go to sleep... Shut your pretty eyes. That's when I sneak into your room and tear up!!! Whoo hoooo! 
Very soon- now shut your eyes... RT I'm so jumpy, I clasp my phone tight, constantly looking (cont)  
I love your profile pic. :) 
that's ironic. I'm watching trading spaces too RT Watching trading with the lovely but untrustworthy 
I'm waiting on you to leave so I can steal ur phone RT Watching trading with the lovely but untrustworthy 
sitting next to just relaxing. I need to do this more often. 
noooooo come back!!! PleaseeeRT“@CMilianOfficial: hey Babe, where's your side at now? If its Miami I was just out there!” 
#thatoneperson that u simply cant forget 
chrissy! how are you? come to my side of the USA!! :) i guarantee fun times!!! 
#jackmarshallrules 
5am karaoke w/ Andrea, and Jordan! Wow #classic 
4am karaoke lol 
love!!! Lol RT“@VALgabond: L is for...” 
I'm there RT U got over 900 Dj's n town this weekend 4 The Core Dj Retreat, New artist I suggest u make ur way 2 the events 
u stole me shoes!!! I'm gonna burn your feet !! RT“@Venuseswilliams: Wearing shoes to dinner, wow so comfy!” 
NOOOOOO!!!!! :( :( RT Harry will be withdrawn from your school! 
Ugh. Can I have some fun?? Lol RT Its a shame when you aren't safe in your own home...when (cont)  
I can't wait to have your son Harry. And please write that paper. Tks lil sis 
Awwww u r the best 
umm let get together!!! RT@MindyWeiss: Palm beach here we come!” 
Has anyone tried the red or white shatter from It comes in my collection! 
Check out my interview with  
Can you say sparkle? W/ my new shades your nails will be HOT! 
Check out my interview with 
:( come back!!! 
aww believe me big bro 2day was amazing 4me too!! RT“@BryantMckinnie: 2day was 1 of my best days ever thanx 2 my lil sis 
needs her sisters and fans more than ever... Won't believe her announcement! On #BFV on 9/8c  #ad 
Just saw (a fellow karoker) perform fun. 
Loving New York! My have I missed u. On my way to the MET gala. 
lol hahahah “@serenafan97: LMAO hahahaha You have my dying laughing lolol” 
Should I wear the booty pop? Lol hummmm... Thoughts?? 
FINALLY FOUND IT!!!!!!! Lol hahahaha YESSSSSSS  
My second set of Glam Slam duos f/m drops this week! 
Omg my hotel room brings back soooooo many memories!!!!!!! Ahhhhhhhh I die I die. Sad sad face, But with a smile :) 
I am learning "how to get out of my own way"!! :) 
Yea! Big bro. Can't wait. :) :) RT Nice 2 be n Miami, Bout 2 meet up wit 2 finish watching The Heat Game! 
LET'S GO HEAT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#miamiheat 
love u guys RT“@kmcme: RT Miracle working for the MET with Pulling this off will be a major Style Coup!” 
whatever!! RT“@BigSascha: Simply too easy!! Hehe  
Ill check it out now. How's my buddy Jack? RT Hi Serena hope you are well? have (cont)  
lol check this out! LOL he's saying "Sheets" and "Sheet"... interesting. stay tuned....  
I knoooooww next sat u and me! And relaxin!! Lol 
miss u more. Come home!!! RT“@KELLYROWLAND: Miss You!!” 
Omg I never laughed so hard. Chillin with my family. Omg omg I'm dying laughing this is great. 
Haha lol haaha RT“@KELLYROWLAND: Shout out to who motivates alot of men!!! LOL” 
philanthropist RT“@m_kerim_dinar: i think serena , you are tennis player, singer, actress, model., a strong woman and ???” 
what about the ladies (like me) who motivate their puppy's RT“@KELLYROWLAND: Shoutout to all the ladies who motivate their man!” 
lol haha so I don't get a shout out lol RT“@KELLYROWLAND: Shoutout to all the ladies who motivate their man!” 
yes south east tennis and learning center... 
Finished a great day with the kids at the south east learning center in DC. Amazing. 
got it RT“@KellzOzBorne: RT please send me that track so I can write on it!!! <==== CHECK EMAIL NOW!” 
stop laughing at me!!! Lol lmao!!! Lol 
please send me that track so I can write on it!!! 
getting my tix ASAP! RT“@NICKIMINAJ: Femme Fatale Pre-sale Tickets + VIP Packages available today! -  
I have to because if not I'll be snacking. RT“@BryantMckinnie: I can't believe ur actually going 2 sleep” 
I have to go to bed now because if not I for sure will have a cookie or something. I'm almost 24 hrs with no sugar!!! Gnight... 
Hey guys I'm almost 24hrs with NO sugar!!! :) the toughest hrs are starting .... NOW 
Ugh just had a slither of cake!!! Lol help guys I'm starting my 24 hr no sugar NOW. How will I survive! 
lol where u at??? Lol 
Karaoke-ing Racks by YC with LOL  
Lol about to karaoke Racks by YC hahahahah! 
ULTIMATE karaoke session! RT“@VALgabond: just another typical tuesday night gathered around the karaoke machine  
with the sweets?? 
So I had grapes instead of sweets but I had a slice of cake earlier today.... :( I hope it all goes- well u know where. :) 
Tomm it is! :) lol RT“@JordanHOLLYWOOD: I Just Finished Mixing The beat Lets get in the studio Tomorrow!” 
We need to link up asap!! RT in the studio working on track for Serena Williams!!!!! 
Guys I need ur help.... I cnt stop eating sugar/candy/cake. I wnt 2 go 24hrs sans anything sweet. Any suggestions? maybe a straight jacket? 
:( dang ru?? We need to hang so i can beat u... Lol RT“@jprince713: u in Miami this weekend?” 
Been real busy guys! Hows everyone's day??? 
me and my cough are off to bed 
ummmm Tanya???!!!!! 
I think I don't sleep enough and that's why I can't get rid of my cough... 
Can't shake this cough.... 
Its night time already?? 
where u at ? 
Mornings + Serena =  
Spending the day with . Nice 
U know what tomm is? Khloe and Lamar time! TUNE in guys!!!! Its a good one!!! !!!!! 
I tricked into a gonzo convo! Lol hahah 
Ok so I'm with and because I was late I'm banned from mentioning anything about Gonzo to him.. Dannnng!!!! Lol 
I'm so jealous!!!! RT“@KhloeKardashian: You were missed mama” 
Seeing that I'm the ultimate fan and insanely psycho 4 I'm so sad I wasent in LA yesterday :( #MUSTSEETOUR 
I spotted that girl at practice again.... Good day. Good day... 
When u are sleeping someone's working. . . . 
where u at? 
If I fall now... land wont be light 
I WAS my worst enemy.. I've learned... I hope it isnt too late. 
i just found #whereyouat on a karaoke CD. just ordered it and i cannot WAIT to sing it!!!! ahhhh love you!!!! 
Bed, 2 dogs, my teddy bear, and the Golden Girls on TV until I fall asleep. #usualnight 
Morning Guys. Please #FF Follow my friend he's only 5 fighting brain cancer, and is so brave. I love you Jack! 
tks for ur prayers :) 
hang in there buddy! RT@Dr_RDrez 
tks love. :) so nice!!! RT@nek_brab 
yeaaaaa go heat !!!! 
now u MUST follow 
awww I'm crying top so sweet RT“@BOWDOWNTOirvine: IM CRYING, IM CRYING, OMFGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGG .” 
:) 
heeeey!!!!! 
don't give up u are so close!!!! RT“@BOWDOWNTOirvine: i still love you though .” 
lol RT“@nek_brab: is already taken by yours truly!!! *clears throat* lmaoo xD” 
ur tweets are... Well.... Wild.. I'm more reserved.. RT“@BOWDOWNTOirvine: you can tell my tweets that im in LOVE w/ .” 
come on heat!!!!! RT Calling in my cheerleaders from afar :)” 
Enjoying spending time in the bachlorette pad with (dorthey) (sophia) and (rose) 
UNDEFEATED. And u can't take away my belt... :) whenever ur ready.... RT“@jprince713: lmfao” 
I'm back baby! We need dinner plans so much to talk about :( RT“@lorenridinger: Where did my friend go:) I miss u xoxox” 
LOVE IT!!! Next year!!! RT“@BryantMckinnie: RT I been practicing for the tournament next yr lol (me 2!)” 
Omg best time EVER right!Also practice for the after party RT“@jprince713: I been practicing for the tournament next yr lol” 
I'm about to have a serious discussion with the woman in the mirror.... She MUST make a change. Else she's gonna be a roomate forever! 
when?? 
Good morning Jack your smile made me smile this morning Kisses  
Skipping dinner going 2 bed instead. 
The veteran just made a rookie mistake. Ugh... 
I am praying for your Jack, and your Brave Mommy, and Daddy 
Sometimes I get so emotional... I need to toughen up!!! 
I really want to buy a pair of heels.... Ughhh 
ru gonna join us.... ???? 
lol bryant what ru up to? Let's karaoke later this week!!! 
Just finished mani with my gal Val She's so funny.. 
Ok guys thanks for helping me harass he finally responded. Lol good night! Muahh 
u are so mean!!! RT@BryantMckinnie 
Guys is still ignoring me. Now I'm sad... :( 
is ignoring me guys. Please tweet him and tell him Thats not nice... 
what was her name?? RT“@TheeBeatless: My grandma taught you in first grade at Mark Twain :)” 
I totally agree!!! RT“@YoshiBInc: #yallneedtobreakup if you need to check his/her phone!” 
just sent me my work from last night.... Gonna be funnnnnn ! Tks Big bro!! 
OMG! I see! Someone is wearing serena Signature statement shoe!!! My HSN collection!! wow! I'm honored! 
Bonjour 
B major raised me! LOL  
Hahahaha.... Ummm what? Who?? Not me? LOL RT I have to most def here the song u recording lol 
lol well.... U tell us.. Lol RT“@jprince713: when is next party” 
Me and at #miamiheat game #teamheat  
Guys!!! Are you watching Hawaii 5-0 on CBS NOW!!! ! My Selita is on!! 
since I'm a new Bmajor artist can u have some food there I'm hungry!! 
Guys!!!- Hawaii 5-0 tonight CBS 10pm eastern!! My Girl Selita is on! Omg so excited!!! 
can we do studio tonight? Finished my song.... 
hahahahhahahahahahahahahahhahaahahaha ahhhhhhhh hahaha RT“@VALgabond: Only person wearing black at the miami heat game... #ididntgetthememo” 
On my way to #miamiheat let's go get em GUYS!!!!!!!!!! #teamheat 
I'm Not a morning person.... 
Morning. Rise and grind? Rise and be sluggish? I'm the ladder... 
Woohoooo #KhloeAndLamar airs tonight on E! at 10/9cent!!! Tune in Live!!!! I can't wait!!! 
So excited! RT“@BryantMckinnie: The newest members of #Bmajor Music Group &  
Oh ohhhhh watch out!!!! RT I got n the booth, she wrote a rap.  
Hey guys 
yes!!!! Lol RT“@Joey19451: Hey!!! Did you see me singing ain't no mountain high enough? Lol!!!” 
Lol guess who at karaoke lol  
Karaoke with still going strong. Just sung lil mermaid "part of your world" was a fan fav! 
Karaoke still lol 
me too!! RT“@KrystleColeman: Enjoying my "Saturday" with Valgabond & 
me too!! RT“@KrystleColeman: Enjoying my "Saturday" with Valgabond & 
Foot massage on the beach? Relaxing. Love it! 
On beach hanging with my Val. :) 
Duet of the NIGHT with and me singing survivor by Destiny's child! Loved that!! #encore 
Karaoke time!!!! With and 
stay there an pray pray pray! RT“@jennychoo815: on my knees right now!” 
Awwwwww love her!! RT“@BrettRatner: #fanitafriday and  
I am so glad I met he's my best and fav Big bro! #dinner with my bro 
I love her song too! Love u RT“@lorenridinger: Can't stop listening to my girlfriend song #ImInto LOVE THIS Song! Feat Lil Wayne” 
Check ustream  
just twitter hacked me!!! Lol ughhh 
Yall follow the most amazing person n the world We r on 99 jamz now having a ball. Tune in 
DJ Sdezzy. I'm going with it!!! 
What is my DJ name? I'm thinking S double u 
u are annoying. RT“@IamRRA: RRA's request is "Show Me A Good Time" by Drake!!!” 
umm ok y r u tweeting me and u r sitting next to me.. RT“@VALgabond: please play lil wayne "6 foot 7" pleaaase” 
my fav song this year RT“@ladyGG101: Serena can you play Where you at by J hud please!!!!” 
for SURE RT“@giostud69: look at me now by chris brown !!!!” 
About to be on 99jamz. If you send request I'll shout you out on radio. Just a few lucky ones though... :) 
got you RT“@nek_brab: please play moment 4 life!!!!!!!! Just for me!!!” 
hahaha ok RT“@KrystleColeman: Can you please play "Soon as I get home" by Faith Evans that's my request!! :) 
On my way to 99 jamz to host with if your in south fla be sure to tune in!! I need request guys!! Fm 99.1 
Carols daughter is celebrating race less beauty. All tones and hair types. And their new beauty?? My bestest ! Love u babe! 
Vote 4 Mara Brock Akil creator of "Girlfriends" & "The Game" for 100 most influential people!  
Hey guys!!!! Check me & as Guest Dj on 99jamz this between 3:30 & 6pm! Tune In so excited. What song should we play? 
Hey guys! How ru??? 
Hey guys. Thanks so much for supporting me on HSN. I love you all. Muahhhhh 
lol oops RT@mgvsmith: You're my favourite tennis player, it's surprising how few of your background pix show you on court?” 
I am about to go Back on HSN NOW for 2 hrs ru gonna watch?!! ?? Muahhhh xx S 
Ok thanks for the advise ill tell my girl! Lol although she's already reading the replys!! 
I don't know. I think it was mutual. RT“@DriaMusic: whose idea was it?” 
Good morning guys! Im gonna be on HSN at 10 am. In like 20 mins! I've worked so hard on this new collection I hope u like.... :) retweet!! 
I can't wait to c u Friday to torture you about...... Lol hahaha I'm not gonna stop talking about it.... 
let's talk about ..... Lol love driving u crazy about that. Lol lol lol 
u make me laugh. Lol #loser 
I'm on at midnight HSN 12am to 2am. Watch new designs and more!!!! Please!!! 
me and and my girl Val sitting having a heart to heart... 
Get the last ones!  
Thanks for the amazing support on today! We sold out of one and we only have a few left of the others! 
Tune into NOW at 6:15pm ET to see my favorite products on HSN – Get it!  #Mission! RT 
Tune into today at 3:10pm and 6pm ET to see my favorite products on HSN – Get it!  #Mission! 
I will be on at 11:25am ET today! Talking about our 90-Second Cleanser and the Muscle Pain Relief Gel RT 
I'm buying it now! RU RETWEET RT“@KELLYROWLAND: Motivation!!! New single on itunes Feat. 
Aww me too :( RT“@IamRRA: Wyatt loves to sleep with his pillow. Sire loved to physical abuse Teddy Bears. I miss Sire.” 
I'm doggie sitting and I have 4 dogs in my bed. One took my Teddy & is using it as a pillow. I'm crammed n a corner fighting for the blanket 
Just finished making salt baked fish, and lemon flounder with a remoulade sauce. With almond crusted green beans w/ My girl Val 
thank you. how ru? 
Soon. Don't be late. lol 
It's branzino. 
Who would like a chance to win an autograph? Tune in to tomorrow & follow for more details! RT 
NO 
Please follow my company I will be on this Weds at 11am RT 
I’m going on this Weds with my company Tune in! #Mission. RT 4 a chance 2 win autograph. 
Chef at work  
lol 
My bro 's new book How To Get Out Of Your Own Way is a PowerfuLRead  #Proud! tinyurl.com/46kn29s 
Look who I spotted on the court. Her first day back...  
Cool news guys stay tuned.. Ill update u with a pic.. U ready?? 
Back on the shakes. And mental rehab. Looking into lobotomy options today... Lol (seriously) 
yea tks for sharing!!! Lol 
I'm banned from sharing remember? Lol RT Good morning folks! What's good thts happening in ur life?Pls share w/ the class :) 

Good morning, Bon Jour, Buongiorno, Guten tag, Buenos dias 
I love u guys!!! RT Night's young w/ supermodel No trouble yet unless we run into (cont)  
I'd be Mary or Martha so I could have meet Jesus RT“@TravisGarland: If you could be anyone in history, fictional or real, who would you be?” 
omg I feel the SAME way!!! RT“@OliviaGriffian: I would put Cholula Sauce on my fingers and eat them if could.” 
I'm still trying to recover. Never again. I'm too young for this :) 
Remain level headed, and live in the moment. Take only your relationship with God seriously. #thatsmyadvice 
:) 
I'm coming! RT“@SandraBernhard: we want you back on the courts serena, ur missed, ur power and talent is needed and wanted!” 
My life change starts today. Healthy living both physically and spiritually. #focused 
awww dang. I'm not there!!! Sad face! 
Early morning meeting. 
Assume the position. Teddy bear, pillow, tv on, eyes closed 
#Khloe&Lamar new series airs tonight on E! at 10/9cent!!! Tune in Live!!!! 
Just pulled an all nighter with and at Wow!!!! 
In bed with my loyal Teddy bear. Y am i awake? 
just saw in west palm. Great show!!!!! 
Awwwww so sweet. Love u guys! RT thank you for everything. I love u. This is best weekend since my wedding. 
Missing get better. :( 

I karaoke where you at yesterday! #whereyouat RT My twitter was down . I'm back now guys ! Where you at?! 
That sums it up. EPIC RT EPIC. Wow. 
Morning stories with , Lyn, greatest night EVER last night 
hurry home!!! 
Dear Serena go to sleep

Signed your eyes 
I just got in the worst funk... 
gym? As in dancing? Wink RT 
I did of course!!! RT“@BryantMckinnie: laugh!? U better ask who won yesterday.” 
I am going to make today better than yesterday. What about you? Have complete Confidence in YOU 
I'm big on doing hero by enrique and London bridges. I'll try the rest. I often sing Tom Jones lol 
:) love it!!! RT“@J9Howard: you have your 2,000,351 follower!!! Hello!! Great breaking bread with you :)” 
How are my tweeps. I love y'all my day has indeed been epic. How was yours??? 
Me and at heat game!! Yea !!!  
Omg I can't hang with u.... Omg lol yea baby! 
Umm this is how wakes up in the am. I wanna wake up so glamorous!!  
omg so happy to be here with my baby!!!!!! Yeaaaa 
Today keep your head up and shoulders back. Walk around with complete confidence. Conquer any fear you have today. Your day will be epic. 
lol I'm 100%following it!! Lol haha 
yea u wanna practice later I'm in your city... And I can also get another advise session 
thank you for your advise yesterday. You are the best!!! 
Ugh paper cut. 
Taking tons if Vitamin C.... 
Stability 
please. U need to! BAD !! RT“@BryantMckinnie: Long day but its workout time” 
I've lost friends due to karaoke. Lol 
Watching Regarding Henry. I love Harrison Ford 
PC Reunion 3 DAYS. All PC members and members ONLY RETWEET!!! 
I'll be seeing you soon... RT“@KrystleColeman: Miss you :) 
we have learned tons from you RT“@MindyWeiss: Wish I was there miss you two! RT"@serenawilliams: Chilin with my girl Val again!"” 
come to fla! 
Chilin with my girl Val again! 
:( 
Just heard the most truest words from had me near tears...... 
Uh oh ...... 
Beach time with my girl and now time :) 
#whereyouat RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: #winning!!!” 
what??? Lol RT“@trckjak: congrats to for being BACK in the top 10 even if you haven't played in almost 9 months!” 
I'm gonna do this in karaoke! RT R&B Advice!! "When you sing grab your heart out of your chest (cont)  
shut up lol. RT “@IamRRA: Hahahahahaha!!!!” 
Love or stability 
Dinner with ladies and 
Ugh :( 
Shoot! Dang!!! 
tiebreak in the 3ed and final set. I'm biting my nails 
Nadal needs to be on twitter.... 
What a match 6: 5 nadal leads in the 3ed.... 15:15 
wish u were here! RT“@SvetlanaK27: i missed it to but so far i m to far from it))how are you girl?” 
Watching men's final! 
Singing "can't be friends" I'm gonna rap "right thru me" 
Yea karaoke time!!! Whewww I missed this 
OMG I have stories too!!! ahhhhhh omg omg 
Umm.... Why am I watching sponge bob? 
Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: MIAMI!!!” 
I'm on a boat!!!! Lol RT“@larsapippen: I love u  
heyyyyyyy 
We r pro party starters RT“@VALgabond: Brought out the maracas and tambourine we carry in our purse and started a salsa party on the yacht 
With late night sailing. ru we miss u!! 
Just hanging onto this moment. Reality kicks in soon... 
Now I know why Everybody is buzzing about new book I can't put it down..!!  
ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh lol lol u need to send me a pic now!!! RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: WHATTT!!? #icant *eyes r covered! Lmao” 
listen you are in your own! RT“@VALgabond: you are the ultimate big sis. I mean really. Val 6.0 ...Love you!” 
I'm for sure am making u sooo mad right now. Lol 
I mean my smile right now could brighten anyone's day 
What's happening to me? ?? 
omg u r insane!!! Hahahahahahah ahhhhhhhh hahah come baby. Come by!!!!! 
hahahahhaahhahahha RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: So I've decided I'm driving this to house next week! Lol  
As we reach our 36th hour without sleep! :) #iloveyourlife2 RT Here we go again.... Why ...Why?! #ilovemylife 
We there! RT West palm beach FLORIDA! Wayans Bros April 8 – April 10 WestPalmBeach Improv (cont)  
we love you!!!!! :) :) :) 
tks so much I'll be back at 9pm east coast time 
Hey guys. I'm back on HSN soon! 5pm!! Yeaaa 20 mins... 
“@serenawilliams: Omg look who I ran into! love him!!  
tks love again at 3pm east coast! :) 
Thanks guys for tuning to me and I am back on at 3pm east coast/ 12 noon west coast!! :) 
I'm about to be on HSN with my new collection at 9am! 45 mins guys!!! Tune in great designs and even better prices!!! 
Guys I am on my way to Tampa for HSN! Watch me!! Its 9am tomm. So many new products. I'm sooo excited yeaaaa! RETWEET 
my goodness that sounds like fun 
Workout time. 
Ugh I'm singing karaoke again. Ugh #ineedhelp seriously guys 
Good morning 
aww you are so awesome. Appreciate the prayers. From u and EVERYONE! They def helped! I'm better so much better & blessed. :) 
nope. Although I have sung that a lot lol RT“@psloveejustus: la bamba ? lol” 
nope. Although I have sung that a lot lol RT“@psloveejustus: la bamba ? lol” 
nope. No green day :) RT“@FutureMrsBosh: Definately some #GreenDay Songs :)” 
Seriously though guys u won't guess my songs. Really. 
honorable mention but no not one of my 5 go to's RT“@joemarquart: the sign by ace of base?” 
honorable mention. That's go to song RT“@LaylaTab: Spice Girls- Wannabe? (ok, maybe it's a personal favorite)” 
that's one of the 5 RT“@BigSerenaVeeFan: Everything I do?” 
honorable mention. Love singing that one!!! RT“@mesgreene: Friends in low places- Garth Brooks? Hahahaha” 
Awww that was my go to 5 years ago. But it deserves an honorable mention RT“@breenab: alanis morisette's 'you oughtta know'” 
me tooooo hurry and get ova here!!!!!! 
nope 
nope 
that's one of the 5!!! Love that u got one!! RT“@Ranald87: brian adams - everything i do i do for you??!?!” 
No one has guessed my go to karaoke song. Actually I have like 5 no one gas gotton any of them!!! :) 
lol nope. Lol!! We muss u!!! RT“@matthewperrye: Livin' La Vida Loca????!! :p ;)” 
no that's RT“@StuBue: Bell Biv DeVoe by Poison” 
no!!!! 
no one would ever guess“@ChrisJabil: if you could pick your karaoke "anthem" which song would it be?” 
hahahahahahaha yes!!!! Hahahahahahaha 
omg I looooove 311!!!! RT“@VIM_731: did you karaoke ?” 
Ummm I am singing Karaoke and I started crying cause I missed singing so much! Lol. Never going another day without karaoking #ineedhelp 
I'm hungry 
I love u too 
I love my team. 
Does anyone know where I can buy one of those Booty Pops? 
lol no she did not qualify lol 
getting her tennis practice on!!! Lol  
love u baby!!!! 
omg ru in fla??? 
Yo it's gym time #whenindoubtworkout!!!!!! 
I know its not on purpose but #Ihatewhen people spit when they talk. Someone just did and it got in my eye!! Ughhhhh 
Oh yea baby  
Me and at Miami Heat game! Go Heat!!! #hot  
GOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO Yeaaaaaaaaaaaaa 
#ff 
awwwww sooo cute RT“@tthomas906: he is so cute. He looks like me lol” 
Me and my teddy in bed watching family guy.  
ugh im karaoke queen!!! RT“@FutureMrsBosh: Karaoke at the Bosh Household! Top score so far is 93 :)  
check dm 
When I get a pimple my confidence is the first thing to go!!! 
I'm coming!! RT“@MARLONLWAYANS: WAYANS BROS April 8 – 10 at West Palm Beach Improv West Palm Beach, FL 561-833-1812 www.palmbeachimprov.com 
:) 
Listening to #whereyouat on repeat. I'm crazy for this song!! U guys gotta get her album. Amazing!!! 
Obsessed. Can't focus. 
I'm there reunion ASAP!!! 
ooooooommmmmmmmggggggggggg 
ummm hello??!! Bar Bosh And Karaoke?? I'll NEVER leave!!!!!! Is this true??? 
Elizabeth Taylor. Grace style, elegance, legend. You had Beauty the world has ever seen. No words can describe the loss of you. 
just finished mine. How long ru gonna do??“@psloveejustus: Evening workout !” 
:) 
That was fun back to singing y'all or maybe gym instead.... 
Now following yea baby!!! 
u got em 1st RT“@roxymack: So Emotional - Whitney Houston, I Give My All - Mariah Carey & Run Around ..Blues Traveler? LOL 
Ok no one has got all 3 songs. Whoever gets it first I am gonna follow! :) its 3 diff songs.... 
OMG!!!!! OMG!! I had that cut!! I want it again!!! OMG I LOVVVVEEEEEEEE IT!!!!!! U r so hot!!! 
Name those 3 tunes!!!! :) 
Name those 3 tunes!!!! :) 
I've been feeling So Emotional, and I learned I'd Give My ALL, and also I've been giving someone the Run Around!! 
Singing Karaoke explains everything!!!!..... 
A rose with thorns that need to be removed. 
When in doubt #workout 
Not a morning person but my I feel so productive. Humm I should reconsider... 
I'm awake and hate mornings. 
we love u so much. And my prayers are with you and your family. All my love. 
I love u so much 

Its almost 10pm and on BET to see host and co-produce #Riptherunway!! Ahhh RT!! 
I cannot wait for your album tomm! #whereuat is my jam. Everyone get Jennifer Hudson new album I'm stores tomm!! 
PLEAZE! tune in tonight 10pm on BET to see my super sexy bestest host and co-produce #Riptherunway! RETWEET!!! 
Stay tuned for a awesomely sexy video I am tweeting later..... Stay tuned...... 
Good morning. Gym time for me. Happy for that. Gotta get my spot back and free my mind! 
I really need help. #whatshisname has me near tears I ruined it. 
Dear #whatshisname please get out of my mind and thoughts 
Hey guys thinking about a boat and relaxing. #imisstennis 
AMAN! RT I have to say everytime i hear a new song on the radio, it makes me excited to get the F.A.M.E lp! 
I'm nuts for music when does F.A.M.E come out? I can't wait!!! can I get a advanced copy? 
omg PLEASE!!!! RT“@AngieBeyince: Hummm Wonder what that #badhabit could be :) Do we need to talk? :) hahahaha!” 
In the words of I gotta shake this #badhabit 
Alls well that ends well.... Lol 
Whatshisname would have never done that. 
Ugh I let this nerd ruin the rest of my day. #tomorrowisanewday 
omg we have to talk. Emgcy!!! Please lol. Hahaha your friend...... 
Lol I'm the bodyguard for a 6'3 man lol hahhahahahahaahahahahaha lol. And I'm not even 100% healthy 
And if u saw something wouldn't you want me to be safe?? Lol what a joke!!! Lol 
Omg some people make up the wildest lies. Omg really?? Lol not even worth my laugh! Loosen up!!! Kids can't handle real life. 
So proud of my little sis !! Can't say why.... Ahhhhhh 
Come on gang no suggestions?? Anything open now? 
lol we r trying to find a place. Lol 
Know ant places?? 
Karaoke in Miami anyone?? 
Tough day for us all RT“@Estaleemob: Being thankful and focusing on what I have and NOT what I don't have right now.” 
When things seem bleak pray laugh, and move on. 
Bad follows me everywhere. I can't escape bad luck 
too late #Whatshisname “@jsmoll: No relapses! Lol” 
when ru on hsn? 
lol ughhhh “@BrittGastineau: which one ayyyyyooo. LOL JK xoxo” 
Why am I thinking about whatshisname?? ugh 
Awww if I wernt so tired I would have joined! RT Am I crazy for having a candlelight dinner alone? 
I miss u more please come to Miami! Soon RT“@lorenridinger: I am missing my friend have fun baby in MIAMI xox” 
Gearing up for the next scene. Easy day. Thanks  
1st pic back at work. commercial shoot...  
Part 2: Tetherball Game  
Sorry, guys. Here is Part 1 of my Tetherball game  
On set of commercial fun times pics anyone? 
yup only sasha and I are working seriously. RT“@BigSascha: Team Williams working hard!!  
great seeing you too! Loved our convo! I have tons to think about... RT“@TiaMowry: it was nice seeing you sweets:)” 
loooove!!! “@nataliaroks: my picks sweet child of mine, NKOTB the right stuff and baby one more time BS.” 
Watch me playing Tetherball  
yes love I'm coming tomm! Will u be there?? 
ohhh I need to be there... RT“@CaroWozniacki: Singing kareokee at home.. Would just need here, would be perfect :)” 
check your DM!!! 
oh my than what would the world do?? Even I would start dreaming about you!!! Lol 
ummm I'm obsessed with red curls! wow I LOVE them!! 
awww thanks! I love you! and appreciate your support!!! 
next time u gotta ask!!! 
At dinner with super fun/cool cat!!! So and so and whathisname eat dust!!! 
Me too. I love u girl. So glad I'm better. RT Had a great time filming w/@KELLYROWLAND and n store for Season 2 
thanks babes! I missed u last night. :( 
I am feeling Much better Guys thanks again for all the support. I hope to be working out soon. Very soon.... 
UMM #whereyouat is my jam. I cant stop playing it. I can't Wait for it to come out on a Karaoke CD! 
RIP Nate Dogg...West Coast LEGEND! Wow so sad 
U guys hav pretty eyes! RT Ladies Nite  
I would be the little Mermaid and Wonder Woman RT What Disney cartoon figure u think would be?? 
Lol fun fun RT Hahaha! Me and getting some Karoeke in today..so fun!! Serena is a pro!  
where u at? 
So excited ladies!!! :) love u girls! I need this!! 
they should be waiting in line for HP's new touch pad! 
People waiting for ipad 2 crazy  
Its so Sad and scary to See Japan going through such a horrible time. My prayers go to everyone there and all the families affected. 
Hey guys! I am better each day. I'm so in love with my fans and friends! My family too! I'm beyond blessed to have so much love around me! S 
Visit serenawilliams.com to view a video from the U.S. tennis Team: Jim Courier, Andy Roddick, John Isner Bob & Mike Bryan. Thanks Guys! 
Hey Loves! I am overwhelmed, and teary eyed by all the love and support from everyone.  
go girl can't wait!!! RT“@KimKardashian: Sneak peek at my music video!  
Tough day.... 
Love this pic!! RT We had so much fun. & r as good as they get!  
Omg guess who just joined twitter? Kiefer sutherland. So cool....... I gotta follow! 
It's 3:11 
love you more baby! RT“@lorenridinger: Missing my friend:) love her! 
It's march 2011. It's month!!! Yeaaaa!!! 
I'm not doing much. How are you? 
Me too. 
Where have you been? 
Yes, for & IamRRA.blogspot.com 
Lol. 
I listened to a few songs but that song is great. lol You know who to thank. 
I know. It is so sad. lol 
What you guys searching for? 
Thanks. 
I told you. LOL. 
I try. Thank you for following. 
lol. My cousin. Checkout 
Ask him. Mitch how old you are? lol 
you are sweet. thank you. 
Thanks. 
Are you following him? 
Let me know, what you think. He is can really sing. 
Thanks for making me smile. 
What is your cousin's name on twitter? 
You have what? 
What is your talent Mr. Famous? 
Really, why? 
Just ask him. He may. 
No, I will not. 
Who is following Follow him. We all have dreams so listen to his song "Dreaming." 
Well, follow lol. 
Thanks. 
Healthy food. 
Thanks. 
Follow my cousin He is new to twitter. 
I'm going to wait until Friday. lol. 
Really? ;( 
I didn't do it. I'm sorry. I will be on this Friday. 
Awe. Hi, Gizmo. 
Thanks. 
I will. promise. 
Who missed me doing s/o for #ff? 
Hello, Composer. 
Thank you. how are you 
What do you mean? 
Who has my shade Simply Smashing! Send me a photo. 
I'm almost at 2 million! Hello, New Followers. 
I miss u.. :( 
My dogs have jet lag! Sooooooo cute!!!!! 
lol all the time!! Lol usually I start crying RT“@psloveejustus: have you ever been so upset you cant even feel your body ?” 
Ok by tweeps hope u enjoyed the pics!  
I prefer this pic..  
Me and love you buddy!  
And my shatter nail polish!! Love!!!!  
Close up on the Neil Lane jewels  
Had to show a back shot! This dress was crazy nice!!! #buttpower  
I changed for the vanity fair event. I'm wearing a custom gown by Ines Di Santo, jewels by Neil Lang, & Faguen b…  
Inside the Elton John Oscar party. Beautiful event  
I started the night in this max azria dress. Paired with Serena signature statement jewels and my fav Faguen ba…  
ill send pics of my looks in a few!! 
love to keisha whitaker love u ladies! #girlpower 
Morning guys. So tired in bed had a blast last night. So much fun 
I love u more!!! RT“@KimKardashian: Seriously I love u sister 4 life!!!!” 
#teamheat !!! 
lol I know!!!! Ahhhhhh RT“@psloveejustus: no one karaoke's more than #teamwilliams !” 
Is it weird that I am karaoke ing at 2:45 and I've been doing it for 2 hrs already??#Ineedalife 
:) no u r the best RT So great to see you last night. You made & my night w/ur #kindness ! 
looking forward to tonight with you! U owe me a flip book!!!! :) :) 
I love y'all like crazy but I'm a fan... #goheat !!! 
omg hahaI cant wait to tell you. can 9pm hurry and come so we can chattttt!!! ahhhhh lol 
hahaha stage 5 and all i don't care! bring it on!!! 
I went back and spoke my mind to you know who... :) 
Had the best time with last night. Let's rendezvous again!!! I literally can't wait!!! 
hey guys!!!!!! had a blast last night! forgot to send pics... sooo sorry. Oscars tonight. who's watching? 
Getting ready for pre Oscar event. #Glamtime I'll send pics!!! :) 
yes mon, Tues? Wed?? I'll text u!! RT“@OfficialMelB: you back in LA/ dinner at mine before i leave next week!” 
hahaha for sure!!! 
Ugh I've been in a funk all day. My mom took me out to dinner. I wish she'd come back. I miss her... 
1995.... Need I say more?? Need I say more?  
please! RT“@KrystleColeman: I can come and sing "soon as I get home" by faith evans if you like...for some laughs!! :) xoxo” 
thanks for the support. it means a lot. i am really hurt and sad 
is comforting me right now. I cant believe I am in tears! 
I WAS IN THE IDIOT CLUB when it FIRST came ALIVE!!!!!!!!! one of the first Idiots!!! 
following ONLY = hurt and tears 
Im so emotional right now 
I'm sooo hurt. So hurt. I mean so hurt. 
lol now my eye feels minty and refreshing! lol 
hey guys I need help. whats a quick way I can get rid of a pimple? I tried toothpaste and it ended up in my eye. It burns! :( 
im loving the purple...... 
so fun. cant wait to see pics... 
Great event at Ari's WME pre Oscar party. Had fun... 
Ummmm I felt so many people staring at my bum today. Tight clothes at a commercial... 
Shooting most amazing commercial ever. I'll send pic?? Neh u will have to wait!! 
#FF 
me too!!! RT“@lauralyemae: i watch the Golden Girls everyday...i guess i need a life too lol” 
Who's your fav golden girl? I like Blanche Deveraux!!! 
AND laughing to myself!! Lol someone help me!!! 
In bed watching the golden girls #ineedalife 
Love you RT“@BrittGastineau: With the gorg  
please!! ASAP!!!! “@itsgabrielleu: table 12 was on point today! Next stop...karoke and garth brooks :)” 
some of Gods greatest gift is what we think are unanswered prayers.... 
ok guys we have a new baby on twitter miss Gabrielle Union! follow her and her beauty at luv u dahling!! 
I hope u guys liked my pics!! :) 
The Gorgeous Essence #BWIH  
Forrest Whitaker at the Essence #BWIH  
The amazing Mikki Taylor!!! at the Essence #BWIH  
Angela Bassett and me! I love you!!! :)  
Ok guys I'm sending pics 
Most amazing event ever!!! So cool!!! Essence #BWIH 
Viola Davis at Essence #BWIH luncheon. Not a dry eye in the house  
At Essence #BWIH event. Fun amazing women! I'm honored. 
Yes NO BOOT GUYS!!!!!!!!!!!! 
and is doing my makeup. 
Question- I keep hearing about an admittance to someone cheating me & lying about it after at the French open? Did she confess finally? 
Getting ready. I'm running a bit late....  
Hey guys getting ready for essence luncheon... Pics anyone? 
Is jello fattening?? 
u are so mean .... 
Parla un poco Italiano RT“@BJAofficial: I want to learn how to speak italian. Can anyone teach me how to speak italian fluently? Please!” 
u miss mama? Lol maybe jackie?? And Laura? Maybe u miss me yelling and hitting balls at you.... 
for me tks RT“@KimKardashian: RT Fall in love with someone who deserves your heart, not someone who plays with it.” 
is there any song I DONT love?? 
I love this song. Standing on the corner of Stuart and the ave. RT“@BJAofficial: Stuart and the avenue= telegraph avenue in berkeley” 
English: good morning are you well? 
Bonjour. Ca va bien? 
we miss u too!! RT“@BigSascha: At cabo flats missing Estha, and when u guys coming back :(” 
Where is Spike Lee at? Are you losing your mind yet??? 
Lol I'm not huge into sports outside the dolphins. And sorry but I love he HEAT!! Go Miami!!!! 
Lol I mean knick lol 
Sooo is melo a nick now??? 
yup lol“@DriaMusic: is that a green day song? lol” 
Sometimes I wish someone out there will find me. Till than i walk alone... 
very fast but I heard she hates BBGs body. That's a start.... “@SallyAndJane: sally needs an intervention... and fast.” 
B.B.G's body is just not normal. Ughhh gives me the creeps 
Follow and keep up w/ & the family. Check out this story. HOT!  
Bonjour! Ca vs bien? 
Desperate housewives time! 
I don't believe in luck... But if I did mine would be categorized as BAD and TERRIBLE. 
Nice relaxing day. Needed the rest.... For after hours lol 
I love u my tweet family. I love you all. 
Pray incessantly 
:( RT“@FutureMrsBosh: Everything will start looking up very soon! Don't worry!” 
My day could not get any worse 
Don't forget my line is out and in stores now! 
Checkout my profile and find all of my Urls in one place:  thanks to and 
#FF and visit stupidDOPE.com an online magazine 
If you want a s/o for #ff follow 
Who should I s/o for #FF? 
#FF=Follow Friday 
Thank you all for the #FF. 
#FF 
I enjoyed working w/ Suzi on my new lacquer line f/m Hope you all love the colors! 
My line is in stores now! Get it while it’s hot! 
I love u guys!!! Have a great night!!! RT“@mnnesotagirl: Serena is a gem!! Thanks for tonight ♥” 
I'm sleepily!!! 
u guessed it!!!! RT“@LoveAlwaysKy: green day of course ! :)” 
I am! :) RT“@KhloeKardashian: Lamar and I are hosting a party at Club Nokia tomorrow night. Who's coming?” 
Come on guys. My fav people the ones I always tweet about... My band.... Anywho some of u got it. I'm so happy!!! Fun times... 
Dinner with my fav people in the world. U guys should know who! 
I'm awake!!!!! 
yea baby!!! Whoooooooo 
I used to say 1039 never again!!!!! Lol sorry!!!! 
I'm back tomm baby!!! RT “@dice30: Cali whats good for tonight? I need something to get into!” 
Ill achieve my life long dream of singing karaoke to Jesus of Suburbia.... Count down 15 mins to glory! :) 
I'm not watching. Lol RT“@BryantMckinnie: Hey we r thinking about ustreaming from the studio! If I get enough (cont)  
For the record I LOVE #Foreverandever 
I love u!!!!!!!!!!! RT“@KhloeKardashian: don't forget me woman! LOL” 
how could I??!!!! We MUST hang I won't accept no for an answer!!! Grrr RT“@KhloeKardashian: don't forget me woman! LOL” 
On set of American Idiot! :) one day ill be a star.... :) lol  
lol please we need a hot girl!!! :) RT“@nataliaroks: I want to be a back up dancer :)” 
yeaaaaaaaaaa!!!! Im there!! Let's do lunch!!! RT“@FutureMrsBosh: Off To LA Now :) Farewell xoxo #AllStarTime” 
Great day today.... Bought new karaoke CDs. Saw American idiot on broadway. Thought about _ o _ _ o Amazing!!! 
I LOVVVVE GREEN DAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! LOVE LOVE ahhhhhhhhhhhh I love love love!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
I'm at the american idiot play on broadway... Again! Lol is amazing 
I did sent it to Larry... 
we miss u too!!! :( RT“@Zef_B: I miss you guys already! 
my sister lyn? RT“@BryantMckinnie: Leaving Nike Town heading 2 meet Lyn 4 lunch.” 
wow I wish I could have a song written too. But it would have to be called stalker! Lol RT“@BJAofficial: One (cont)  
when ru coming to la?? 
my god I love your tweets. RT“@BJAofficial: 409 was a song about dropping out of school. I remember thinking I (cont)  
One ticket on the Titanic please. Tks 
My first tennis tournament I was not supposed to be playing. I entered myself into the same tournament Venus was (cont)  
I'll watch. I miss u. RT“@MsSelitaEbanks: Watch Selita TONIGHT!  
I'll be there! RT“@TravisGarland: Show tonight is gonna be bananas!! Got a couple of surprise guests (cont)  
I love u more!!! RT“@Zef_B: I love you 
me too!!! RT“@Venuseswilliams: Im learning so much too! this unlocks many questions I have had in my life!” 
I war crying too!!! #sisterlylove RT“@Venuseswilliams: I got a default in my first match and I started crying (cont)  
can I have your son? 
I LOVE it!!! RT“@Venuseswilliams: thanks for helping me to follow Its made me so happy!” 
Anhui I never did it in Russia!!!!! RT“@SvetlanaK27: we miss u here!!!!come back!and i also invite u to russian karaoke))))” 
we all are.... Keep trying 
I love the song facts. I am learning so much!! 
:) 
Out of 7 days in a week. I karaoke 9.... #fact 
Karaoke tonight.... 
My feelings hurt 
Desperate housewives marathon staring in 5... 4... 3... 2... 1..... 
I miss u big sister. I miss stealing your bed and dog. :( RT Starting Monday out at the gym, and you?” 
In thinking All day in bed .... And watching desperate housewives. 
Congrats for the Grammy for American idiot on broadway!!! Yeaaaaaaaaaa 
I do!! RT“@itsjustussheesh: I don't think anyone likes getting their nails done as much as I do. Like it's my (cont)  
wow RT“@BJAofficial: The 1st verse of scattered was written in 1992. 2nd verse was finished in 1996. Everything comes back at some point” 
Still awake.... Another long night.... Ugh 
Oh man the suns coming up 
I hate when drivers do the speed limit and I jut want to speed! Ugh 
We haven't gone to Ed yet.... RT“@OfficialKimora: Rise+Grind!! #Saturday Edition! the Work doesn't stop! Let's get it in!☺ #FaBuLoSiTy #fb” 
Had a great dance with can't wait for tomm!!! 
I can't wait for this evening.... Amazing stuff going down.... 
#FF because he is my best friend and he always looks out for his lil sis. 
#ff s/o 
Lol yeaaa !RT I'm buying the whole display.  
I'm sending s/o for #ff but you MUST follow 
#ff RT waves hand! Me! Lol 
#followfriday 
Thanks for including me in your #ff! Who should I s/o for #ff? 
You are right. 
I need a little to life my spirits... 
Hey guys! How ru? 
hey where ru? Call me I lost your digits!! 
where was welcome to paradise written?? 
that my fav song on 21st century breakdown! RT“@BJAofficial: Before the lobotomy was written on a trip to santa cruz.. Lyrics that is..” 
because I love chicken!!! RT“@serenawilliams: Dear Serena, 
Why?
Signed 
Your conscience” 
Dear Serena, 
Why?
Signed 
Your conscience 
:( I miss y'all!! :( RT“@lala: Having a blast...we needed this! RT Spending the day in NYC with my BFF 
:( I miss y'all!! :( RT“@lala: Having a blast...we needed this! RT Spending the day in NYC with my BFF 
I can't wait for my next lesson! Love u too!!! RT“@LoveAlwaysKy: Me and :D love yoou  
yea I'll be better at it but I can help u.. Hahaha RT“@itsjustussheesh: now maybe you can teach me how to dougie too ??” 
spending quality time with we always have so much fun!!! 
wow that's cool. Thanks buddy! 
follow they taught me how to dougie!! :$ 
5 days on 4hrs or less of sleep. I'm tired.... 
u r gonna go nuts when u see the new stuff! Its soo HOT!! RT@IamRRA: U know that RRA loves electronics so that is GREAT Ha! 
HP just Unveiled the Palm Pre 3, TouchPad Tablet and More!! HP is about to launch a wave of new webOS devices I'm so excited I LOVE HP!! 
that's one of my fav songs!!! RT“@BJAofficial: I wrote "having a blast" in cleveland in 1992. Had a (cont)  
What’s better than one Two! Grab my duo & make ur nails shine!!!! 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
where u at? 
